=o&gt; 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES: 



CONTAINING 



THE CONVERSATIONS 



OF 



EUGENIUS AND ALCIPHRON 

ON THE 

SPIRIT AND BEAUTIES 

OF THE 

SACRED POETRT OF THE HEBREWS. 



SELECTED FROM THE 

GERMAN DIALOGUES AND DISSERTATIONS 

Of the celebrated HERDER. 



LOND JV: 

Printed by A. Strahan, Printers-Street, 
FOR T. C A DELL JUN. AND W. DAVIES, IN THE STRAND. 

1801. 



PREFACE. 

THE original work, from which the follow 
ing DIALOGUES are feleded, was publifhed 
at Leipfic in the year 1787, and an intereft- 

;~s^"- *- 

ing account of its contents was foon after 
given in the Appendix to the Ixxxth volume 
of the Monthly Review, among the articles of 
foreign literature. 

The name of HERDER has been long 
diftinguifhed in the annals of theology, 
philofophy, and literature ; and the DIA 
LOGUES which are here offered to the public, 
will, no doubt, be confidered as an interefting 
fpecimen of the piety, genius, and tafle of 
that eminent writer, and refpe&able man. 
They breathe, indeed, a fpirit of rational and 
elevated piety, though, upon the whole, 
the author appears rather as a poetical and 

3 



VI PREFACE. 

philofophlcal) than a theological critic. Me 
does not judge of the books of the Old Tefta- 
ment, and the merit of Hebrew poetry, by 
comparing them with the regular productions 
of ages and nations more refined &gt; but by 
going back to the times of the writers, and 
confidering men and things in the light in 
which they viewed them. This is, no doubt, 
a wife and judicious method of proceeding. 
In his explication of the paflages of Scripture, 
he confiders them principally in an hiftorical 
view, and, at the fame time, by examining 
and illuftrating the rhetorical and poetical 
manner of expreffion fo frequently ufed by 
the Oriental writers of Sacred Hiftory, he 
often afcertains the fafls which they tranfmit, 
and never fails to animate, by his manner of 
treating them, the virtuous and religious feel 
ings which they are adapted to excite. In 
fome inftances, perhaps his explanations will 
be deemed more ingenious and fanciful, than 
folid. But we all know that genius has its 
whims. Humanum eft errare. 

The 



PREFACE. Vll 

The Dialogue to which we have given the 
Jirfl place in this feletion, contains an inte- 
refting investigation of the earlieft opinions 
of mankind concerning the Deity ^ Creation^ 
Providence^ the Angels^ and Elolim. Among 
other things, the Author expofes here the ab- 
furdity of thofe who have reprefented religion 
as originally derived from the apprehenfions 
and terrors of mankind. 

The lid * contains the Mofaical account of 
Khz primitive Paradife, and the fall ofourjirjl 
Parents. 

In the Hid, the ideas of the ancient He 
brews concerning the invijiblc world and chaos^ 
are confidered and illuftrated. 

The IVth and Vth are employed in point 
ing out the defign, and the numerous and 
exquifite beauties, of the book of Job. 

This Dialogue is the Vlth in the original work, but it is 
placed here, at lead with more chronological propriety. 

The 



PREFACE. 

The Vlth and VHth treat of the opinions 

of the Hebrews concerning the nature and de- 

Jlinatlon of man, and the judicial providence of 

- 



In the VHIth, the characters of fat patriarchs 
are examined and eftimated, and the writings 
of the Old Teftament vindicated, againft the 
imputation of fuggefting narrow and partial 
ideas of the difpenfations of Providence. 



DIALOGUE 



DIALOGUE & 

Dawn A Jketcb cf the Creation The 
jftrft imprejjion of the GREAT SPIRIT, as 
powerful Whether this feeling was fervile 
terror? Probable origin of the terrible in 
the ancient religions Proofs of pure ideas 
of the ALMIGHTY Probable origin of the 
notions that were formed concerning Him* 
Whether they occajionally led to Idolatry ? * 
Ufefulnefs and necejfity of the idea of thz 
Divine UNITY in forming the human under* 
Jl an ding The excellence and ufefulnefs of the 
kind of poetry^ by which that idea is illuf- 
trated and confirmed The tendency of the 
Parallelifm of heaven and earth to prove 
andillujirate the Unity The great advantage 
which Oriental poetry derives from the con 
nexion of thcfe ideas How this poetry rehre- 
Cents the Deity in action and repofe His 
WORD Early notions concerning the 

" O 

ANGELS The idea cfGod, as the Inceffantly 
active Parent of the UNIVERSAL FAMJLT. 



B 



( 3 ) 



DIALOGUE L 

iiuGENius and his friend ALCIPHRON 
met, in confequence of their rgreement the 
night before, at an early hour, on a beautiful 
rifing ground, fituated in the centre of an 
extenfive profpecl. The dawn had not, as 
yet, pierced the gloom, which covered the 
face of Nature : all things were without 
form, and, as it were, enveloped in the veil 
of night. After fome moments the veil be 
came gradually tranfparent, and the lovely- 
dawn appeared. It came forth like a ray of 
celeftial light upon a renewed world. All 
around it fhone the glory of the Lord, which, 
with a gradual increafe of fplendour, began 
to expand itfelf through the vault of heaven, 
as its majefcic temple. The more it afcended, 
the more clear and elevated did the gilded 
azure of the horizon appear. The blue ether 
difengaged itfelf from the fogs and damps 
which defcended into the lower regions of the 
atmofphere, and, being illumined by ftreams 

B 2 of 



4 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

of light from above, made the earth appear 
like a glittering fea, or as a fapphire inlaid 
with gold. So {hone the awakened earth, 
adorned with trees, plants, and flowers of 
different hues, which feemed all to await the 
bleffing of JEHOVAH, The foul of man is 
elevated by the noble profpeft, and feels a 
fublime calm, analogous to the mild azure 
of the heavens. But of all thefe pleafing 
moments none is more delightful than the 
firft break of dawn, the firft perception of 
light, when (as the Hebrews exprefs it,) the 
Parent of the Dawn is in a laborious conflict 
with the {hadows, and, in a fuffering and vio 
lent pofture, waits for the moment of delivery 
from her anguiih. This moment is con- 
fidered as the birth of the day : a foft thrilling 
pleafure is felt by all beings, which are en 
dowed with fenfibility : they feem to enjoy 
the prefence of Jehovah. It is alfo remark 
able, thai, in the moft ancient nations, a dif- 
tindion was made between the light of the 
dawn and that of the fun : they coniidered 
the former as an uncreated being which 
gleamed from the throne of God, and returned 
thither when the terreftrial fun arofe. 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 5 

EUGENIUS. Let us hail, my friend, with 
joy, this delightful moment of the New-born 
Dawn ! It was the dawn of human know 
ledge, and the cradle, perhaps, both of Poetry 
and of Religion upon earth. 

ALCIPHRON. What do you mean ? 

EUGENIUS. Have we not now feen a 
kind of reprefentative view of the work of 
creation in a fucceffion of fcenes, from the 
deep nocturnal gloom to the rifing of the 
fun, with which all beings on the earth, in 
the air, and the waters, feem to awake, as it 
were, into a new exiftence ? Now I wifh you 
to obferve, that not only the fhort hiftorical 
account which we have of the Creation, but 
all the hymns of the Hebrews, relative to that 
ftupendous event, nay, even the greatest part 
of the names of the beautiful objects, we fee 
all around us, have been formed upon the 
actual view of the objects themfelves ; and 
this is (what I love to call) the rnoft ancient 
Nature-Poetry of the Creation. 

ALCIPHRON. When and by whom 
formed and compofed ? 

B 3 EVGE- 



6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUED 

Eu GENIUS. That is more than I know, 
with any high degree of probability. It is 
not eafy to carry back our refearches to the 
firft efforts of human intelligence and genius. 
It is enough to have before us * the roots of 
the poetic language, and the firft outlines of 
the picture, to the compofition of which they 
contributed. And what if we fhould (in this 
calm and filent hour 

21? meditation dus, and facred foiig^ 

endeavour to investigate the primitive ideas 
and conceptions, which the contemplation of 
nature was adapted to excite, and the con 
nexion and feries of the various fcenes which 
are really to be found in the beautiful infancy 
of Nature-Poetry? Methinks we could not 
employ our morning better, 

ALCIPHRCN, I accept your propofal with 
fingular pleafure, and I am perfuaded, that 
the INFINITE BEING will deign to accept of 
the hymn of praife, which muft naturally 
acconipany the contemplation of his glorious 
works. The early dawn leads our thoughts 
to the dawn of the world, to the morning of 
the creation, and will thus diffufe anw-clevated 

* Gcnefis, i. 

kind 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. J 

kind of pleafure through our hearts. 1 have 
obferved, that, generally fpeaking, the poetry 
of every nation is, more or lefs, modified by 
its climate. A low, cold, and foggy region 
gives rife to ideas and images which feem to 
refemble its temperature, while, in an exten- 
five and varied profped, a pure air, and an 
elevated iky, the foul, if I may fo e;:prefs my 
idea, becomes more expanded, and takes a 
bolder flight. 

EUGENIUS. On this fanciful idea I might 
make many reflections ; but I fhall not 
trouble you with them at prefent. We fhall 
not vifit the fummits of Sinai or Tabor, but 
afcend, if it be poflible, the Hill of Hills , the 
firft fcene of the terreftrial creation, and ob- 
ferve how the dawn received its birth, and 
the firft poetry of the world its exiftence. 
Or, if this flight appears to you too adventu 
rous, and the region, to which it leads, too 
folitary and awful, let us defcend to fome 
more convenient place. It will be, per 
haps, moft eligible to remain where we are : 
night is every where night, and morning 
is every where morning : we have every 
where the heavens above us, and the earth 
#11 around us, and, in no place, can we be 

B 4 abfent 



8 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

abfcnt from the GREAT SPIRIT, who 
fills both with his gracious and awful pre- 
fence. It is this great Spirit, which has raifed 
man above all the other inhabitants of the 
earth, which points out to him the works of 
his Creator ; and, in the fublime contempla 
tion of thefe ftupendous works, infpires both 
his underftanding and his heart with the 
poetry of nature. 

ALCIPHRON, You feem, my friend, to 
have caught an animating fpark of this in- 
fpiration. Begin, then, the inveftigation 
you propofed, by the moft ancient opinions 
concerning the origin of things. 

EUGENIUS. Where can I, with more 
propriety, begin, than with the NAME of 
Him, who, in the Poetry of the ancient Bards, 
animates all things connects all things? 
He is there called the Terrible^ the Mighty^ 
whofe fovereign power they perceive over 
all, whofe prefence, though invifible, they 
feel with a facred and refpedful emotion 
whom they revere with trembling by 
whom they fwear whom, by way of emi 
nence, they call HE, HIM: the GREAT 

SPIRIT^ 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 9 

SPIRIT, whom all the favage hordes, all 
nations, as yet, in their infant-Hate, feek, 
feel, and adore. O my friend, what ele 
vation do we find in the poetry even of the 
rudeft, the moft uncultivated nations ! How 
powerful is their continual impreffion of the 
prefence of the great, Invifible Spirit ! Have 
you obferved, in the work of a modern Tra 
veller*, the account of an American, who 
went to fee the great waterfalls of Niagara? 
When he heard, even from far, the majeftic 
found of that immenfe body of water, he 
fiood flill . . . and held converfe with the 
Great Spirit: when he drew near to the ftu- 
pendous object, he fell proftrate on his face, 
not from a fervile terror, but from an awful 
fenfe of the prefence of the Great Spirit^ in 
fuch an amazing work : thus he thought 
that he was now nearer, than ever, to the 
INVISIBLE ; and, accordingly, he prefented, 
with a filial reverence, every thing he had 
with him, as a devout offering, with calm- 
prayer and adoration. Now, in the feelings 
and conduct of this American, you fee my 
friend, the hiftory of all the nations, 



* Carver s Voyages, 

guages, 



JO ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

guages, hymns, divine names, and religious 
fervices of ancient times. Of this I could 
give you a feries of proofs from the records 
of antiquity ; but I know, that with thefe you 
are well acquainted. 

ALCIPHRON. Of thefe I am not ignorant. 
Philofophers, however, have explained, in a 
very different manner, the ftrong emotion 
occafioned by that religious veneration of 
which you fpeak. It was ignorance^ fay 
they, that gave exiflence to the gods ; ftupid 
and fervile aftonifhment produced the firft 
* oblations to them, whom- terrified fancy re-f 
prefented as powerful beings, as invifible 
daemons, from whom mankind had every 
thing to fear. In all languages Religion has 
derived its denomination from terror, as they 
allege ; and they endeavour to prove this by 
a long enumeration of the ancient names 
given to the Deity in the language and 
writings of the Hebrews. 

Eu GENIUS. This explanation of the 
matter is, I confefs, of ancient date ; but its 
falfehood is ftill more evident than its anti 
quity. There is.no fubjefl: on which frigid 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. II 

and fuperficial thinkers fall into groffer and 
more extravagant miftakes than in their fpe- 
culations on human nature and its feelings* 
In all the remains of ancient times, which 
have come to my knowledge, 1 find manifold 
and undeniable fals and circumftances, 
which prove that religious honours and 
worfhip did not originate from fervile terror, 
and ftill lefs from a brutifh ftupidity. On the 
contrary, it is the effential and diftindlive 
character of Man, and that which places him 
above all claffes of beings merely animal, that 
he is fujceptible of religion. The propenfity 
to worfhip one or more fuperior beings is 
known to h:r~e taken place among men in all 
nations and periods of the world : and why, 
I befeech you, muft this propenfity be de 
rived, only^ from anxiety and fear? Our 
exiftence, furely, is ar* act of beneficence, 
and not a punifhment ; otherwife the love of 
life, and the ardent defire of its duration, 
would be unaccountable ; the great Being, 
therefore, to whom we are indebted for it, 
and by whom we fubfift, muft be eonfidered 
as good. Dally experience muft convince us 
of his benignity, and there is, consequently, 
no reafon to fuppofe, that the worfnip and 
6 honours, 



12 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

honours offered to him by mankind in all ages, 
were merely the fervile tribute of aftoniih- 
ment or terror. 

ALCIPHRON. You cannot, however, b 
unacquainted with the multitude of horrible 
rites and ceremonies of a religious kind, 
which are to be found in the hiilories of 
many nations; and you recollect, no doubt, 
the work of Boulanger^^ who reprefents all 
religious worfhip, as occafioned by terrible 
calamities, fuch as inundations, waterfpouts, 
the general deluge and anxious prefages and 
apprehenfions of fimilar difaflers. 

EUGENIUS. Let us not trouble ourfelves 
with the gloomy vifions of this ftrange man. 
He was constitutionally fplenetick and melan 
choly, and, by his profeffion, he was infpec- 
tor of bridges and dikes, where he had often 
dreary fcenes and ruinous inundations before 
his eyes. It is alfo well known, that the 
hiftory of the deluge had made a profound 
and permanent impreffion upon his gloomy 
imagination; and this appears even in his 

* A member of the French Academy. 

ftyle 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 1$ 

ftile and manner of writing. Befides, his 
learning is fo vague and fuperficial, and his 
ideas are fo confufed and extravagant, that 
he is a very improper guide in the prefent 
difcuffion. At the fame time, I am willing to 
grant that the religion of many ancL..t 
nations was really mixed with painful feelings 
of apprehenfion and terror. This was more 
efpecially the cafe with thofe who had their 
dwellings in rude climates, in dark caverns, 
amidft burning mountains, or on the barren 
eoafts of unfrequented and tempeftuous feas, 
or of fuch as w r ere accuftomed to frequent 
views of difmal objects, and of revolutions 
accompanied with inhuman fcenes of devafta- 
tion and carnage. But all thefe are manifeft 
exceptions from the general and ordinary ftate 
of things ; for the globe on which we live is 
neither a barren defart, nor a perpetual deluge, 
iior an aggregate of volcanoes. It has been ob- 
ferved, that the religion of temperate cli 
mates has, generally fpeaking, fomething in 
its fpirit which partakes of their mildnefs ; 
and, even in the moft dreary and uncomfort 
able regions, the idea of an invifible Superior, 
not only powerful, but alfo benevolent, has 
never been totally effaced from the human 

mind. 



14 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

mind. It may even be confiderad as highljf 
probable, that all the forms of fuperftition, 
which were productive of anxiety and terror, 
xvere the inventions of later times ; for the 
fentiments of religion, which we meet with 
in the earlieil ages, are rational and fublime. 
The human race, in a very early period, feera 
to have been furnifhed with a valuable por 
tion of knowledge, plain but pure. Never- 
thelefs, when colonies were fent into diftant 
regions, when a depravation of fentiments 
and morals took place, and was followed by 
the calamities and difafters, which are its or 
dinary confequences, then, indeed, the pure 
metal was mixed with drofs. But let us not 
lofe ourfelves in fuch a vaft and fruitlefs field 
of inveftigation, as that which the general 
hiftory of man exhibits in the different 
nations and periods of the world. It is our 
prefent bufmefs to confine our view to one 
people *, and one language. 

ALCIPHRON. True : but you may ob- 
ferve, that, among this people, and in this 
language, the moft ancient names and attri- 

* The Hebrews. 

butes 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. I 

butes of the fupreme Being were not derived 
from goodnefs and love, but from power and 
majefty, and the veneration and awe, which 
they are adapted to excite. 

EUGENIUS. And now could it be other- 
wife ? The idea of power is, certainly, the 
firft which prefents itfelf to the mind of man, 
when he confiders the incomprehenfible caufe 
of his exiftence. The infinite, or, at leaft, 
indefinite power of their Maker, is the moft 
natural feeling, of which weak and helplefs 
mortals can be confcious. The book of Job 
gives the moft affecting proofs of this truth, 
and in terms the moft elevated and fublime ; 
take only the following fpecimen* . 

e&lt; Wife in heart and mighty in flrength ! 

** Who hath hardened his heart againfVHim 

" and hath profpered ? 

" He removeth the mountains, and they know not : 
" He overturneth them in his anger \ 
f He fhaketh the earth on her foundations, 
" So that the pillars thereof tremble ! 
e He commandeth the fun, and it rifeth not : 
" He fealeth up the ftars in their dwellings : 

* Job, is. 

" He, 



\6 OklENTAL DIALOGUES* 

" He, alone, fpreadeth out the heavens, 

And treadeth upon the heights of the fea | 

He maketh Ar&urus, Orion, and Pleiades, 

" And the chambers of the fouth 

He doeth great things, paft finding out* 

" Yea and wonders, without number. 

" Lo ! he goeth by me, and I fee him not ; 

* He pafleth on alfo, but I perceive him not ; 

Behold he taketh away ; who can hinder him ? 

Who fliall fay unto Him, What doeft thou. ?" 

What do you think, my friend, of this 
paflage ? Are not the elevated feelings, here 
cxprefled, the feelings of nature ? The more 
clear and extenfive the ideas are which a 
people form of the power of God difplayed 
in his works, the more, proportionally, miift 
their expreffion of that Power become em- 
phatical and affecting. Even the wifdom of 
the fupreme Being, by which he formed the 
the univerfe, and governs intellectual and 
moral beings, is awful and majeftic : it is 
fuch a boundlefs ocean of intellectual energies^ 
as fills the attentive mind with aftonifhment 
and veneration. You recoiled, no doubt, a 
remarkable example of this in the Hebrew 
Poetry. 

ALGI* 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* j 

ALCIPHRON. You have in view, as I 
imagine, my favorite pfalm*. I think it 
would be proper at this moment, for our 
morning-devotion. 

&lt;c Jehova, thou fearcheft me, 

** And knoweft me ; 

" Thou knoweft my down-fitting and up-rifing 5 

c&lt; Thou underftandeft my thoughts afar off j 

(e Thou compafleft my path ; 

" Thou art acquainted with all my ways : 

" There is not a word in my tongue, 

" But, lo ! O Lord, thou knoweft it. 

" Such knowledge is too wonderful for me ; 

&lt;f It is high, I cannot attain to it : 

" Whither mail I go from thy fpirit, O Lord ; 

Whither (hall I flee from thy prefence ? 

" If I afcend up into heaven, Thou art there : 

" If I make my bed in the abyfs, Thou art there : 

" If I take the wings of the morning, 

( And dwell in the uttermoft parts of the fea j 

" Even there (hall thy hand lead me, 

And thy right-hand fhall hold me. 

" If I fay, furely the darknefs (hall cover me } 

" Even the night (hall be light about me : 

" Yea, the darknefs hideth not from thee ; 

" But the night ihineth as the day ; 

&lt; f The darknefs and the light are both alike to 

thee. 

cc For thou pofleffefl me in my inmoft parts \ 

&lt;c Thou didft cover me in my mother s womb ; 

* Pfalm cxxxix, 

c c I will 



iS ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

I will pra tfe thee, that I came into being, 

" wonderfully made ; 

" Marvellous are all thy works, O Lord ! 

" That my foul knoweth deeply. 

" How precious unto me, O God, are thy 

" thoughts ? 

" How overpowering is the fum of them ? 

" Should I count them, 

a They are more in number than the fand ; 

" When I awake, as from a dream, I am 

Still with Thee." 

EUCENIUS. Can you point out, among 
the productions of any other nation, of equal 
antiquity with the Hebrews, fuch a hymn as 
this ? Here you fee exprefled in all the fim- 
plicity and grandeur of poetic language, the 
pureft ideas and the moft fublime truths, rela 
tive to the nature and moral government of 
the Suprerne Being. You fee his omnifcience, 
his prefcience, his intimate knowledge of the 
human foul, his univerfal prefence, and his 
providential direction, painted in the moft 
lively colours. The very thoughts, with 
which many of the modern philofophers mean 
to fhine in their writings, are to be found in 
many places of the book of Job ; and are even 
exprefled with fuch propriety, and energy, 
that I really know no theifm fo pure as that 

which 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 1Q 

which is difplayed in the hymns of the Old 
Teftament. 

ALCIPHRON. Confider, however, that 
the paflages, you have been quoting, are ra 
ther modern, and that, in the moft ancient 
hymns on the Creation, the Elob un at a 
part*. 

EUGENIUS. Of this I am aware; and 
they were, undoubtedly, found by Mofes in 
thole ancient defcriptions and picturefque re- 
prefentations of the creation, of which his 
firft book is compofed. For they could not 
have been inferted in that book by Mofes 
himfelf, who was the great adverfary of poly- 
thetfm^ and of every thing which could lead 
to it, 

ALCIPHRON. That I am difpofed to be 
lieve. I even think it probable that Mofes 
ufes the word created, in the fingular number, 
as a prefervative againft polytheifm. At the 
fame time, it appears pretty evident, that the 
firft notions, which men entertained concern 
ing the Elobim^ were, in effect, polytbeijlical. 
They were fuppofed to be the models of wif- 

* Genefis, i. 

c 2 don* 



so ORIENTAL 

dom held forth by the Serpent to our firft pa 
rents, and were probably confidered by Eve, 
as having acquired their wifdom by eating of 
the Tree of Knowledge of good and evil. 
You know how the Orientals filled every place 
and region with invifible beings : and, more 
efpecially, that they believed the exiftence of 
a fubtile fpecies of fpirits, or Genii, who lived 
upon the effluvia of trees, made war upon the 
giant-fpirits, and took plants, flowers, trees, 
and mountains, nay, the elements and ftars alfo, 
under their protection. This kind of poly- 
I theifin is the peculiar charaderiftic of all un 
cultivated nations, and thus the fertile and 
wild imagination of the Orientals could not 
eafily efcape it. They confidered the univerfe, 
as full of life, and peopled every region with 
living beings. Such were the Elobim, Adonim^ 
and Schadim of the Hebrews, the feed of the 
Parfi, the Lahen* of the Tibetans, the De 
mons of the Orphic Hymns, and, in a word, 
the moft ancient fpirits and divinities of the 
unpolifhed world. 

EUGENIUS, It may be fo : and fuppofmg 
all this to be true, do you find any thing in it 

* Lahm was a name, which feem$ to have been equivalent 
to that of Ehk tm. 

furprifing 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 2 I. 

furprifmg or contemptible ? Confider fuch a" 
weak creature as man, that being of yefter- 
day, ftruck with an infantine wonder at a 
view of the works and beauties of nature, 
without having any vifible notice of their ori 
gin, feeing, every where around him, 
energy, wiidom, and a felf-renewed power of 
production and reproduction in all things, and 
obliged to confine his attention and views to 
particular objects, and particular beauties, 
from his incapacity to conned: the whole in a 
general point of view ; after confidering all 
this, do you think it iurprifing or contempti 
bly abfurd, that fuch a creature, in fuch cir- 
cumftances, fhould attribute to feparate crea 
tors, prefer vers, and rulers, the feparate ob- 
jeCts which had made fuch impreffions of 
pleafure and aftonifhment, and which his un 
cultivated reafon was incapable of connecting 
in one general plan ? To the eye of fenfe 
the afpect of nature, though amazingly full of 
action, exhibits no general acting, or efficient 
caufes. How natural was it, therefore, to 
imagine feparate and particular caufes of par 
ticular objedts, diftind creating fpiritF, of 
which each produced a particular object, 
(a plant, a tree, an animal for example,) and 

C 3 contri- 



22 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

contributed to its prefervation with intelligence 
and care. Thefe creating fpirits, according 
to the opinion of the boldeft obfervers, 
placed themfelves in the works, and dwelt in 
them with love. But the vulgar notion was, 
that the creating fpirits became confitbftantial 
with their productions, and that, of confe- 
quence, the genius of each living production 
grew, declined, died, and was renewed with 
the object, which it had formed. In a word, 
thefe Elohim were, firft, Genli^ fpirits of the 
creation, of whom the Mythology of later 
times related many things, which probably 
had no place in the doctrine of the earlier ages. 
When the angels, of whom we fhall fpeak 
prefently, appeared on the fcene, thefe Elobim 
or Nature-Genii held, no longer, the firft 
place. The former flood before the throne 
of God in the rank of celeftial powers : the 
latter were the guardian-fpirits of the creatures, 
and thus only fubordinate fpirits. The eaft- 
ern mythology of later times contains a mul 
titude of fables, relative to the conduct of thefe 
fpirits and their combats with each other. It 
mentions the curious propenfity of the Na 
ture-Genii to get behind the curtain of the 
great King, and intrude themfelves into the 

council 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 2J 

council of the angels, and informs us alfo, 
how they are guarded and punifhed on fuch 
occafions. Suppofing then, that the notion 
of the Elobim was formed in the manner 
I have now mentioned, is it not an innocent 
notion ? What can you object to it ? 

,._r 

ALCIPHRON. Nothing, when it is re- 
prefented as the production of human inven 
tion or poetical fancy : on the contrary, it 
pleafes the imagination :,j we love to be in a 
world, where all is in motion, life and adH- j 
vity, where every flower, every tree, every 
ftar, hath its particular fpirit, its vital princi 
ple, and rejoices with us, in its exiftence. 
But what pleafeth the fancy, does not, on that 
account, fatisfy a found judgment. 

EUGENIUS. Why not? Confider, that 
the notion in queftion, never amounted to 
polytheifm among thefe people, even in the 
moft ancient times. We fee, in one of the 
pfalms of David, that the Elobim were repre- 
fented as fpirits^ whofe excellence was nearly 
attainable by mankind, and, in the firft crea 
tion, the idea of the unity of God the Creator 
Je clearly expreffed. This idea gave to 

c 4 the 



24 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

the poetry of the Hebrews fuch a command 
ing afped of truth and grandeur, of fimplicity 
and wifdom, that they happily became the 
inftrudors of the world. It is impoffible to 
eftimate the immenfe treafure of fpeculative 
knowledge, and moral inftrudion, which man 
kind derived from the fingle dodrine of the 
unity of God. This imperceptibly reclaimed 
them from idolatry and fuperftition ; it remo 
ved the foundation of thofe vices, and enor 
mities, which proceeded from poiytheiftical 
diforder and anarchy. It accuftorned the 
human underftanding to difcern and contem 
plate unity of dejign, in created things, and 
thus to inveftigate general laws of nature, laws 
of wifdom, and goodnefs, to perceive, in a 
great variety of parts, one whole , real order, 
in feeming diforder, and light in darknefs. 
And, while from the idea of one Creator, that 
of one world, (JCGO-^O^, a beautiful whole^} 
naturally proceeded, it may as naturally be 
conceived, that this idea had no fmall influ 
ence in forming the human mind to the per 
ception and love of intellectual and moral 
beauty and order. Now the poetry and in 
ftrudion, which contributed to produce thefe 
happy effects, were, no doubt, fignally bene 
ficial 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. ^5 

ficial to mankind. And herein is the merit of 
the Hebrew poetry peculiarly difplayed- It 
was the firft bulwark that was raifed againft 
idolatry : it fent forth the firft ray of light 
which reduced the chaos of creation to unity 
and order ; and do you know how it produced 
this effecT: ? 

ALGIPHRON. You can beft explain that 
matter. 

Eu GENIUS. By a very plain method, 
by, what we may call, the paralldifm of 
heaven and earth. According to this method, 
the creatures were to be diftinguiftied from 
each other, and placed, as it were, in certain 
ranks and divifions. Now the more natural 
thefe divifions appeared, and the more eafily 
they were formed, the more were they deemed 
beautiful. 

ALCIPHRON. Where then fhall we find 
this divifion and thefe happy arrangements ? 

Eu GENIUS. They reign in a variety of 
ftriking contrafts, through the whole of the 
Hebrew poetry, which, on this account, may 
be called the poetry of heaven and earth. 

The 



26 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

The moft ancient accounts of the creation are 
formed upon this plan; and of this, what we 
call, the work of fix days^ is a ftriking exam 
ple. For, when the heavens were extended 
on high, the earth, beneath, was adorned with 
rich difplays of beauty and grandeur : when 
the air and the water were ftored with living 
creatures, the earth alfo was enriched with 
inhabitants. This para llelifm of heaven and 
earth, runs through all the hymns of praife, 
which were addrefled to the Deity in confe- 
quence of the contemplation of his glorious 
works. It is remarkable in the book of 
Pfalms, in which all nature is called upon to 
adore its author. It animates, in a manner 
equally afFecYmg and fublime, all the folemn 
and public addreffes of Mofes and the pro 
phets to the people of Ifrael. In fhort, it 
enlivens the whole mafs of the Oriental 
language and poetry. 

ALCIPHRON, But it feems to me, that this 
parallelifm wants proportion: for what is the 
earth in comparifon with the heavens ? 

EUGENIUS. It is this difference, that the 
facred poetry of the Hebrews was particu 
larly defigned to point out. It was defigned 

to 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 27 

to elevate and expand our ideas of the immen- 
fity of the heavens, by comparing it with the 
earth s furface, which, though it may appear 
of vaft extent, when confidered feparately, 
comes forth, in \h^ parallel^ as a grain of fand. 
The radical words of the language, and all its 
defcriptions and images 5 render this evident. 
You recollect, furely, feveral examples of thefe 
comparative defcriptions. 

ALCIPHRON. There are, indeed, many,- 
and one which is particularly fublime, occurs 
to me this moment. 

" The leaven is my throne, 
The earth is my footftool." 

Eu GENIUS. This is truly a great and fub- 
Hine example. I fhall add another from the 
Book of Job*. 

" Canft thou by fearching find out the wifdom of 

Eloah? 

* c Canft thou comprehend the whole power of the 
" Schaddai? 

" It is higher than heaven, what canft thou do ? 
" It is the depth of depths, what canft thou know I 
* The meafure thereof is longer than the earth, 

" is broader than the fea." 

* Job, xi. 

Here 



28 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Here you fee the notion that was entertained 
of the infinity or immenfity of a vifible world. 
What we call the unive/j^, is an object of 
which the people of the earlieft ages had no 
notion ; and to thofe of later times, the term 
world, or aon, conveyed the idea of every 
thing that is little, mean, mutable, and pre 
carious. The heavens change and decay as 
a garment : the earth is a theatre of dreams 
and vilions, a grave ; but the God of heaven 
and earth, he who was before the mountains 
ivere brought forth, before the foundations of 
the heavens and the earth were laid, is, and 
remains the fame through all eternity. He it 
is by whom both were created and are re 
newed, before whom the heavens fee away^ and 
the earth difappears in the immenfity of 
fpace. 

ALCIPHRON. I muft own, that I do not 
well fee what the poetry of the Hebrews has 
gained by \ti\s parallel ifm without proportion. 

EUGENIUS. In my opinion it has gained 
confiderably. It gets thereby into the way of 
comparing the infinite^ with the finite, which, 
in poetical painting, produces a great effecl:. 

All 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 29 

All that is beautiful, great, and fablime, is j 
among the Orientals deemed celeftial. All 
that is low, weak, and little, is reprefented 
to them by the duft of the earth. All power 
defcends from heaven : all things below are 
regulated and governed from above, by an 
invillble, but a ftrong and irrefiilible influ 
ence. Above fhlne the everlafting luminaries, 
the ftarry hofts : there flows the pure ocean 
of sether: there the holy azure diffufes its 
mild beauty over the expaafe of heaven* 
But here below all is frail, inconftant, tranfi- 
tory, and perifhable. The nearer the human . 
mind can bring thefe contrafting ideas to one j 
point of view, the more will its contemplation j 
of nature become rational and fublime. By 
this comparative view of things it will learn to 
form a juft eftirnate of what is low and little, 
as well as of thofe objects which are noble 
and elevated. It will be placed in a fixed 
point, from whence it will be enabled, in 
fome meafure, to perceive how the whole 
fyftem of nature is poifed and directed. Do 
you think, my friend, that a fpecies of poetry, 
merely terreftrial, would have any higher 
character, than that of an infect, however, 
neat and elegant its compofition might be? 
All fublime and elevating poetry is celeftial. 

ALCI- 



*O ORIENTAL DIALOGUED* 

ALCIPHRON. You dazzle me, at leaft, if 
you do not perfuade me. In my way of 

(thinking, it is our good mother Earth, that 
gives all objects their form, their place, and 
thus alfo their beauty. 

EUGENIUS, But pray do not forget, that 
the Eaftern poets join heaven and earth toge 
ther. From the former, their poetry derives 
fubiimity, expanfion, fplendour, and energy ; 
juft as/we feel a certain elevation of mind, 
when, in a clear night, we raife our eyes to 
the firmament, and behold the moon and the 
ftars in their glory. The earth is the bride 
of heaven, the inftrument and fcene of its 
operations, but not, however, the everlafting 
fcene. Even in the formation of man, earth 
and heaven had each their part: the human 
body was taken from the former, and from the 
latter proceeded man s vital fpirit. As the 
grain of fand, on which we live, walk, and 
ad, is furrounded by the heavens, fo is our 
narrow horizon inclofed in the pure immen- 
fity of fpace, which is full of energy and life. 
Methinks, that poetry muftbe truly deemed 
grand and majeftic, which entertains us with 
an ample view of what &lt;we are, and what we 
are not, of our importance andinfignificaiice, of 

our 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 3! 

our ftrength and weaknefs. It would be illu- 
fory, it would reprefent falfely the real ftate 
of things, ii it difclofed one part only of our 
connection with the univerfe, and concealed 
the other. The fubllme afpires after iiifinity 
and immenfity, and foars towards the height 
of heaven, and whatfoever confines the true 
and the beautiful within narrow limits, is 
merely terreftrial. 

ALCIPHRON You maintain ably your 
hypothefis of parallelism, and I wifh earneftly 
to follow it through the poetry of Job, the 
Pfalms, and the Prophets, that we may fee if 
there alfo as you allege, the great and the 
beautiful, are fo connected as to juftify us ia 
calling out perpetually, 

&lt; Receive, O heavens, my fong, 

&lt;c And hear, O earth, the words of my mouth/ 

I wifh to fee how the Lord of heaven and 
earth connects the one with the other, even 
in facred poetry. 

EUGENIUS. He unites them, if I may fo 
cxprefs myfelf, fometimes in fcenes of repofe, 

and 



32 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

and fometimes in ads of energy 1 . In repofe, 
when, fitting on his throne, he commands 
creation by a word^ and orders exiftence; 
and here we have again the firft and the moft 
fublime parallelifm, 

God faid let there be light, 
&lt;f And there was light *." 

* ,. .- . ^i 

On many occafions, alfo, we find the fimple 
command of God employed, as a happy 
method of expreffing the boldeft and moft 
fublime ideas in a few words : 

Hejpake and it was done, 

" He commanded and itjloodfyft f." 

The more furprifing and difficult the opera 
tions are which are performed by a word, a 
fimple command, the more beautiful and fub 
lime are the fententious periods in which this 
command is exprefled. 

" He faith to the fnow Be on the earth, 

" To the great rainand k itreams with force J ." 

In the I4yth Pfalm, objects and images of 
this kind are prefented in the following 
manner : 

* Genef. i. 3. f Pfalm xxxiii. 9. J Job, cxlvif. 15. 

He 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 33 

* ( He fendeth forth his commandment upon 

" earth; 

" His word runneth fwiftly : 
" He giveth fnow like wool: 
" He fcattereth hoar froft like afhes : 
S He cafteth forth his ice like morfels : 
&lt;c Who can (land before his cold? 
(t He fendeth out his word anew 5 
" Then they melt ; 
" His wind blows j and the waters flow." 

Here you fee the word of God introduced 
as &perfon^ an agent ; and this kind of perfoni- 
fication is common among the Hebrews. 

ALCIPHRON. In this they are to be com 
mended ; for if all thefe als of the divine 
will and energy were conveyed to us merely 
by narration, this would render their poetry, 
which is now fo fublime, monotonous and 
lifelefs. 

EUGENIUS. It is far, indeed, from being 
defective in perfonal reprefentation ; for the 
whole miniftry of angelic beings is employed 
to render it animated and fublime. It was 
by no means the opinion of the mod ancient 
times, that the deftination of the angels was 
only to ftand before the throne of God and 

D fing 



34 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

fing his praife : no fuch thing : univerfal 
nature became angelic at the command of its 
author. It was, in fome fenfe, one animated 
being, and all its parts were in perpetual 
readinefs to execute the orders of the 
SUPREME. 

if HE-maketh the winds his angels, 

The flaming lightnings are his minifters. 

The Book of job is full of thefe perfonifi- 
cations. The ftars, more efpecially, gave a 
fair occafion, in the earlieft times, to the 
opinion that they were employed as God s 
meflengers. Their elevation and fplendour, 
their pure light and progreffive motions ex 
cited ideas of jubilation, mufic, and dance. 
In proceis of time, they were called the 
daughters of God, who moved, in cadence, 
before his throne, and proclaimed his glory. 
Afterwards they were confidered as the armed 
bqfts of the Moft High, in fplendid order of 
battle ; and hence was derived their iymbolic 
character of fervants and meflengers of the 
Supreme Being. Of this we find fublime ex 
amples in the Book of Job, which (hew, by 
companion, the meanneis of - the earthly fer 
vants 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 35 

vants of the great Being. Thus was the God 
of all the Elohim, in a ftill higher fenfe, King 
of the angels and of the heavenly hofts, the 
Jebova Sabaoth : though this idea is of later 
date. 

ALCIPHRON. Why later ? 

EUGENIUS. Becaufe in earlier times the 
Deity was not fo much reprefented under the 
character of a celeftial monarch in repofe, as 
under that of the active head of an immenfe 
family, perpetually attentive to their concerns 
and well-being ; who, not having deemed it 
below his dignity to bring into exiftence, by 
his creating power, a multitude of beings, con 
tinues to preferve and govern them by his 
paternal providence. Daily does he fpread out 
the firmament, as he did at the beginning, and 
walks, on the waves of the ocean, to the 
utmoft limits of the horizon, wriere he raifes 
his pavilion. Daily does he call forth the 
dawn, as at the beginning, and deals out his 
rain, and opens the treafures of his magazines. 
He binds together the clouds like water-fpouts. 
He forms ftrcams in the firmament, and gives 

D 2 to 



36 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

to the lightning his commands. He cloaths the 
flowers, nourifhes the plants, brings forth 
the dew, and all things upon earth are the ob 
jects of his providential care. The Book of 
Job and the Pfalms abound with images, 
which {hew that no inftance of benignity is too 
mean for the ever.-ative energy of the uni- 
verfal Parent, nor any creature fo minute as to 
be deemed beneath his regard. Thus the 
Hebrew poetry, by its reprefentation of the 
father of the univerfe, is adapted to excite 
fuch lively feelings of confidential veneration 
and love to that wonderful being, as it is eafier 
to conceive than exprefs. Nor is it of the 
poetry of the Hebrews alone that this may be 
laid : for a fimilar character is confpicuous in 
all the poetry of the eaft, which abounds with 
fimilar expreffions of adoration and praife, 
as all their religion is founded on a filial 
confidence in the GREAT BEING, and a 
perfect refignation to his will. 

ALCIPHRON. Is this a good foundation ? 
If the Deity operates alone through univerfal 
nature, in the moft minute objects, muft not 
that perfuafion lead men to inactivity and in 
dolence ? 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 37 

dolence ? And if the fervants and meflengers 
of the Great Being watch conftantly over us, 
and are as adive as they are vigilant in pro 
moting our interefts, what purpofe can the 
labours of mortals ferve ? 



EUGENIUS. We fhall treat that point at 
fome other time. At prefent the fun is high 
in the firmament : let us refume our refpedt- 
ive labours, that we may not incur the re 
proach you have juft mentioned. At your 
leifure you may look over this piece of facred 
poetry : it is of eaftern growth, and has an 
interefting relation to the fubjecls we have 
been confidering. 

Exordium of a Hymn from the Per/! an , taken 
from the Specimens of Oriental Poetry fob- 
joined to the Inflltutes of Timour. 

In the name of Him, whofe name is the refuge of the 

fouis of the faithful ; 

Whofe praife is the ornament of eloquent tongues ; 
The mod High, the only God, the Eternal, the 

Omnifcient ; 

Who beftoweth ftrength and power on the feeble and 
the helplefs. 

D 3 The 



38 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES; 

The heavens he illumines with multitudes of conftel- 

lations; 
And with the human race he decorateth the earth, a$ 

with liars. 

He prepared the vaulted roof of the revolving fphere, 
And raifed up the quadruple fold of the elements. 
He gives fragrance to the bofom of the rofe-bud, and 

ornamenteth the parent fhrub with wreaths of 

flowers. 
He weavtfth the garment for the brides of the fpring, 

and teacheththe graceful cypreis to erecl: his head 

on the borders of the lake. 
He crowrieth with fuccefs the virtuous intention, and 

humbleth the pride of the felf-eonceited. 
He accompanies the folitude of thofe who watch the 

midnight taper ; 

He pafleth the day with the children of affliction. 
From the fea of his bounty iflues the vernal cloud, 
Which waters alike the thorn and the jeflamine. 
From the. treafures of his beneficence proceeds the 

autumnal gale, 

Which befpangles with gold the carpet of the garden. 
It is his prefence that enflameth the orb of day, from 

whence every atom derives its light. 
Should he hide his countenance from the two great 

luminaries of the world, 
Their mighty fpheres would defcend quick into the area 

of annihilation. 
From the vault of heaven to the centre of the earth, 

which ever way we direct our thought and ima 
gination ; 
Whether we dcfcend or haftcn upwards, we (hall not 

diicoycr one atom uninfluenced- by his power. 

2 Wifdom 



ORIE NTAL DIALOGUES, 39 

Wifciom is confounded in the contemplation of his 

EJftnce ; 
The inveitigation of his ways exceeds the pgwers of 

man. 

The angels blufh at their want of comprehension ; 
And the heavens are altonifhed at their own motion. 



D 4 



DIALOGUE II, 

OF Paradife The ideas thereof derived from 
the period of youth from love^ and the bap- 
pinefs of a rural life Whether Paradife ever 
exifled? Why Mofcs places it at fuch a 
diftance^ in a fart of enchanted region ? Why 
this region has been thefubject offo many ro 
mantic fables ?Of the Tree -of Life Of 
thcfuppofed tendency of the imagery of Para 
dife to attach the mind too much to the plea- 
Jures of fenfe Of the converfe of Adam 
with the animals A fketch of the Golden 
Age, with refpecl to the peaceful inter courfe 
of living creatures with each other Of love 
in Paradife Illuft rations on the tender affec 
tions between the fexes in this ancient tradi 
tionOf the free of Knowledge Why the 
ferpent might eat of the Tree&gt; and not our 
Firft Parents ? The character of the fer 
pent -Why Adam and Eve dejired to be like 
the Elohim ? The difference between true 
andfalfe wifdom The Tree of Knowledge 
Whether an apologue or a hi/lory f A nar 
ration of high antiquity The ejfefts of eating 

the 



( 4V) 

the forbidden fruit, even the introduction of 
our Fir/I Parents Into a new ft ate Of the 
relation which this ft or y has to us It con 
tains the principles of different kinds of 
Eaftcrn poetry Of the cherubim Of the 
war-chariots of the Lord in Habakkuk Of 
the cherubim of McfesOf the temple of 
Solomon andExekiel OfEzekieFs cherub 
The tradition concerning the oldeft, fabulous 
animal^ which was faid to guard the trea- 
fures of Paradife Whether the cherubims 
of Mofes were fpbynxes ? How the cheru 
bim pa [fed from the ark of the teftimony into 
the clouds, and became at length a prophetic 
vijion Of the compofition of the Cherubim 
The origin of their Mythology Of the Mount 
of the affembled gods in the Eaft Of the 
chariot of Ellas, and the war- chariot of God 
in the wildernefs Of the moft ancient reprz-* 
fentation of thunder* 



( 43 ) 



DIALOGUE II. 

JduGENius. Welcome, my friend We 
are very lucky in the weather: it is a fine 
morning, arid Nature has a pleafmg afpect 
of youth. 

ALCIPHRON. This afpecl is well adapted 
to the fubject propofed for our prefent con- 
verfation. You feem defirous to carry me 
back to the cradle and childhood" of the 
human race, and alfo to the paradife of rriy 
infancy ; for, indeed, the fpecies, as well a$ 
the individual, is deftined to pafs through 
different periods and modes of exiftence, and 
the confederation of its progreffive motion is 
truly interefting. Befides, the early, the 
primitive flate of humanity, will recall the 
pleafing remembrance of my youth, and the 
infancy of the world will revive the idea of 
my own happy childhood. It was to me a 
very high entertainment, in my earlieft years, 
to wander, in fancy, through the delightful 
fields of Paradife, to accompany the fathers of 

the 



44 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

the human race in their firft affociations and 
connexions, and to take a fympathetic con 
cern in their pleafures and pains. The poets 
who defcribe the characters, manners, and en 
joyments of thefe primitive times, made deep 
and lively impreffions upon my mind ; and 
you know, that we have eminent Bards, who 
have treated on thefe Lnterefting fubjeds. 

EUGENIUS. Every country has its Bards: 
in all nations, which are not totally favage, 
we perceive, at leaft, foine faint traces of the 
felicity of the firft Golden Ages. The poets, 
who, as genuin^ children of the mufes, were 
molt diftinguifhed by their fenfibility and in* 
nocence, have preferved and animated the in- 
terefting tradition of paft felicity, and handed 
it down to fucceeding generations. In our 
early youth we are pleafed with thefe ideas of 
primitive and rural happinefs, and we form 
notions of it according to our refpetive fan 
cies. Every returning fpring revives thefe 
ideas, and prefents to us a regeneration of the 
primordial beauties of the ancient world. 
Hence have proceeded paftoral fongs, na 
tional poems, lively defcriptions of the rural 
fcenes of Paradife, and the happinefs of the 

firft 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 4^ 

firft ages ; and thefe will always maintain their 
credit by being the favourite poetry of our 
younger years. And, after all, what is the 
objed: the ultimate end of all our wifhes ? 
To what would they tend in an uncorrupted 
ftate, but to Paradife ; or, in other words, to 
the enjoyment of health and love, fimplicity 
and innocence, amidft the rural beauties of 
nature ? 

ALCIPHRON. It may be fo but, in the 

mean time, it is much to be lamented, that 
all this feems to be little more than a dream j 
or, at beft, a fplendid yifipn. The primitive 
Paradife is loft : the Paradife of our fpring, 
our youthful days, is tranfitory ; the blooming 
verdure of our vernal feafon paries with rapi 
dity, and leaves us expofed to the hot fum- 
mer-fun of painful labour, with all that train 
of wants and cares which accompany the ad 
vanced period and evening of life. Nay, 
even fuppofing a nation or people were to be 
found in the enjoyment of that peace, inno 
cence, and harmony, which conftitutes a Para 
dife, there is, alas ! always a ferpent which 
creeps in, under fome form or other, to blaft 
their joys, and poifon their felicity. Wherever 

the 



46 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

the Tree of Life grows and bloflbms for 
man, there fprings up near it, a Tree of 
prefumptuous curiofity and knowledge^ whofe 
fruit is death, Alas ! what is man ? 

EUGENIUS. You fpeak, not only with 
eloquence, but alfo with precifion on this in~ 
terefting fubjet ; and you ftate the cafe, 
which we are to coniider, in its true point of 
view. 

ALCIPHRON. And, neverthelefs, I have 
my doubts concerning the facl;s which are 
employed to afcertain the original ftate of 
human nature. Do you really think that 
there ever was fuch a place as Paradife, and 
are we to look upon the fplendid accounts of 
this delightful region as any thing more than 
poetical fidion ? Mofes reprefents it as a fort 
of enchanted land, unknown to him : he 
places it inTuch a ftrange and remote region, 
that imagination has a large field for inven 
tion and einbellifhment, and the hiftorian is 
in no danger of being refuted, even were his 
recital fabulous. Accordingly, learned men 
have entertained different opinions concern 
ing the fituation of this famous garden : 

fome 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 47 

fome place it on the Golden river, others on 
the P/jq/iSy which flows around Colchis ; 
others again on the Oxus, which waters the 
rich plains of Gachcmire ; and there are not 
wanting writers who place it on the banks of 
the Indus and the Euphrates. One thing is 
evident, and that is, that the facred hirtorian 
reprefents the Deity as forming a beautiful 
garden in a widely-extended diftricl:, which 
he calls Eden, a land of delights. But where 
{hall we find the wonderful Trees which 
grew in it, the Tree of Knowledge^ and the 
Tree cf Life? Did thefe enchanted trees ever 
bloffom ? And where flood the Cherubim^ 
which guarded thepaffage to the Tree of Life ? 
or rather, Where does it now fland ? Hath 
not this whole narration a fabulous appear 
ance ? 



EU.GENIUS. Such an appearance it muft 
naturally, have, and we {hall fee, prefently, 
where fable and truth, which are fo often 
blended, may be diftinguifhed, and hiftorical 
fads be feparated from their poetical embellifh- 
inents. You have juftly obferved, that 
MOSES, or, rather, ancient tradition, confi- 
dered the region, in which Paradife was 

placed, 



48 ORIENTAL DIALOGUED 

placed, only in its vaft extent, and without 
any precife determination of its limits. You 
have alfo obferved that it was precifely this 
region, which was the land of fables, from 
whence the inhabitants of the ancient world 
drew their moft beautiful ideas and inventions. 
From hence proceeded their fanciful defcrip- 
tions of the Golden Fleece^ of the apples of the 
Hefperides, and the tree of Immortality. 
This was the land of the firft inhabitants of 
the ancient world, the pleafure-garden of 
their Genii and deities, of the Dfinns, the Peris , 
the NeriS) and other enchanted beings. But 
do not all fuch fanciful relations manifeftly 
prove, that there was, fomewhere, in the old 
world, a real ftate and conftitution of things, 
which gave occafion to thefe inventions, and 
that we mufh feek the origin of all thefe fabu 
lous d efcriptions in fome tradition of a more 
fimple kind ? For when we fee the hiftorical 
and fabulous relations of all ages and places 
of the world, terminating, as it were, in one 
common fet of objects, and, altnoft all, point 
ing to the fame region, we cannot help think 
ing, that there muft have been, fome where, a 
ground for all thefe traditions, fome fixed 
point from whence they proceeded. It is 

evident, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 49 

evident, both from hiftory, and the gradual 
progrefs of mankind towards complete civi 
lization, that the human race muft have had 
its commencement in fome particular fpot; 
and confidering the reports of hiftory, and 
the ftrudure of this our globe, where can we 
more naturally feek the origin of mankind, 
than in that region, to which all the relations 
above mentioned evidently point ? Here lie 
the moft elevated parts of Afia^ the barrier, 
if I may ufe that expreffion, of the old world. 
This immenfe region comprehends the moft 
fruitful hills and valleys, which feel the influ 
ence of our fun, and here Nature fheds her 
bleffings upon mortals with a liberal hand, 
and anticipates their labours. MOSES fpeaks 
of this part of the world only in general terms, 
without any minute or circumftantial detail, 
and this is a fufficient proof of its exiftence. 
He did not judge it proper to fay more than 
the tradition contained ; and, as he had never 
vifited this happy region, nor, confequently, 
brought from it any of the regifters or ar 
chives of Paradife, fo neither was it poffible 
for him to do any thing in this refped):, but 
what he has really done. But you muft con- 
fider, my friend, that it is not our prefent 

E bufmefs 



ro ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

bufmefs either to clear up or vindicate the 
hiftorical fadt. We leave it to circulate, as a 
tradition of the ancient world ; and only 
mean to confider what it has contributed to 
the formation, fpirit, and improvement of 
ancient poetry. We may confider it as a 
root. 

ALCIPHRCN. It is certain, that from this 
root a beautiful tree has fprung up, bearing 
many branches and bloffoms of a rich and 
lively verdure ; for the traditions concerning 
Paradife are exprefted, by the Prophets, in 
the boldeft allufions and poetical images. 
The TREE OF LIFE ftill flouriihes in the laft 
book of the Sacred Writings : it forms thus 
the commencement and the end of the 
Hebrew Poetry. 

EUGENIUS. And beautiful is its begin 
ning, and beautiful its end, my dear Alci- 
phron ! How has the Paradife of Adam been 
ennobled by the Prophets ? They extend it 
even to the times of the Meffiah. Nay, the, 
writers of the New Teftament have aggran 
dized it fo far as to give its name to the ce- 
leftial world. There grows and flourifhes the 

TREE 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 51 

TREE OF LIFE in never-fading bloom :-*- 
thither do we all direct our courfe, to feek, 
beyond the gulphs and ftormy feas of this 
tranfitory world, the truly Fortunate IJlands^ 
the Golden Agc^ which will be permanent and 
eternal. In all the Oriental Poetry, and, 
even in the writings of the Arabian and Per- 
fian Bards, the term Paradlfe expreffes, (if 
we may ufe the language of the painters,) the 
ideal) or the moft exalted conception of 
human joy and felicity. It is the anticipating 
dream of love, youth, hope, and, finally, of a 
future deftination, where 

No fruitlefs wifhes torment the heart 
No painful reflexions opprefs the mind 
Where every objet is permanent and pleafing 5 
Where lucid dreams exhale perpetual fragrance ; 
And where mortality and corruption are unknown. 

ALCIPHRON. This fcenery is no doubt 
enchanting : but are not thefe ideas adapted 
to attach men too much to the pleafures of 
fenie ? 

EUGENIUS. Allow me to aik you in my 
turn, Whether you can conceive any kind of 
poetry, in which either a prefent or a future 
world can be delineated without the afliftance 

2 of 



j-2 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

of fenfibl.e objects, and the ideas which they 
excite ? We know nothing of the beauties of 
a prefent world, but by the impreffions they 
make on our external fenfes, and the ideas 
which accompany thefe impreffions ; how 
then can we fpeak of a future world, without 
employing terms and images analogous to 
thefe ? Accordingly we find that, in the ear 
lier! ages of the world, the ideas which men 
formed of a future ftate, were of the fame 
kind with thofe which are excited in the 
mind by the impreffion of external objects. 
It is alfo certain, that, in after-times, the ideas 
of many became ftill more grofs and fenfual, 
as imagination, corrupted more and more by 
irregular paffions, rendered them incapable of 
relifhing, or even conceiving, any enjoyment 
beyond animal pleafures ; and thus we find 
Mahomet giving a grofsly fenfual account of 
his paradife, drawn from his own impure and 
grovelling propenfities. But all this mifrepre- 
fentation proceeds from the abufes of men, 
and not from the nature of the thing. Nay, 
it may perhaps be affirmed, that even the 
Mahometans have been mifreprefented in this 
matter. Whatever may be faid, with truth, 
of the licentioufnefs of their chief, it is well 

known, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 53 

known, that their poets and philofophers 
have fpoken of the future Paradife with as 
much chaftity and metaphyfical refinement as 
thofe of the northern nations. In general we 
muft take into confideration the natural cha 
racter and genius of the Orientals, and their 
ufual manner of expreffing their ideas. As 
they feel and enjoy with a peculiar fenfibility, 
we muft not be furprifed that their poetical 
defcriptions of love, pleafure, expectation, 
and hope, are animated, and glowing in a 
high degree. 

ALCIPHRON. To this I have no objec 
tion : I am rather difpofed to commend it 
highly in poetical compofitions, which have 
for their objects, the innocent and agreeable 
impreffions made upon the mind by the 
pidturefque defcriptions of rural fcenes : but 
I ftill think that thefe Elyfian fcenes have a 
dangerous tendency to bend the mind too 
much towards terreftrial gratifications, to 
which the eaftern nations are ftrongly in 
clined. 

EUGENIUS. I cannot, I cpnfefs, enter 
tain any anxious apprehenfions of this kind, 

3 when 



54 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

when I confider the prefent ftate of man, 
mingled, as it is, with pain, labour, and 
forrow, and thus ftanding in need of the plea- 
fures of fancy and hope, at lead, to caft fome 
rays of comfort on its gloom. On the con 
trary, I feel a fincere delight, when I find the 
eaftern Bards, in their national fongs, repre- 
fenting the verdant plains, the trees that pror- 
jecl: a deep and refrefhing fhade, the chryftal 
lakes and purling ftreams, as the remains of 
the ancient Paradife, and the prefage of its 
reftoration, in a future fcene, which they call 
the land of Eden, the happy region of tran 
quillity and contentment. How different are 
thefe views of a future deftination from the 
fordid notions of thofe northern Bards, the 
fons of Odln^ who pUce their departed heroes 
in lofty halls, daubed with gold, and loaded 
with hogfheads of metheglin and beer, which 
they fwill out of the fkulls of their flaughtered 
enemies ! How different alfo from the odious 
fyftem of thofe pretended fages, in more 
civilized nations and times, who reprefent the 
natural and ultimate ftate of man as a ftate of 
war, felfifh difcord and tumult, in which each 
individual finds enemies in all with whom, he 
converfes ! Ah ! Alciphron, gloomy and 

inimical 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 55 

inimical to man are the mufes which infpire 
fuch ferocious and uncomfortable lays ! It is 
the object and end of poetry to elevate and hu 
manize the mind, and to render man not fierce 
and favage, but fociable and benevolent. All 
the poetical ideas and images, that have atend- 
ency to produce thefe effects, contribute eflen- 
tially to his true improvement ; and, confe- 
quently, the fublime and beautiful pictures of a 
Paradife of innocence, love, and contentment, 
in the bofom of renewed and exalted nature, 
muft tend directly to this improvement. 

ALCIPHRON. And have the two famous 
enchanted trees this tendency alfo ? 

ETJGENIUS. The TREE OF LIFE, moft cer 
tainly. This tree, in Oriental poetry, pre- 
fents a moft pleafing, a moft delightful image, 
even were the object merely poetical. If we 
knew where it grew, we would all, furely, 
direct:, with ardour, our courfe thither, and 
take fhelter under its foliage. But now, while 
piety i temperance^ and ivifdom, are held forth 
as a Tree of Life, which groweth for all, and 
on the fruits of which all may feed, let us pa 
tiently wait for the other, until the proper 

E 4 ieafon. 



56 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

feafon. O ! my friend, how beautiful and 
affe&ing does the Tree of Life appear, as it 
is defcribed in the laft book of the New 
Teftament ! There it rifes in profpet, at the 
end of our wanderings and conflicts in this 
tranfitory ftate : there it flourifhes in the 
Paradife of God, to refefh the weary and 
drooping pilgrims with its ever-growing 
fruits, and to cover the nations with its ver 
dant and never-fading umbrage. O ! Alci- 
phron, do not labour to fhed the baneful mifts 
of fcepticifm and infidelity over this delight 
ful profped. Leave me, I befeech you, this 
tree, that, when my parched tongue feeks re- 
frefhment in vain, and my palate can no 
more receive pleafure from any fruits of ter- 
reftrial growth, I may fend forth the laft 
breath of this mortal life, in the well-grounded 
hope of an entrance into the Paradife of God. 

ALCIPHRON. And as to the Tree of 
Knowledge 

Eu GENIUS. We fhall fpeak of that elfe- 
where. At prefent, let me aik you, Whether 
you do not think the Creator s bringing the 
animals to Adam, that he might fee how they 

fhould 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 57 

fhould refpectively be named, a beautiful trait 
in the picturefque defcription of Paradife ? 
In this keen and attentive contemplation of 
the inferior claries of living creatures, the firft 
man exerted his faculties, formed them to the 
act of obferving and the habit of diftinguifh- 
ing, as alfo to the powers of comparlfon and 
abftraffion. In a word, the understanding and 
fpeech of the firft man were thus gradually 
and naturally improved and formed. The 
founds emitted by the animals, and by his 
own organs, according to his ideas and per 
ceptions of the objects before him, were the 
firft words in Adam s Dictionary. The firft 
notices of conjtitution and charafter in the ani 
mals were eafily perceived by him, when he 
beheld and examined them with attention, as 
in their gait, their motions, and in their man 
ner of living, there are evident marks of their 
fpecific and refpective characters ; and thus 
the animals were gradually led into a kind of 
fociety with man. Accordingly, there is no 
reprefentation of Paradife in which the fami 
liar intercourfe of the inferior creatures with 
Adam is omitted. They are always repre- 
fented as acknowledging man to be their Lord, 
and as mewing a peaceable and voluntary fub- 
imffion to his authority. 

ALCI- 



58 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. This, furely, has the afpel 
of a fabulous period, in two refpedts Para- 
dife and fpeaking animals ! 

EUGENIUS. A golden period rather, my 
friend ; you muft recollect the delightful ac 
count of this period in Ifaiah* : 

The wolf (hall dwell with the lamb, 

" And the leopard fhall lie down with the kid 5 

" And the calf and the lion (hall go quietly 

&lt;c together ; 

" And a little child (hall lead them : 
&lt;( The cow and the bear (hall feed by each other, 
&lt; c And their young (hall lie down together ; 
" And the lion (hall eat draw with the ox. 
" The fucking child fliall play on the hole of 

" theafp, 
cr And the weaned child (hall put his hand in 

&lt;( the hole of the cockatrice den : 
* They (hall not hurt nor deftroy 

" in all my Holy Mountain ; 
&lt;e For the earth fliall be full of the knowledge 

" of Jehovah, 
** As the waters cover the fea." 

The Prophets abound with defcriptions of 
this kind ; and they are rich in imagery, and 
full of grace and beauty. 

* Ch. xi. vev. 6, &c. 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 59 

ALCIPHRON. And with refpect to the paf- 
fion of love in Paradife, what ideas are we to 
entertain on that fubject ? Milton, indeed, 
and other poets have painted it in lively and 
beautiful colours, 

EUGENIUS. True the touches of Mil 
ton s pencil, on this pleafing fubjedt, are full 
of grace and genuine truth. Love, in Para 
dife, is the fimple defcription of that affection 
in all its original purity. Obferve the traits of 
this charming picture the new, fecret, un 
known propenfity of the man, who finds him- 
felf altae, and cannot exprefs his longing his 
fenfations his fleep; perhaps his dream; 
confider the formation of the woman from his 
treaft, the feat of his heart ; the manner in 
which the Creator brings the woman to him, 
and blefleth them both ; Adam s joy and con 
gratulation on their mutual exiftence ; their 
nakednefs unaccompanied with any fenfe of 
ihame or any wanton emotion : all this is the 
expreffion of fuch a tender, calm, and amia 
ble fenfibility, that, even were it confidered 
merely as poetry, it would ftill deferve to be 
called the Poetry of Paradife. In effect, fuch love 
finds in Paradife its proper place. It is the 



awakening 



60 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

awakening of the heart after the beautiful 
morning-dream of our infancy ; and I am 
perfuaded, that nothing can be faid or fung 
on this fubjecl: with propriety and grace, 
which does not derive its faireft charms from 
the garden of Eden, and the fweet fimplicity 
and innocence of that primitive habitation of 
the huma n race. Accordingly, it is ufual 
among the Oriental Bards to reprefent, in this 
manner, the fmiling periods of love and 
youth. The Song of Solomon is compofed in 
the fpirit of Paradife : Adam s joyful accents, 
You are my beloved ! you are my other f elf ! are 
repeated there in fongs and dialogues from one 
end to the other. 

ALCIPHRON. You do not however ima 
gine that Adam really pronounced the words 
contained in the kind of prediction which is 
attributed to him in the book of Genefis ; 
where it is faid, A man flail leave bis father 
and mother and flail cleave to his wife, and they 
flail be one fefl* ? 

EUGENIUS. I am perfuaded, at leaft, that 
the feelings expreffed in thefe words, were 

* Ch. ii. 23, 24. 

thofe 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 6l 

thofe of Adam : otherwife neither the tradi 
tion, nor the writer, by whom thefe words 
have been tranfmitted to us, would have put 
them in his mouth. Adam may have really 
uttered thefe words, as well as he could, by 
tones or geftures, perhaps by both : they ex- 
prefs the fimpleft, and at the fame time, the 
moft perfeft conceptions of innocence and fe 
licity : and this tender prediction, or prefage, 
announces the true Paradifc of hearts. 

ALCIPHRON. You have given, I confefs, 
a very fubtile and elegant analyfis of the 
hiftory of Paradife ; but, do you think it to 
have been the intention of the hiftorian, that 
this old tradition fhould be reprefented and 
illuftrated in your manner ? 

EUGENIUS. Why not ? It muft be con- 
fidered as, at leaft, one of the collateral pur- 
pofes of the hiftorian ; fmce this reprefent- 
ation of the matter difplays fo happily the 
various and natural workings of the human 
heart. The narration is evidently connected 
in the following manner: " Firft, they 
are naked, but not afhamed ;-^~afterwards, 
they eat of the tree, and then perceive their 

" naked- 



" 



62 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" nakednefs." The paternal Judge appears^ 
and pronounces the lot that awaited them, 
namely, individual marriage, and a rural, or 
cottage-life ; upon which the Creator himfelf 
gives them cloathing. The period of their 
Paradife has thus pafTed with its concomitant 
ideas and feelings, and they experience the 
pains and forrows of this life. 

ALCIPHRON. This much refembles a cer 
tain 

EuGENitJS. No ram c6nje&lt;3:ures and fup- 
pofitions, if you pleafe, on this fubjed* 
Above all, be efpecially on your guard againft 
that improper and indecent hypothefis which, 
I fee, has prefented itfelf to your lively ima 
gination. Nothing can be more oppofite to the 
ipirit of allegories, and even of the language 
of the Orientals than this hypothefis, and 
others of later date, which refemble it, and are 
ftill more forced and inadmiilible. Such in 
terpretations of the Tree of Knowledge are the 
impure inventions of modern times, and are 
totally inconfiftent with the chafte fimplicity 
which characterizes this ancient, plain, and 
venerable hiftory. When Adam knew his 

wife, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 63 

wife, the fact Was related plainly: oti the 
other hand, the ideas and feelings which 
arofe from eating the forbidden fruit^ are alfo 
mentioned with the fame fimplicity. Thefe 
were new, but diftrefTmg and painful feel 
ings : the firft parents of the human race 
fled and hid themfelves among the trees. 
The voice of their Creator, by fixing their lot, 
put an end to their perplexity and anxious ex 
pectations ; and you know what follows. 
This is not at all like an amorous fcene, or 
the meeting of lovers to gratify their paffions.* 

ALCIPHRON. I wiih, however, that you 
would be more explicit on this interefting 
fubjecl:, and unfold more clearly your ideas of 
the tree, the inftrument of temptation in the 
hiftory of the fall. You would thus perhaps 
throw fome light on the moft ancient fable or 
allegory upon record ; and this, furely, will be 
no digreffion from our purpofe. 

EUGENIUS. Whether or how far the rela 
tion in queftion may be confidered as a 
fable or allegory, we fhall fee afterwards : at 
prefent let us confider it, for a moment, as it 
lies before us, namely, as an ancient, plain. 



record, 



64 ORIENTAL J5lA6GUES. 

record. What do you think is meant by the 
Tree of Knowledge^ or of the knowledge of 
good and evil ? What do thefe words fig- 
nify ? 

ALCIPHRON. The knowledge of good 
and evil, as that phrafe is ufed by the eaftern 
writers, fignifies, if I am not miftaken, the 
ufe of reafon and obfervation ; and it is gene 
rally employed to mark that period of life in 
which the human uriderftanding begins to 
open, operate, and judge : or it may fignify 
the moral fenfe of mankind, their fufceptibi- 
lity of virtuous or vicious character, which is 
called, by fome, their practical underftand- 
ing. 

EUGENIUS. Very well: Thus when a 
perfon arrives at the years of intelligence and 
reflection, he perceives the difference between 
good and evil-, or, in other words, he hath the 
life of reafon. Moreover, when, after having 
examined what is his duty in particular cafes 
and relations, he faithfully performs it, and re- 
fifts the temptations to a contrary conduct, he 
then makes a right ufe of his faculties, and 
wifely diftinguifhes between good and evil. 
4 Again, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 6$ 

Again, finally, as, after tranfgreflion, his con- 
fciencc condemns him and makes him appre 
hend punifhment, he thus receives deeper 
impreflions of the difference between good 
and evil, though not in an agreeable manner. 
Here then you have the whole hiftory of the 
Tree under confideration,and its effential figni- 
fication. God forbad the firft Parents of the hu 
man race to eat the fruit of that Tree : thus they 
acquired the knowledge of a duty^ which they 
could eafily understand, and were, therefore, 
peculiarly obliged to perform. This was the 
firft occafion that was prefented to them for 
the exercife of their underftanding, in diftin- 
guifhing between good and evil. All the 
trees were good ; but of this Tree of Know 
ledge they were forbidden to eat under a 
folemn penalty. The ferpent endeavours to 
weaken the force of this prohibition, by addreff- 
ihg to them a difcourfe of the following kind: 
" Ye are forbidden to eat of this Tree, becaufe 
u its fruit contains the knowledge of good and 
" evil; /. e. communicates a higher degree of 
" knowledge and wifdom than ye already 
c * poffefs : eat of it then, freely, and ye mall 
" thereby be changed from children to men, 
" and from men to Gods or Elobim" This 

F .reafon- 



66" ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

reafoning, concerning the fcnfe and inten 
tion of the Divine command, addreffed in- 
fidioufly to our firft Parents, was the fecond 
fcene of their trial. Finally, however, they 
did eat of the Tree, and confcience was 
awakened and alarmed : they perceived that 
they had tranfgrefied, and they had now a 
view of things which they would have been 
glad to have avoided. This painful view of 
their ftate, was employed by their Creator as 
a mean of leading them to new difcoveries 
and duties. He made their deviation the 
occafion of their tranfition to a new ftate and 
condition of life, and even affifted them in 
finding a fupply of their mod urgent wants, 
and, among others, of clothing : This was 
the third fcene of their trial : Now might 
their Creator fay, " The man is become as 
" one of the Elohim; he hath learned to 
tc know and diftinguiih good and evil." 
Thus we have the whole ftate of the cafe. 
The knowledge of good and evil is, at firft, 
innocent, and, atterwards, in confequence 
of falle reafoning and erroneous conclufions, 
it becomes chargeable with guilt. What do 
you think of this account of the firfl tranf- 
greiiion ? Is it not recommendable for its 
goodfenfe and fimplicity? 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 67 

ALCIPHRON. It might be fo, if the event, 
under consideration, were a fable ; but I 
doubt much of its propriety in an hiftorical 
fad: of high importance, and of fuch awful 
confequence. Millions are fuppofed to have 
derived death from Adam s having ate of this 
apple ; and this at of his was owing to a 
miftake. 

EUGENIUS. This is not the place to confi- 
der the doftrinal or moral conclufions which 
have been deduced from this ftory. We have 
now before us a Narration, which belongs to 
the firft ftate of the human fpecies, the period 
of its infancy, and we muft confider it with 
a proper degree of attention to the fpirit of 
this early period. It may not, therefore, be 
improper to analyfe this Narration, and to con 
fider, diftindtly, the parts of which it is com- 
pofed. It certainly contains the fundamental 
ideas which entered into the creation of 
Oriental poetry. 

ALCIPHRON. I (hall hear, with eagernefs^ 
your difcuffion of this fubjed : It muft be 
interefting. 

F 2 EUGE- 



63 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES; 

EUGENIUS. Obferve then, in the firft 
placej that man has duties to perform 5 this 
is the firft outline of his nature and defti- 
nation. The ferpent, who probably ate of 
the Trie, and thus, by his example, (which 
is the mod powerful kind of language,) ani 
mated the man to eat of it alfo, had no duties 
to bind him. To eat of this fruit was fmful 
in man : in the ferpent it was Innocent 7 
Have you attended to this difference ? 

ALCIPHRON. I recollect, on this ocea* 
fion, that the Orientals divided living crea 
tures into two general claffes ; the firft com 
prehending the inferior animals, which are 
fubjed: to no law : and the fecond, mankind, 
who, as moral beings, are fubject to law, and 
fufceptible of moral obligation. This dif- 
tinftion fets the matter, under confideration, 
in the cleared light. The ferpent, who had 
no other guide than his fenfual inftint and 
appetite, followed the impulfe of his nature, 
and ate of the Tree. But the man acted in 
oppofition to his duty, by following the ex 
ample of an irrational animal, and eating of 
it alfo. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 69 

EUGENIUS. Do you recollect what was re 
marked, in one of our former conferences, with 
refpet to that paffage 5 5n which Adam is repre- 
fented as paffing the animals in review, and 
giving to each fpecies its proper name ? 

ALCIPHRON, I do and he received, no 
doubt, conftderable information, by his liv 
ing in a kind of fociety with the inferior 
animals : but, in the cafe before us, he was 
greatly mifmformed and fadly deceived, 

EUGENIUS. And what was the animal 
appointed by the Creator to be the accidental 
caufe of his firft error, and of the mifappli- 
cation of his faculties of perception and imi 
tation? Was it not the ferpent, whole dif- 
tinctive qualities wtrefagaeify and cunning? 
Thefe qualifies appear in the difcourfe which 
is here attributed to that animal. They were 
the charafters^ and met alfo with the reward, 
of a deceiver* 

ALCIPHRON. The more I reflect upon 
the tenor and moral of this ftory, the more 
it pleafeth me. If I could confider it as a 
Fable ) I fhould think it a charming one. 

? 7 EUGI&gt; 



70 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. With refpedT: to the drapery 
In which it is exhibited, you may confider it 
as fuch. Neverthelefs, it is a Piece^ that has 
been really ated. You will furely find in 
the Fables of JEJbp and Lockman^ many lines 
and ideas, relative to the character and curfe 
of the ferpentine race, which referable thofe 
in the narration before us. 

ALCIPHRON. Of thefe, the Oriental 
Hiftories and. Fables are full. They contain 
many inftances of art and cunning afcribed 
to ferpents, and, among others, the art of 
renewing their youth, which is fuch a darling 
object of human ambition and effort. It 
is faid, that in old age, they recover their 
fight, that they are nimble and expert in 
faving themfelves from impending danger ; 
and, efpecially, in fecuring their heads, in 
which their ftrength and vital powers refide. 
I could mew you a whole lift of (lories, 
which reprefent ferpents as producing fick- 
nefs and reftoring health depriving of their 
ipeech falie fwearers (hutting their cars 
againft the charm of the enchanter; while, 
at the fame time, they lovemufick and follow 

the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 71 

the voice of the Priefts. Stories of this kind 
are often repeated with fuch confidence, that 
we are at a lofs to know what we fhould 
think of them. 

EUGENIUS. Many of them may be, in 
fome manner, connected with the natural 
hiftory of this animal, with which, indeed, 
we are little acquainted. Several of them may 
be no more than the fcattered fragments of 
an ancient tradition, fwelled with new pro 
digies, during the lapfe of ages, in propor 
tion to its diilance from the fountain-head. 
In procefs of time, truths and prodigies are fo 
blended and mixed, that they are equally be 
lieved by the credulous multitude ; and no 
wonder, fince it is well known with what 
dexterity artful priefts, poets, and magicians 
can avail themfelves of a motley tradition to 
eilablifh their authority and promote their 
interefts. It is fufficient for our purpofe to 
know that the ferpent was confidered, 
throughout the Eaft, as a fagacious and fub- 
tile annual, and, that it is a noxious one, 
needs no proof. Ohferve, I beieech you, 
how all thefe lines of character are exprefled 
in the recital now before us : Firft, the fer- 

F 4 pent 



72 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

pent makes a fplendid appearance, and pretends 
to the wifdom of a counfellor and a guide ; 
afterwards it appears as a yile reptile, a con 
temptible deceiver. At firft, it feems to feed 
on immortal fruit, to know the fecret powers 
of Nature, and to be affociated, in fome mea- 
fure, with the Ehhim ; afterwards we find 
him creeping or gliding on his belly, and con 
demned to lick the duft. So far is he from 
being immortal, that man bruifes his head, 
while of man he can only bite the heel. He 
is, at firft, the friend of Eve, whom he 
appears defirpus of exalting to the rank of a 
fuperior being ; afterwards he becomes her 
enemy, and is regarded as the declared enemy 
of the human race. Did you ever hear of 
fuch remarkable and iriftrudtive contradictions 
in the fame animal ? And it is from this con 
temptible reptile, that the chiefs of the human 
race hope to derive knowledge and wifdom ! 
Surely the egregious folly of liilening to the 
counfels and infmuations of fuch a creature, 
H here expofed in the ftrpngeft light. 

ALCIPHRON. But the fcerie is foon 
changed ; for when the deed was done, the 
inan cpnfidered his deceitful guide in the 

lame 



DIALOGUES. 73 

* 

feme point of light as the ferpent appears ia 
the curfe which was inflicted on him. The 
recital affumes a new form ; and even fup- 
pofing that the facl: had never happened, is 
not the recital, confidered merely as a fable, 
a moft inftru&ive reprefentation of the critical 
ftate, the duties and dangers of the unexperi 
enced parents of the human race ? Here, in 
deed, every thing has a language a warning 
voice ; the tree, the ferpent, and the whole 
fcene indicate what, alas! we have learned 
by a painful experience. I now fee how 
fpolifhly men have been torturing their inven 
tion, by idle inquiries about the ferpent, a$^ 
whether in his firft ftate he had feet and 
walked ? Whether he was endowed with 
underftanding fimilar to that of Adam, fo as 
to form ideas of the curfe^ and his degrada 
tion, and fo on ? 

Eu GENIUS. The Jewifh Dodlors have mul 
tiplied queftions, ftill more prepofterous ; 
But let us not lofe our time with their ridicu 
lous fancies, fmce there are inftructive lines 
of the hiflory before us, worthy of illuftra- 
tion. It was the defign of the ferpent to open 
he eyes of our firft Parents by their eating of 

the 



74 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

the forbidden fruit, and thus to make them 
partakers of the wifdom of the Elobim. But 
why and for what purpofe did it deceive them 
by this vain hope ? Do you recoiled what 
we have already faid concerning the* Elobim? 

ALCIPHRON, Your meaning, 1 think, is 
fufficiently clear. They were flattered with 
the hopes of acquiring the penetration and 
knowledge of the Elohim, who were fuppofed 
to behold the fecret powers of nature with an 
enlightened eye, and lay lurking, as it were, 
behind the curtain which concealed thefe 
powers from common obfervation. 

Eu GENIUS. This indeed was a notion 
generally received among the Orientals, who 
were as eager in their purfuits of this kind of 
knowledge as we are in our endeavours to 
find out the Pbitofopbers Jlone. Amazing is 
the multitude of idle ftories and fables which 
have been handed down to us about thefe 
fecret powers of nature, from the earlieft 
times. In one place, this fecret knowledge 
was fuppofed to be contained in a tree elfe- 
where, in certain images, or in the feal of a 
ring, or in a talifman, and, fometirnes it was 

fought 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 7 

fought after in the flight or the finging of 
birds : but it was moft generally attributed to 
invifible fpirlts or Genii ^ which fubfifted on 
the emanations of plants and flowers. Partak 
ing of this food of gods ^ thefe fpirits became 
thereby partakers of their knowledge, of 
which they were fometimes led, by a particu 
lar impulfe, to communicate a portion to 
certain individuals, Thefe ftories feem to 
have had a remarkable influence on the moral 
dottrine of the Orientals, not only with refpecT: 
to its ornaments and allegories, but alfo its 
proverbial maxims and precepts. 

ALCITHRON. With refpect to its pre 
cepts and maxims alfo, do you fay ? 

EUGENIUS. Mod certainly: for in this 
doctrine we find folemn and repeated warn 
ings againft fecret arts and divination. It 
perpetually inculcates the neceffity of care 
fully diftinguifhing between this falfe, this 
pernicious fpecies of pretended fcience, and 
the pure limplicity of true and real wifdom. 
Of this, I think, I could abundantly convince 
you, by producing a multitude of precepts 
and admonitions, in which the fear of God 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

and obedience to his laws are fet in oppofitiGQ 
to the fear of invifible beings, and the en 
chantments of falfe knowledge and pretended 
wifdom. The former are reprefented by the 
Tree of Life ; the latter by \h& forbidden Tree 
of falfe . and pernicious Knowledge. But to 
confine ourfelves to the hiftory now under 
consideration, you feem much inclined to look 
upon it as a fable, if I am not miftaken. 

ALCTPHRON. This I cannot deny. 

EUGENIUS* But we muft then examine 
whether it has the proper characters of a 
fabulous or allegorical Relation, which muft 
be connected and confiflent in its parts, and 
inftruftive in its defign. Now ijf we examine 
the point of hiftory, under confideration, by 
thefe rules, we lhall not find, in its different 
parts, the harmony and confidence that con- 
ftitute a regular and mftruftive apologue. In 
its parts there is manifeftly incoherence, and 
even contradiction, and things which are not 
fufceptible of any moral application. Firft 
we fee death announced to the primitive Pair, 
in cafe they fhoald eat of the forbidden frurt; 
and, nevertheless, this penally did not take 

place? 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

place when they had tranfgrefled ; 
their tranfgreffion is followed by effects of 
a very different nature, which were not com 
prehended in the prohibition* Moreover, 
if you conned with this tree and its fruit the 
acquifition of knowledge and wifdom, as the 
ferpent had predicted, then it is only the 
prediction of the ferpent which feems, in 
fome meafure 3 to have been realized. The 
eyes of our firfl Parents were, in effect, 
opened : they became, as God himfelf faid, 
like unto the Elvbim. Why then had He 
forbidden them to eat of the tree ? And 
what connexion is there between this newly 
acquired wifdom of Elobim^ and the thorns 
and thiftles of the earth, the labours of the 
field, and the pains of child-birth ? Nay, 
farther, Why were thefe new Elohim obliged 
to leave Paradife ? They might have re 
mained there with the brotherhood of Elohim, 
and that with propriety, (as far as we can 
judge,) unlefs the Creator had really appre 
hended, that as they had eaten of the Tree of 
Knowledge, they would alfo eat of the Tree of 
Life, and thus become immortal Elobim } as, 
againft his command, they had afpired to the 

rank 



78 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

rank of wife Elobim. Pray explain, if you 
can, your fuppofed fable* 

ALCIPHRON. That is your bufmefs, and 
to you I leave it. 



EUGENIUS. For my part, I fee no pofii- 
bility of explaining it, if it muft be confidered 
as a. fable. But if we confider it as the narra 
tion of ay^6?, of an inftru&ive event, which 
really happened to the firft Parents of the 
human race, in their primitive ftate of moral 
and intellectual infancy, then every part of 
the narration is clear, and the confequences 
of the event are perfectly natural. Let us 
begin the illuftration of it by that memorable 
circumftance relative to our firft Parents, 
which is mentioned by the facred hiftorian, 
who tells us, that " they were naked^ and 
" were not afhamed" Do you think that 
they could have remained in this ftate ? 
Could they have continued always naked, 
without any feeling of ihame or confufion ? 

ALCIPHRON. Certain enthufiafts have 
anfwered this queftion In the affirmative. 

," Eve, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 79 

" Eve, fav they^ would not have conceived 

" and brought forth as women are now im- 

&lt;c pregnated and delivered : an important 

" change has taken place, in this refpet, in 

" confequence of the entrance of fin, and in 

" order to its punifhment 



," 



EUGENIUS. If this be true, my friend, 
Eve was not formed like the women, of our 
times ; for they, coniidering their bodily 
frame and conftitution, cannot become 
mothers in any other way than that which 
actually takes place ; and the firft bleffing of 
the Creator announces it as the fighal defti- 
nation of the human race, that they ihould 
replenijh or people the earth. The earth was 
certainly made to be peopled, and confe- 
quently to be cultivated; for this Paradife, 
which was placed at the iburces of four rivers, 
could not be equally fertile and productive in 
every place, more efpecially in cold and raw 
climates. Accordingly, the cultivation of the 
earth muft foon have become neceffary : here 
labour was required, with which the fweat 
of mans brow was as naturally connected as 
pain was with child-birth. The one and 
the other were the natural effects of the bodily 
5 conftitution 



&6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

conjlltutidn and fit "nation of the human fpecies. 
In a word, if certain vifionaries cannot point 
out to us another earth, and another race of 
inen, entirely different from thofe we know, 
and to which the bleffing pronounced by" 
God at the creation of man muft evidently 
be applied, we fhall leave them to indulge 
themfelves with their idle dreams of a body of 
glafs for Adam, and of a Paradife under the 
North-Pole, 

ALCIPHRON. You fuppofe then that 
God really formed man for that flate in 
which he is at prefent. 

Eu GENIUS, And who but his Creator 
fhould have formed him for it? God, 
who formed man out of the duft clearly 
forefaw the whole feries of events that 
were to take place with refpedt to 
him and the human race, in all their cir- 
cumftances, connexions, and refults. He 
knew the faculties and propenfities of ftian. 
He knew the powers and defires of the foul, 
whofe Jpirltual nature he had united with a 
-Material fubftance. He knew every error 
and deviation to which it was liable ; and&gt; 

in 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. -8l 

in one word, he knew perfectly that man 
was what he was. To deny this would be 
abfurd, in every point of view ; it would 
betray a total ignorance of our nature, our 
faculties, and the world, of which we are the 
inhabitants. There is no kind of philofophy 
fo hateful, or rather io contemptible, as that 
which employs all its art or artifice to put out 
men s eyes, that they may not fee themfelves. 
Neither the Hebrew Poetry, nor the philo 
fophy - of the New Teftament, know any 
th:ng of this fublime iionfenfe. We find 
neither in the Pfalms, nor in the writings of 
the Prophets, any thing that refembles the 
conclufions, which feveral modern writers, by 
a fanciful philology, or a falfe philofophy, 
have drawn from the hiftorical facl: now be 
fore us. The plain and conftant language 
of Sacred Writ, on this important fubjecr, 
may be comprehended in a few words: 
" Adam finned firft, and we are all iinners 
as he was, and we muft alfo die as he died : 
as Eve was tempted and deceived, fo are 
we alfo tempted and deceived, and thus 
depart from the limplicity of truth and 
" good" Such is the language of Scripture ; 
but it doth not fay, that, in any cf its parts, 



i 



c&lt; 



G " our 



Si ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" our bodily frame is entirely different from 
" that of our firft Parents :" It doth not even 
infmuate that, as foon as Adam finned, his 
nature, as an intelle&ual and moral being, was 
totally degraded and ruined ; and that both he 
and his pofterity through him, were necef- 
farily and unavoidably fubjedted to number- 
lefs and dreadful deviations and perverfions, 
both of underftanding and will. What he 
fuifered, is here clearly defcribed. 

ALCIPHRON. What then did he fufFer? 
And how did his fufferings proceed con- 
fequentially from the prohibition relative to 
the Tree of Knowledge \ 

EUGENIUS. Suppofe that the Tree, from 
which he was commanded to abftain, was, 
though not deadly, yet noxious to his con- 
ilitution : God announces its pernicious in 
fluence by the term death, (of which the man 
could only form a confufed idea, as of fome- 
thing unhappy,) partly to diftinguifh its un 
happy effeds from the benignant influence of 
the Tree of Life, and alfo to terrify our firft 
Parents from eating of it. However, He 
who knoweth all hearts, and all things, and 

even 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 83 

even all contingencies and poflibilities, fore- 
law their weakneis and their tranfgreffion ; 
and, as it would have been unwife to have 
created a race of beings fo little adapted to the 
ftate in which they were deftined to live, that 
they mud perim,even after the firft moments of 
their exiftence ; he placed within their reach 
a Tree, which anfwered his original purpofe 
with refpedt to the human race ; and, at the 
fame time, occafioned a new modification in 
the (late of man, and led our firft Parents, 
in fome meafure, to a change of fcene. 

ALCIPHRON. I don t well underftand 
you. 

EUGENIUS. The fruit of the Tree ex 
cited defires, heated the blood, occafioned 
fear, inquietude, and apprehenfion. Thefe 
feelings were managed by the paternal wif- 
dom of the Creator, to point out to his chil 
dren the confequences of their firft tranfgref 
fion, both with refpecl: to themfelves and 
their deceiver. Thefe confequences he fet 
before them in a manner that was adapted to 
infpire terror. The new ideas excited by 
their tranfgreffion, foreboded to them fcenes 

G 2 Of 



84 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

of life entirely different from thofe which 
they might have expeded in a ftate of obe 
dience. The virgin of Paradife muft, in 
procefs of time, become a mother. She, who 
was hitherto the bride of Adam, muft hence 
forth ,be Eve; i. e. the woman of the cot 
tage, the fervant of the inhabitants of the 
earth, who were to defcend from her. The 
peaceful inhabitant of Paradife, who was 
deftined to pafs only the firft days of his 
youth in this "primitive garden of innocence 
and pleafure, fees now before him active 
fcenes of painful induftry and labour; which, 
however, belong to his true and eflential de- 
ftination. Finally, the awful word death 
was pronounced, and he was prepared for 
this general lot of humanity in the mildeft 
manner. In fine, his firft tranfgreffion be 
came, by the providential arrangement of his 
God and Father, a paternal meafure for fix 
ing his ftate and deftination, and even his 
punifhment, (how can the beft of Beings 
punifh otherwife?) a new bleffing, though 
accompanied with no fmall mixture of for- 
row and pain. It was neceflary that the firft 
man ihould have the door of his cottage 
opened, and it was to be opened by his own 
error. I hope you now underftand me ? 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 85 

ALCIPHRON. Perfetly well; and by 
this manner of explaining the -event under 
confederation, it acquires indeed a new 
afped! : every thing appears natural, and 
there is nothing in the relation fuperfluous or 
ufelefs. Even in the manner in which the 
punifliment is decreed and announced., every 
thing is paternal and indulgent. It appears 
to me as the anticipated abridgement of the 
Natural Hiftory of the Human Race. The 
father lets his child fall in the gentleft man 
ner : It is the child himfelf that plucks 
the apple, the inftrument of his approaching 
pains and labours : He is, by the inward 
fenfe of his mind, led to attribute to himfelf 
only his exclufion fiom Paradife, in which 
he neither could, nor was deftined to 
abide always. The man, by lofing fight of 
his dependance, withdrew from his Father s 
houfe : Now he may become his own mailer 
and take care of himfelf. 

EUGENIUS. Do you fee nothing more in 
this hiftory no line of conformity with 
our adual fituation ? 

G 3 ALCI- 



86 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. Yes; in confidering the 
objet farther, and comparatively, I think I 
do ; for we live in a fimilar ftate, and in 
fimilar circumftances, mutatis mutandis^ with 
our firft Parent. We fin alfo like Adam, 
and like him we are punimed ; that is, led to 
a condition, accompanied with unavoidable 
pains and hardfhips. 

EUGENIUS. And do you find in this hif- 
tory no illuftration with refpect to the preciie 
nature of fin or moral evil ? 

ALCIPHRON. I do fee here indeed the 
true nature of fin represented, with perfect 
precifion, as a departure from Simplicity and 
reditude, in confequence of inconfiftent 
views and ftrong impreffions from external 
objects, which intoxicate the fenfes or cloud 
the underftanding. In every human being 
there is a law which commands and forbids, 
whether it -comes from the inward tribunal 
of confcience, or the pofitive appointment 
of fuperior authority. &ferpent&gt; at the fame 
time, which either feduceth or feeketh to 
feduce, is always at hand ; that is to fay, the 

pleafures 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 87 

pleafures of fenfe, or falfe ideas of happinefs, 
or both thefe united. The confequences of- 
tranfgreffion are likewife the fame ; and I 
hope, from the goodnefs of our merciful God 
and Father, that the punifhments which he 
inflicts on his erring creatures, will alfo have 
one general tendency ; and, in the iflue of 
things, prove paternal benefits and gracious 
arrangements to lead us, though it may be 
fometimes through painful paths, to true 
felicity. 

Thus, then, my friend, you fee the field 
of trial and conteft that is opened to the hu 
man race on all its fides ; iirft, Nature, Para- 
dife, love, innocence, dominion over the 
inferior creatures ; every thing, in a word, 
which is adapted to make pleafing impref- 
fions on the youthful imagination. In the 
midft of this delightful fcene ftands the Tree 
of Obedience, the great object of the Moral 
Poetry of the Eaft, in which all true enjoy 
ment and happinefs are centered. On the 
other hand, with the eating of the forbidden 
fruit all the evils incident to humanity be 
gin to afflit the earth ; fuch as labour, fer- 
G 4 vitude,.. 



8S ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

vitude, pain, ficknefs, and death, of which 
we find fo many affecting defcriptions in the 
Book of Job and the Pfalms. The fhort 
narrative before us contains an immenfc 
fund of knowledge and wifdom. Compared 
with it, the Apologue of Prometheus and 
Pandora is but a poor and barren allegory. 
But before we quit this fubject, I muft afk 
you. Whether you do not perceive in this hif- 
tory another circumftance which is highly 
poetical? 

ALCIPHRON. I fuppofe you mean the 
Cherubim, with the JJaming Jw } or *d. But thefe 
were thundering Jiccds or war-horfes. 

EUGENIUS. Thundering-fteeds at this 
early period ! How very improbable would 
this render the poem ? And how can fuch a 
notion be entertained, when it is confidered, 
that all the reft of the narration is perfectly 
confiftent with the nature and character of the 
time ? Had Adam any knowledge of war- 
horfes ? From whence could he derive fuch 
an idea ? And what relation hath fuch an 
objedt to the fcene now before us ? 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 89 

ALCIPHRON. Your queftions, I own&gt; 
puzile me ; and, neverthelefs, in the Hebrew 
Poetry Cherubim always fignities thundering 
Jlecds. 

f 

EUGF.NIUS. No fuch thing; I do not recoi 
led! a fmgle paffage where the term has even 
the appearance of bearing that fignification. 
By a prophet indeed of later times we find 
horfes mentioned in awful fcenes of God s ap 
pearance poetically defcribed ; but thefe were 
not Cherubim. The Lord appears in his war- 
chariot, to which, no doubt, horfes belong, 
but he doth not thunder. " He ftandeth and 
" meafureth the land : before him goeth the 
" peftilence : birds of prey fall at his feet : he 
" beholdeth and driveth afunder the nations, 
" and the everlafting hills are fcattered : now 
" he draws his bow : the mountains fee him 
" and tremble : the fun and moon ftand ftill 
" in their habitations : he walks through the 
45 fea with his horfes, through the heap of 
" great waters*." In this fublirne defcrip- 
tion, we lee nothing about thundering Jlecds 
or Cherubim. 

* Habakkuk,ni. p^ffim. 

ALC i- 



90 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. The Greeks, however, 
give thundering Jleeds to their Jupiter; and 
we find them magnificently defcribed by 
Virgil. 

EUGENIUS. And what then ? Is Jupiter 
Jehovah ? Is Virgil a Hebrew Bard ? The 
Peruvians confider thunder as the rattling 
noife of a veflel, which the beautiful rain- 
goddefs holds in her hand ; her brother 
knocks it to pieces, upon which the thunder 
roars, and the rain falls. This is the mytho 
logy of the Peruvians ; but how foolifh would 
it be to illuftrate, by this mythology, the 
poetry of the Hebrews ? And in this refpect 
the Greeks have no privilege above the Peru 
vians, But after all, is there nothing to be 
learned with refpedt to the Cherubim^ from 
the Hebrew Poets ? Are they not defcribed 
to us plainly and pofitively as works of art ? 

ALCIPHRON. We have only to examine 
the paffages in which they are mentioned. 
And here we are firft to confider the form 
under which they are reprefented, above the 
ark of the teftimony *. 

* Exod. xxv. 17, &c. -xxxvL 8. and 35, 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. gi 

Eu GEN i us. There they appear with wings 
and faces, as looking down upon the ark, and 
overfliadowing, with their wings, the mcrcy- 
feat : and it is probable that they were re- 
prefented in the fame manner on the ta- 
peftry. In the temple of Solomon they ap 
pear alfo under fimilar forms, but on a 
larger fcale and with greater magnificence*. 

ALCIPHRON. We cannot conclude much 
from thefe defcriptions : for faces and wings 
may have a great diverfity of forms. 

EUGENIUS. We rauft then have recourfe 
to the temple of Ezekielf. In his defcrip- 
tion the Cherubim have two faces, one of a 
man, the other of a lion ; no mention at all 
of horfes. They even appear to the prophet 
in the clouds J. One cherub holds out the 
hand of a man, which grafps fire. The 
vifion appears twice, and is illuftrated by 
comparifon. Each animal hath four faces, 
that of an ox, a man, a lion, and an eagle, 

according to the fide on which it is feen, 
** 

* See i Kings, vi. 23. 2 Chron. iii. 7., where the de- 
fcription of Exodus, is repeated. 

f Ezek, xli. 1 8. f Ibid. x. 14. 

Thefe 



92 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Thefe four faces appeared alfo to St. John in 
a vifion, with this difference only, that they 
did not all belong to one animal. 

ALCIPHRON. What then ? 

EUGENIUS. Two conclufions may be 
evidently drawn from hence : Jirft, that the 
Cherubim was a compound of different ani 
mal figures : and, fecondly^ that there was no 
figure of a horfe among them. 

ALCIPHRON. Are there no more paffages 
relative to this fubjeft ? 

EUGENIUS. There is one which I think 
decifive : the proud King of Tyre is called by 
Ezekiel a cberui*, who had dwelt in Eden, 
in the garden of the Elohim, on the holy 
mount, and had walked there up and doison 
amidjl the Jiones of jire. This emblematical 
picture was defigned to exprefs, in the moft 
lively and brilliant manner, the power of this 
monarch, and the pride and luftre of his royal 
ftaie. All the fplendor of the onyx, the fap- 

* Ezek. x. 14. !. 10, &c. 

phi re, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 93 

phire, the diamond /and other precious ftones, 
fhone forth in his robes, and he -was made per 
fect in his ways from the day in &lt;whicb he was 
created*. Now do you know what kinds or 
forms of animals were employed in the earli- 
eft times, and particularly among the Ori 
entals, as emblems and marks of proud pomp 
and magnificence ? Precifely the four ani 
mals of whofe forms the Cherubim was com- 
pofed, the lion, the ox, the man, and the 
eagle. You may probably have heard of the fol 
lowing apophthegm of the Hebrews ; " There 
are four fuperb creatures in the world, the 
lion among the wild beads, the ox among 
the tame, the eagle among the birds, and 
the man, who furpafleth them all." 



ALCIPHRON. But this proverbial faying 
is not decifive with refpeft to the earlieft 
times ; becaufe the parts, of which the che 
rubim was compofed, feem to have under 
gone feveral variations 

EUGENIUS. This happens to all works of 
art, more efpecially to their ornamental parts, 



* Ezekiel, xxviii. 12, c, 

in 



94 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

in which invention or unexpected incidents in 
troduced variations. Neverthelefs the original 
fpirit of the compofition remains amidft thefe 
changes; and in the cafe, under confidera- 
tion, the time is fo marked that it cannot be 
miftaken : for Ezekiel brings his Tyrian 
monarch to the very place where the oldeft 
Cherubim ftood, on the mountain of God, in 
Paradife, and reprefents him as a fplendid, 
awful, and pompous form. He probably 
borrowed thefe characters and images from 
the idea of his royal ftate and fplendor, and 
alfo from the received notion of the Cherubim 
as brilliant and awful forms, which guarded 
the way to the Tree of Lift. This defcrip- 
tion of Ezekiel, combined with other Eaftern 
traditions, give us, I think, a fufficient idea 
of thefe extraordinary compofitions, without 
our having recourfe to your thundering fteeds 
to illuftrate the fubjeft. 

ALCIPHRON. What other Eaftern tradi 
tions do you mean ? 

EUGENIUS. Have you never heard of a 
fabulous animal, which is fuppofed to have 
lived on the mountains of the ancient world, 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 95 

and even in the very region where Paradife is 
placed by our hiftory, and which is laid alfo 
to have been the guardian of precious trea- 
fures in the earlieft periods of our globe ? 

* 

ALCIPHRON. You mean I fuppofe, the 
dragon, or griffin, which was the keeper of 
the famous golden apples ? 

EUGENIUS. No ; that is the tradition of 
later times, and of the Northern nations. 
The people of the Eaft ipeak of a wariged 
animal whofe dwelling is on the mountain 
called Kaf, and which is faid to have had 
violent combats with the giants of the ancient 
world. This animal, according to their ac 
count, is diftinguifhed by its knowledge and 
piety, fpeaks all languages, has the wifdom 
of the fphinx, and the cunning of the griffin, 
guards the road which leads to the treafures 
of Paradife, and is a prodigy among the 
works of God, which can neither be enihared 
by art, nor fubdued by force. *T\\& fphinx of 
the Egyptians, the dragon of the Greeks, and 
the griffin of the Northern nations, were all, 
undoubtedly, one and the fame creature, 
though differently defcribed and character- 

i ized 



96 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ized according to the particular notions of 
different countries and different times. You 
will eafily perceive that all the later traditions 
concerning certain guards, which were ported 
at the gates or entrance of Paradife, to keep 
the Tree of Immortality, as alfo the finning, 
terrific forms on the facred mountain, and the 
faming fword moving upwards and down 
wards, and to right and left, agree well with 
the defcription which Ezekiel gives of his 
Cherubim. All this has been embelli(hed from 
time to time, by every nation, both in poetry 
and profe ; nay, it has even been augmented 
by new fables*. It is enough for our purpofe 
to confider the hiftory of the Cherubim, as 
it ftands in the progrefs of the Hebrew 
Poetry. At firft, they appear as guardians 
and defenders with their flaming fwords, and 
not a.s deftroyers, as ibme have abfurdly ima 
gined. We find them again in the tabernacle 
ofMofes, and he, perhaps, perceiving a con- 
fiderable refembiance between them and the 
iphinxes, placed them in conformity with the 
Egyptian manner, over the ark of the tejli- 

See the Fables of Simorganka, Sobam, and other animal 
productions of func-y in BOCHART, HERBELOT, and a multi 
tude of Oriental Poems. 

mony. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 97 

mony. From the ark, they were afterwards 
tranfported to the clouds, where they were 
feen in a vifion, and thus the glory of the 
Lord, or Jhekinah^ which had refted upon 
them in the ark, came alfo upon them here. 
Thus they became a poetical image among the 
Hebrews ; and, finally, a prophetic vifion. 
The tranfition of the Cherubim from a piece 
of carved work over the ark of the teftimony, 
to a Cherubim in the clouds, a Being which 
bears the throne of Jehovah, is clearly notified 
by that expreffion of the prophet, " God 
44 whofe throne is between the cherubims ; j 
and this is a reprefentation of the glory of the 
Lord which we find in the books of Samuel*. 
No fooner was this representation tranfported 
to the clouds, than the bold imagination of 
the poers took the liberty to employ it in their 
picturefque defcriptions of the heavenly 
world, and David feems to have been the firft 
who combined all the parts of this pompous 
imagery, and employed them in the fervice cf 
the temple "f. Now you will eafily perceive 
that his Cherubim is fo far from having any 

* i Samuel, iv. 4, 2 Samuel, vi*. 2. 
f Pfalm xviii. 2, c. 

H refem- 



98 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

refemblance of thundering fteeds, that the 
pafiage in the Pfalms, in which they are 
alluded to, is rather adapted to baniih fuch 
an idea, if there were any other that feemed 
to favour it. For the cherub of David is a 
winged animal, on which God is fuppofed to 
fly ; it ftands in the parallelifm over againft 
the wings of the wind, and thunder and 
lightning are introduced into this fplendid and 
magnificent imagery. Let me recall to your 
memory fome of the lines of this fublime 
pidure : " I cried unto the Lord in my 
" diftrefs, and he heard my voice out of his 
* c temple : He bowed alfo the heavens and 
" came down, and darloiefs was under his 
" feet : He fat upon a cherub and did fly ; He 
c did fly upon the wings of the ftorm s." The 
God whom we find reprefented, even in the 
time of Ifaiah*, as fitting above the Cherubim, vtzs 
nothing more than an ancient Mofaic expref- 
fion, which is repeated in the books of Samuel 
and the Pfalms. When God appeared to 
Ifaiah, there was no Cherubim in the defcrip- 
tion which the Prophet makes of this appear 
ance *j". In after-times and out of Judea, 

Haiali, xxx vii. 16, f Ifaiah, vi, i 8. 

among 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 99 

among the captives on the banks of the river 
Cbcbar^ this poetical tablature of Ifaiah became 
a prophetic vifion, and the Cherubim fhone 
forth in a full blaze of glory*. But it was 
not a thunder-chariot that they drew : they 
bore the throne of the glory of the Lord ; and 
there appeared over them as it were zfappbirc 
Jlone ; /. &lt;?. a clear and lucid firmament, and 
like a rainbow in the clouds, was the luftre 
that fpread itfelf around them. This is a fub- 
lime, fplendid, and beautiful defcription, but 
nothing that prefents an idea of a thunder- 
chariot, or fteeds of war. 

ALCIPHRON. Thus your Cherubim have 
three periods in their hiftory : Firft they are 
carved works in the temple afterwards, 
images in the clouds ; and, finally, a pro 
phetic vifion. 

EUGENIUS. You muft add to this account 
another circumftance, and an erTential one ; 
which is, that they had a place in the tradi 
tion concerning Paradife. This, my friend, 
is the circumftance on which all the notices 

* Ezekiel, i. and x. 

H 2 we 



--; 

106 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

we have of them are founded. If in the primi 
tive hiftory of Paradife they had not beenmeji- 
tioned as living creatures, Mofes would never 
have thought of reprefenting them as he did 
over the ark of the tejlimony, nor would they 
ever have been tranfported from thence to the 
clouds, nor have finally become a prophetic 
vifion. You muft however eafily conceive, 
that in procefs of time, and confidering the 
different occafions on which the Cherubim 
were employed, changes muft have naturally 
been introduced in the imagery by which 
they were reprefented. In the moft ancient 
record, it was an awful, and extraordinary 
work ofGod-*-\n the tabernacle, a lifelefs^n?- 
duftlon of human art in the Pfalms, a work of 
poetical fancy ; and, finally, in prophetic 
vifion, a living, a celeftial creature, which 
bears the Jheklnah or the glory of the Lord. 
The prophet Ezekiel announces, plainly, 
thefe variations in the appearances of the Che 
rubim. He defcribes in a lively and fublime 
manner, their appearance in heaven with 
their four forms and faces. In his temple he 
reprefents them with only two animal-faces, 
to avoid, perhaps, any thing that might have 
a tendency to occafion or encourage idolatry 5 

and, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. IOI 

and, for thefe or other reafcns, the rcprefent- 
ation of the Cherubim, in the tabernacle of 
Mofes, was remarkable for its fimplicity. 

ALCIPHRON. The permanent and predo 
minant idea of the Cherubim was, confe- 
quently, that of an extraordinary production ; 
a combination of various kinds of animals? 

EUGENIUS. Undoubtedly : the defcrip- 
tion which Jofephus gives of their nature, 
from the tradition of his time, reprefents them 
as winged living animals*, of a form and 
afpedt different from every thing that had 
been feen by men ; as an afTemblage of the 
great, the terrible, and the ivonderfuL It is, 
however, -manifeft that they bore fome re- 
femblance of the eagle, the bull, the man, and 
the lion, as far as the poets could paint, or 
the artifls execute thefe fubjeds. The Che^ 
rubim of the ark were alfo known more or lefs 
to the Arabians by their traditions : they 
were known to them as winged creatures in 
fomething like the human form, with eyes 
that darted flame, and which, in time of war, 



H had 



IO2 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

had raifed deftmUve ftorms againft their ene 
mies : a fiction which, probably, derived 
its origin from events recorded in fcripture- 
hiflory. 

ALCIPHRON. But \vhat was it, in your 
opinion, that gave rife to the mod ancient 
mythology, I mean, that of the Cherubim at 
the gate of Paradife ? 

EUGENIUS. Of this a tradition univerfally 
fpread gives a probable account. That thefe 
Cherubim were guards placed on the way to 
the Tree of Life , to the garden of the Hefpe- 
rides, is a fat recorded without, any variation. 
We learn, moreover, from the prophet 
Ezekiel, that the Cherubim of the Orientals 
were encamped on a mountain ; and the 
current relations of eaftern writers confirm 
the fat. They all reprefent the Cherubim 
as placed on a high hill, in one of the remoteft 
parts of Afia, behind which Paradife is fup- 
pofed to lie, nearly where it is placed by 
Mofes. Do you know no other hiftory or 
mythology in which mention is made of a 
mountain of God, remarkable for its fplendor 
and beauty ? 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. No I do not recoiled: 
any. 

Eu GEN i us. Such a mountain is never- 
thelefs believed to exift, by all the Raftern 
nations from Tibet to the Red fea. They 
entertain the notion of a mountain on which 
gods, guardians, Elobim, demons, and holy 
men, have their refidence ; and fome tradi 
tions mingled with thole of the Hebrews, 
place this mountain in the north, where pro 
bably the monarch was, in whole mouth (to 
cover his pride with derifion) the Prophet 
Ifaiah puts the following words* ; 

" I will afcend into heaven, 

&lt;f I will exalt my throne above the ilars of God ; 

" I will fit alfo on the mount of God s council, 

" In the fides of the north." 

This mythology could not take place among 
the Hebrews, becaufe they confidered only 
Sinai and Sion as the mountains of God ; and 
you know with what elevation and ardour of 
expreffion Ifaiah fpeaks of mount Sion, and 
exalts it above all the mountains in the world. 

* Ifaiah, xiv. 13. 

H 4 In 



104 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

In the difcourfe of Elihu, God comes forth as 
the midnight^ fhining with the fplendor of 
gold, and he departs from the affembly of the 
faints, as he marched before the Hebrews 
from mount Sinai. Perhaps this midnight- 
mountain was the hill of the Cherubim, on 
which, in Ezekiel, we fee the king of Tyre 
walking amldfl Jlones ofjire before the garden 
of God. 

ALCIPHRON. And what gave rife to the 
firft idea of Cherubim on this jQiining 
mount ? 

EUGENIUS. In its origin it was certainly as 
plain a ftory, as the account we have of Para- 
dife itfelf. The firft Parents of the human 
race were banifhed from thence ; and there 
was, probably, a high mountain between 
them and their firft happy refidence. This 
mountain may have been full of animal-forms, 
of which the wearied travellers who attempted 
to pafs over it may have given terrifying 
accounts. Thunder-clouds may have been 
frequently fufpended over the fummit of the 
mountain, and fubterraneous fires may, from 
time to time, have iffued from its bowels; 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 105 

and thefe irruptions might naturally enough 
explain the origin of \hzflamingfword which 
waved in different directions before the en 
trance of Paradiie. In fhort, all thefe proba 
ble or poffible circumftances, combined with 
the fucceffive relations of travellers, might 
eafily terminate in a marvellous animal of fa 
bulous compofiticn. Nor would it be unrea- 
fonable even to fuppofe, that the two un 
happy exiles from Paradife, when they looked 
behind them towards the peaceful region from 
which they had been banifhed, might per 
ceive wandering meteors and wild beafts, 
which made deep impreffions on their gloomy 
imagination. Thefe impreffions may have 
been communicated to their defcendants, and 
being afterwards renewed by the fight of the 
mountain, and aflbciated with the reports of 
pilgrims, and the defcriptions of poets, may 
have given rife to the fanciful creation of a 
wonderful being or figure, defigned to repre- 
fent the Divine Power and Majefty. How 
ever this may have been, it is totally abfurd 
to imagine that Adam and Eve were driven 
out of Paradife by a Cherub, as painters have 
delineated, and poets have fung the difmal 
ftory. God himfelf led them out of that de 
lightful 



ic6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

H^htful abode, and the Cherubim were ap 
pointed as guards of the place. 

ALCIPHRON. But what are we then to 
think of the cafe of Elijah ? Was not he 
carried up to heaven by horfes of fire, and 
in a fiery chariot ? 

Eu GENIUS. Elijah s triumph was of a 
military kind : we lee in it no mythological 
thunder- chariot, and nothing that has any 
relation to the Cherubim : nor did Elilha con- 
fider it as having any connexion with it. 
Ke faw the fublime fpectacle, and cried out, 
" My father , my father I the chariot of If rael 
and the horfemen thereof*" A fimilar manner 
of reprefenting the Divine Majefly we find in 
the fublime Pfahn where the chariots of the 
Lord are reprefented as " thoufands of 
thoufands," and God is defcribed as going 
forth before his people to fubdue their ene 
mies, and put them in pofleffion of the pro- 
mifed land. On this occafion the mountains 
tremble on their foundations, and kings be 
take themfelves to flight, before the prefence 



of the Moft High. 



2 Kings, ii. 12, 

ALCI- 



ORIENTA-L DIALOGUES. lOJ 

Rut fince you have taken 
from me the thundering fteeds, what other 
figure or defcripticn can you furnifn me 
with, to characterize the thunder ? 

ETJCENTUS. It is (when employed in 
defcribing the awTttl manifefhitions of God s 
power and juftice) the voice of the offended 
and chaftizing -Father, This is an image in 
telligible even to children, and it is prefented 
to us in this fame Mftory of Paradiie. \Ve 
are told, that our fi rft Parents after they had 
tranfgrefled and their eyes were opened, 
" heard the VOICE of JEHOVAH walking in 
" the garden in the cool of the day." Now 
it is highly probable, that on this occafion, 
thunder was heard, and by this coincidence, 
became afterwards a poetical image in the 
Hebrew Poetry, expreffive of the majefty of 
divine Juilice. This expontion of the hiftory of 
the Cherubim, feems to me conformable to the 
account we have of it in the book of Genefis. 
We cannot well expect any thing more clear 
and fatisfaclory from a mythological view of 
fuch ancient poetical compofitions. Read and 
compare with one another the pieces relative 

to 



I08 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

to this fubjecl*, and they will remove all 
your doubts. A noble aflemblage of enigma 
tical beings bear the fymbol of the heavens, 
on which the throne of God refts : and how 
could that throne be (figuratively) fupported 
with more propriety than by the emblems of 
all that is elevated, beautiful, and terrible upon 
earth, connected with the idea of incompre- 
henfible, inacceffible, myflerious knowledge 
and wifdom ? 

* See the Appendix to this Dialogue, 

"* - &gt; i-;" v 



/ 



APPENDIX 



TO THE 



SECOND DIALOGUE. 



No. I. 

EZEKIEL S Vlfion of the CHERUBIM. 

CHAPTER I. 

Ver. 4. And I looked, and, behold, a whirlwind 
came out of the north *, a great cloud and a fire 
infolding itfelf, and a brightnefs was about it, and 
out of the midft thereof as the colour of amber ; out 
of the midft of the fire. 

5. Alfo out of the midft thereof came the likenefs 
of four living creatures. And this was their appear 
ance , they had the likenefs of a man. 



* Compare this with Job, xxxvii. 22. It may alfo be com 
pared with, and ill uft rated by, Ifaiab, xiv. 13. and Ezekiel, 
xxviii. 14. In the Vifion of Zechariah, vi. I 8. the horfee 
after going round the world, return to the north : that is the 
place of their home. 

6. And 



no ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

6. And every one had four faces ; and every one 
had four wing?. 

7. And their feet were ftraight feet; and the fole 
of their feet was iike the fole of a calf s foot*: and 
they fparkled like the colour of burnifhed brafs. 

8. And they had the hands of a man under their 
wings on their four fides ; and they four had their 
faces and their wings. 

9. Their wings were joined one to another; they 
turned not when they went; they went every one 
flraight forward j-. 

10. As for the likenefs of their faces, they four 
had the face of a rmn and the face of a lion on the 
right fide ; and the (ace of an ox J on the left fide -, 
they had alfo the face of an eagle. 

n. Thus were their faces : and their wings were 
ft retched upwards ; two wings of every one were 
joined one to another, and two covered their 
bo dies . And they went every one ftraight for 
ward i and they turned not when they went. 

13. As for the likenefs of the living creatures, their 
appearance was as burning coals of fire : and the 

* It m ay be obferved here, that the refemblance between 
the Cherubim and the Egyptian Sphinx was remarkable. 

f This was a fymbo? of the omniprefence of God s throne, 
and of its perpetual and ever progrefiive motion. 

J What Ezekiel calls Here the face of an ox, is expreffed 
by the word cherub, chap. x. 14. 

This cowing of their bodies is taken from the Vifion of 
Ifaiah, chap. vi. 2 . It is an emblem of their unworthinefs to 

8 



APPENDIX. Ill 

fire was bright, and out of the fire went forth li.^ht- 



mng. 



14. And the living creatures ran and returned as 
the appearance of a flafn of lightning, 

22. And the likencfs of the firmament upon the 
heads of the living creatures, was as the colour of 
the terrible chryftal flretched forth over their heads 
above. 

23. And under the firmament were their vvin^s 
ftraight, the one towards the other: every one had 
two, which covered on this fide, and every one had 
two which covered on that fide their bodies, 

24. And when they went. I heard the noife of their 
wings, like the noife of great waters, as the voice 
of the Almighty, the voice of fpeech as the voice of 
an hoft ; when they flood they let clown their 
wings. 

2c. And there was a voice from the firmament, 
that was over their heads, when they Rood and had 
let down their winps. 

O 

26. And above the firmament, that was over their 
heads, was the likenefs of a throne, as the appear 
ance of a fapphire-ftone, and upon the throne was 
the likenefs, as the appearance of a man upon it. 

27. And I faw as the colour of amber, as the ap 
pearance of fire round about him, from his loins 
even upwards ; and from his loins even downward : 
I faw, as it were, the appearance of fire, and it had 



brightnefs round about. 



2$. AS 



112 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

28. As the appearance of the bow that is in the 
cloud in the day of rain, fo was the appearance of 
the brightnefs round about. This was the appear 
ance of the glory of Jehovah ! And when I faw 
it I fell upon my face, and I heard a voice of one 
that fpake : 6rc. &c. 



APPENDIX. .1T3 

No. II. 

Lamentation on the Fall of the Kmc of TYRE, 
under the Symbol of a CHERUB*. 

EZEK i EL, xxviii. 12, &c. 

Son of man ! take up a Lamentation upon the King 

of Tyrus, and fay unto him, Thus faith the Lord ! 

" Thou fealeft up the fum full of wifdom, and per- 

" fet in beauty. 

" Thou haft been in Eden the garden of God. 
4&lt; Every precious {tone was thy covering ; 
" The Ruby, the Topaz, the Beryl, the Diamond, the 

" Onyx, and the Jafper, and the Sapphire, the 

" Emerald, the Carbuncle , and Gold. 
" The workmanship of thy tabrets was prepared in 

" thee. 
" Thou art the anointed CHERUB that covereth 

" Eden, and I have fet thee fo. 
{t Thou waft upon the Holy Mountain of God ; there 

" thou haft walked up and down in the midft of 

" the ftones of fire ; and thou waft perfect in thy 



* This piece of poetry is the fequel of the beautiful 
Lamentation over the arrogant folly and the humiliating cata- 
ftroplie of the King of Babel, which we find in Ifaiah, chap. 
xiv. 12, c. We place it here on account of the defcriptiou 
of the cherubim, which Ezekiel, according to his ufual manner 
of painting figures, reprefents circumftantially. 

f I know not whether thefe Jlones have any connexion 
with the flaming fword of paradife, which turned every way. 
We have not, as yet, records or traditious fufficient to illuilratc 
the biftory of this Holy Mountain,, 

I " ways, 



14 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES- 

&lt; e ways, from the day that thou waft created, till 
" iniquity was found in thee.-^By the multitude of 
" thy merchandize, they have filled the midft of 
* c thee with violence ; therefore I will cad thee 
** as prophane, out of the mountain of God (Elo- 
** him !), and I will deftroy thee O covering (or 
ff extended) cherub, from the midft of the (tones 
* of fire. Thy heart was lifted up b ecaufe of thy 
" beauty (or ornaments). 

&lt;* Thou haft corrupted thy wifdom by reafon of thy 
" brightnefs , 

&lt;&lt; I will caft thee to the ground^ 

&lt;f I will lay thee before Kings, 

" That they may behold thee. 

" Thou haft defiled the ornaments of thy fantuaries 
&lt;s by the multitude of thine iniquities by the 
" iniquity of thy traffick ; 

" Therefore will I tyring forth a fire from the midft 
" of thee ; 

" It (hall devour thee ; 

f And I will bring thee to aflies, in the fight of all 
" them that behold thee ; 

&lt; c All they that know thee among the people, (haU 
" ftand aftonimed at thee ; 

&lt; Thou wert the pride and terror of the earth \ 

1* And never {halt thou be any more," 






APPENDIX. 



No. III. 

A Piflurefque and Mythological Defcriftion of . 

Thunder. 
From the xviiith PSALM. 

" The forrows of death compafled me, 

" And the floods of Belial made me tremble ; 

" The forrows of Hell (Ades), compafled me about 

*&lt; The fnares of death prevented me. 

In my diftrefs I called upon the Lord, and cried 

" unto my God he heard my voice out of his 

" temple ; and my cry came before him even to- 

(&lt; his ears. 

" Then the earth (hook and trembled : 
" The foundations alfo of the hills moved, and were 

" (haken, becaufe HE (Jehovah) was wroth. 
" Then went up a mift out of His noftrils ; and fire 

" out of His mouth, devoured : 
&lt;c Coals were kindled by it. 
*&lt; HE bowed the heavens alfo and came down : 
And darknefs was under his feet. 
" He rode upon a cherub and did fly: 
" He did fly on the wings of the wind ! 
" He made darknefs his fecret place, 
" His pavilion round about him, were dark water* 

c&lt; and thick clouds of the fky. 
" At the brightnefs that was before him, 
" His thick clouds pafied hailftones and clouds of 

" fire. 

cc The Lord alfo thundered in the heaven : 
" The Higheft gave his voice hail&oaed and coals of 
" fire. 

12 He 



Il6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" He fent out his arrows and fcattered them, 

" And he (hot out lightnings and difcomfited them* 

Then the abyfs of the waters was opened, 

" And the foundations of the earth were difcovered 

At thy rebuke O Lord, 

At the blaft of the breath of thy noftrils. 

" He fent from above He took me 

c&lt; He drew me out of many waters, 

He delivered me from my ftrong enemy, &c." 



APPENDIX. 

No. IV. 
The Voice #/* JEHOVAH. 

PSALM xxix. 

" Give glory unto the Lord O ye mighty, 

Give unto the Lord the glory due to his name. 

" The voice of the Lord is upon the waters 

The glory of the Lord thundereth, 
" The voice of the Lord is powerful : 
f The voice of the Lord is full of majefty, &c." 



DIALOGUE in. 

Night and twilight The region of the un 
born Job s description of ancient night 
Whether the Orientals had the Idea of a 
Chaos ? Their Ideas of the primitive ftate 
of the earth The nofturnal breath or f pint 
on the fur face of the water The origin of the 
confederation of f pint ^ as perceivable by the 

fcnfes The voice of a nocturnal fplrlt In 
Job The af cent of the morning light ^ and 
the joy which It dlffufes Beautiful Images 
of It In the Oriental poetry ~P erf o?iificatlons 
of light and of the dawn Poetical images of 
the jlrmament confidered as a watery vault ^ 
as a magazine of provljlons^ as a fapphlre 
covering, as the pavilion of the unlverfal 
Parent. The poetical cofmogony of the Ori 
entals Its conformity with the hlflory of our 
earth The lives of the plants, an Inter eftlng 
object In the poetry of the Hebrews Why the 
Hebrews addreffed no hymns to the fun, moon, 
or other luminaries ? Perfonlficatlons, 
their beauty, truth ^ and propriety , in the 
J 4 Hebrew 



Hebrew poetry The Jlars reprefented as 
angels^ as daughters of GW, as an armed 
bojl, as a flock of Jheep belonging to the 
GREAT SHEPHERD, Of the fympathy of the 
Oriental Bards with the brute-animals in their 
enjoyments and fufferings- David s view of 
creation in afublime hymn* x c 



DIALOGUE III. 

THE following day ALCIPHRON was 
punctual to his engagement to pafs a poetical 
morning with his friend ; he met him at the 
appointed place, and EUGENIUS began the 
converfation in the following manner ; 

I fhall {hew you to day, my friend, a pic- 
turefque compofition, much richer than the 
Table of Cebes ; for inftead of confining our- 
felves, as we did yefterday, to particular ob 
jects feparately confidered, we fhall have occa- 
fion to take an extenfive and connected view 
of things. When you fee that immenfe dark- 
coloured veil before us, in which all beings 
feem to be fhut up, as if they were waiting 
for the light, does it recall nothing remark- 
afele to your thoughts ? 

ALCIPHRON. You mean perhaps, the 
fate of the dead in the Eaftern philofophy. 

* EUGE- 



122 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. We {hall not begin our con- 
verfation with them. I indeed thought of the 
fcbeol, but only fo far as this denomination is 
given to the ftate of the unborn, who are 
waiting for the light, and hope that it will 
bring to them joy. and happinefs .... Do 
you recollect that night in which Job curfeth 
the hour of his birth ? In \hzfchcol of Ori 
ental mythology and poetry, the unborn nights 
and days lie, as it were, in a profound fleep. 
God from his throne looks down upon them, 
and calls them forth according to his good 
pleafure ; and they rejoice that they are per 
mitted to pafs from the choir of their Jlflers 9 
into the proceffion of the years. 

** Let the day perifli in which I was born ; and the 
" night in which it was faid, there is a fon born ! 
" Let that day be darkncfs ! 
" Let not God regard it from above ! 
c Neither let the light mine upon it ! 
" Let darknefs and the fhadow of death feize upon it ! 
&lt; Let clouds dwell over it ! 
" Let every calamity terrify it f 
" That night ! let darknefs covey it ! 
" Let it not be joined to the days of the year ! 
&lt;* Let it not come into the number of the month* I 
" Lo ! let that night be folitary ! 
" Let no joyful fong be heard therein ! 

" Let 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 123 

" Let them curfe it, that curfe the day ! 
" Let the ftars of the twilight thereof be dark I 
( Let it look for light, but find none ! 
" Let it never fee the eyelids of the morning ! 
" Becaufe it fhut not up the womb of my mother, 
" and hid not from my eyes all my forrow !" 

Have you ever feen a more ftriking defcrip- 
tion of a dreadful night, in which a fon of 
affliction laments his birth, or in general, of 
a folitary difmal darknefs, in which no ftar 
twinkles, and on which the dawn is never ta 
arife ? You know that Shakefpear defcribing 
fuch a night .... 

ALCIPHRON. He is not inferior to the 
Eaftern Bards, in his defcriptions of gloomy 
and terrifying objefls. But, my friend, I cla 
not fee in the paffage you have repeated 
any mention of children yet unborn, 

Eu GENIUS. The region of the unborn is 
filent, and without form like the night : its 
place is in the darknefs in the centre of the 
earth : there they are inclofed, and are wait 
ing for the light, as all the creatures now be 
fore us are waiting for the dawn. When the 
hour of their birth arrives, God (hall call them 
forth. 

ALCI- 



124 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

ALCIPHRON. This reprefentation is en 
tirely compofed of fenfible images. 



, EUGEN ius. Such in general is the poetry 
of -the Hebrews. They know nothing, for 
example, of the chaos, in which atoms or 
indivifible particles wander to and fro : this is 
a fanciful reprefentation of things, which we 
have received from the Greeks. But the 
Hebrews fpeak of a darkfea^ which the wind 
of the Almighty fets in motin; and methinks 
this image is by far the moft beautiful, 
becaufe it is the moft juft. Such, in effecl:, 
was the primitive ftate of our earth, as we 
learn from its firft appearance. It muft have 
remained, during a courfe of ages, under 
water, until it was anew rendered habitable by 
the order of the Creator. This image ha 
form and limits; but .the monfter chaos has 
neither the oae. nor the other. 

ALCIPHRON. This breath or fpirit of 
Goci, which moves over the furface of the 
dark, watery wafte, has fomething in it pecu 
liarly impreflive ; the idea of it excites a cer 
tain tremor or thrilling in my frame. 

HUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 125 

Eu GEN I us. It has always been employed 
by the Orientals, as the moft natural image of 
that life, power, and motion, which are com 
prehended in the idea of creation : for the 
conception of fpirit feems to have proceeded 
originally from hearing the wind, which, 
more efpecially in the night, we are apt to 
confider as having its peculiar powers and 
voice. 

ALCIPHRON. You recall to my thoughts 
the vifion of a nocturnal fpirit which we find 
in Job. It is an image, and yet formlefs and 
undefined a pafling, fluttering, breath a 
found, a murmur like the voice of the wind, 
yet withal the power of a fpirit. It made the 
hair of Job s flem ftand up, and filled him 
with perturbation and terror. It harrows up 
his foul with fear and wonder ; hear him 
{peak : 

" There came to me a word in fecret ; 

46 Mine ear heard it \ it was a gentle found : 

" In the terrifying hour of night-vifions ; 

" At the time when deep fleep falleth upon men \ 

" Then fear and trembling came upon me ; 

" A {huddering went through all my bones : 

" Then a ghoft pafied before me j 

All 



126 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

* All my hair flood of an end : 

" It flood flill but I could not difcern its form Jjr 

" An image flood before my eyes ; 

" Then was filence and I heard a voice faying, 

" Shall mortal man be more juft than God ?" 

EUGENIUS. It is exadly as you faid, an 
image and no image filence and a voice, and 
the fhapelefs form can only be announced by 
a powerful effect or operation. But beheld ! 
the lovely dawn appears let us bid farewell 
to nocturnal vifions, and adore the FATHER of 
LIGHTS ! 

Blefs the Lord, O my foul : 

" O Lord my God, thou art very great ; 

" Thou clothell thyfelf with light as with a gar- 

** mentj 
** Thou ftretcheft out the heavens as a tent*." 

When the firft morning arofe, thou, O great 
Creator! didft call the LIGHT good, and didft 
confecrate it as an everlafting emblem of thy 
preicnce and glory, as an emblem of all joy 
and purity, of all wifdom, goodnefs, and 
fandity. God dwells in light, and his coun 
tenance beams forth paternal benignity on his 

* P aim civ. i, 2. 

children. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 127 

children. Salvation and blefling flow from 
his prefence. He fend beams of light into 
the dark abode" of mortals., nrl makes bright 
rays of hope and joy to ariie on their night 
of calamity diid diftrefs, It is the glory of the 
Creator that he hath formed the light : audit 
is the brighteft ray of his paternal character, 
that he maketh a light to arife on the hi. .man 
foul, which extends its views beyond this 
twilight of its prefent exiftence, and tranfports 
its hopes to fplendid and eternal manfions. 
Is there, my friend, in the whole compafs of 
creation, any production more worthy than 
light, of being confidered as the garment of 
Jehovah, who in his eflence is unfearchable, 
and without this bright effluence * of that 
adorable eflence, would dwell, with refpecl: 
to us in entire darknefs ? Light is alfo repre- 
fented as the dwelling of the Almighty, and 
fome^mes as his fwifteft meflenger, which l\ 
comes, as it were, on the wings of his om- 
niprefence, and with the velocity of thought, 
franfmits its comfort to mortals. 



. The poetry of the Hebrews 

* Milton, Book iii. 1. 6, 

rnuft 



128 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

muft then abound with beautiful and pic- 
turefque defcriptions of light. 

EUGENIUS. No poetry is perhaps equal 
to it in this refpedt. The very term which 
exprefles light, is, in this language, elevated 
and noble both in found and fenfe. It is the 
emblem* of all joy. Difmal and dejedting are 
the defcriptions of darknefs ; while the dawn 
breaking through the morning clouds, and the 
genial luftre of the riling day, are painted by 
the Hebrew Bards with the moft chearful 
and pleafing colours. All the images of the 
twilight exprefs ideas of waiting, expectation, 
and hope, and the dawn is reprefented as 
their joyful accomplifhment. The morning- 
ftar which we fee before us, is confidered by 
the Hebrew Bards, as the fon of the twilight; 
for, in the Oriental poetry, LIGHT and 
DARKNESS have their palaces, their genealo 
gies, their refpedive offices and ipheres of ac 
tion. In Job, the dawn appears as a hero, 
who puts to flight malefactors, who takes 
from robbers their ftrong holds and hiding 
places, gives form and colour to all objects, 
and as it were, by new impreffions made 
upon them, changes their afpet From the 

womb 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 129 

womb of the morning comes forth the dew, 
whofe innumerable drops are the brilliant off- 
fpring of the dawn. Behold that beautiful 
harbinger of day before us, blending light and 
{hade in fuch a charming variety of grada 
tions, and extending itfelf over us like the 
.vault of heaven ! 

" He fitteth upon the circle of the earth, and the in- 
" habitants of the world are as grafshoppers 
" before him. 

* He ftretcheth out the heavens as a curtain, and 
" fpreadeth them as a tent to dwell in *." 

Are you curious to hear fomething of the my 
thology of the heavens ? 

ALCIPHRON. On this fubjed I appre 
hend we mall find a great diverfity of opini 
ons among expofitors, more efpecially with 
refpedt to what Mofes fays of the expanfe 
between the waters, and the true meaning of 
his account of that object. 

Eu GENIUS. There is no occafiori for any 
controverfy on this fubjefl: ; becaufe the 
images employed in treating it are common 
and familiar, and, at the fame time, fuitable 

* Ifaiah, xl. 22. 

K and 



130 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

and elevated. The moft ancient idea of this 
object is not that of a glafly vault ; for glafs 
was the difcovery of a much later period ; and 
it was later ftill, that it was applied to any 
ufe, that refembles the objecl: under confider- 
ation. According to the earlieft mythology, 
the heavens were formed of water, and even 
the throne of God, furrounded with darknefs, 
was founded upon the waters. We fee thefe 
ideas entertained fo far down as the time 
of David ; they are exprefled in one of his 
moft celebrated hymns of praife : 

" He ftretcheth out the heavens like a curtain 

" He layeth the beams of his chambers in the waters ; 

" He maketh the clouds his chariot ; 

" He is carried on the wings of the winds*. * 

You fee, my friend, that in thefc later times 
no mention was made of a glaffy vault y but 
only of a tent or curtain^ and of celeftial 
chambers formed out of the waters. This 
was alfo conformable to the traditions of the 
Arabians. According to them, God called 
forth the heavens from the waters of the deep, 
and formed them as a fmoke or mi/1. Do not 

Pfalm civ. 

you 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

you admire thefe defcriptions, even when you 
confider them merely as imitations or images 
of the phenomena of nature ? 

ALCIPHRON. I have indeed been always 
much pleafed with them ; and the defcriptions 
alfo of clouds, rain, and thunder-florins, have 
always appeared to me piclurefque and beau 
tiful. It feems as if the faint and languid 
Orientals confidered the heavens only as a 
magazine of ftores, deftined for their refrefh- 
ment, and expected from thence a plenitude 
of bleffings, which their parched land fo often 
refufed them. 

EUGENIUS. True! and they have embel- 
lifhed this pleafing idea with every kind of 
ornament of which it is fufceptible. Some 
times they reprefent the univerfal Father as 
binding the clouds together, and making them 
the receptacles of the water of life for man and 
beaft : at others &gt; we fee him driving thefe 
fame clouds to and fro, to moiften and refrefh 
the land ; and that in fuch rich abundance, 
that even the defarts, where no human crea 
tures dwell, are clothed with verdure ; and 
are faid by a beautiful figure of fpee/;h tojing 

K 2 With 



132 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

with joy. This wonderful difplay of provi 
dential care, in thus diffufing genial moifture 
and refrefliment, is fublimely exprefied by 
God s making the clouds his chariot, and the 
dark waters of the firmament his pavilion. 
" He bows the heavens and comes down 
" He rends his tabernacle, opens the 
" windows of his palace, and fatisfies the 
" earth with fructifying ftreams." This laft 
imagery feems to be of a later date, when God 
was confidered by men as the King of 
Heaven. 

ALCIPHRON. If I am not miftaken, he 
was very early reprefented under that cha 
racter. 

Eu GENIUS. Still earlier as the Father of a 
family the univerfal Father extending his 
paternal care to the prefervation and fupport 
of man and bead. How many paflages do 
we find in the Pfalms and Prophets, which 
have a manifeft relation to this affecting cha- 
rafter ? How many ardent fupplications fent 
up to heaven for refreshing fhowers ! and 
what imagery can be at the fame time more 
iublime and affecting than that which repre- 

fents 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 133 

fents the eyes of all things as waiting upon the 
univerfal Parent*, who fends them ram from 
heaven, and Jills their hearts with food and 
gladnefs? It is alfo remarkable that beautiful 
images of God s paternal goodnefs, are fre 
quently borrowed from the dew and rain ; 
and ardent recourfe to this goodnefs is de- 
fcribed under the figure of a parching and 
burning third : 

" As the Hart panteth after the water fprings, 
t Sopavteth my foul after thee O God ! 
c My foul tklrjleth for God, 
cc For the living God. 
&lt;{ When (hall 1 come before him, 
&lt;c And beheld the light of his countenance ?" 

Images of this kind, give to poetry a fociai 
glow and fympathetic influence, by which 
men, animals, plants, every thing in fhort^ 
which is fufceptible of life and vegetation, are 
concentrated in one general bond of union- - 
and the fupreme Head of the great family in 
heaven and earth is the PARENT ofthern all, 

ALCIPHRON. But how then came they to 
confider the heavens as &jirmamerit ? 

* Pfalm civ. 

K 1, F.UCE- 



134 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Etr GENIUS. No doubt on account of 
their ftability, luftre, and beauty, and the fine 
fapphires which feem to compofe the majef- 
tic vault extended over us. It may poflibly 
have been an ancient opinion, that the firma 
ment was a vault of ice, from which hail- 
ftones often defcended. The Arabians fre 
quently employ images, which ihew that 
they looked upon lightning as an emiffion 
of fparks from the fapphires which compofe 
the vault of heaven. Moreover, while the 
heavens were confidered as the temple and 
palace of Jehovah, fo was the pure azure of 
the firmament fuppofed to be the floor of his 
habitation, and the roof or cieling of ours. 
I think, however, that the people or tribes 
who lived in tents^ would be the moft natu 
rally difpofed to reprefent by this image 
the dwelling-place of the Deity. Accordingly, 
they tell us that he daily fpreads his tent, and 
fattens it to the pillars of heaven and the fum- 
mits of the mountains : and this tent is for 
them an afylum, a place of fafety, reft, and 
paternal protection, in which God lives with 
his creatures. 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 135 

ALCIPHRON. And how do they confider 
the Earth ? 

EUGENIUS. The anfwer to this queftioa 
is eafy. You have only to proceed with the 
hymn of praife in which the Pfalmift continues 
his defcription, or rather his fublime picture of 
the creation*. 

(( The earth hath he laid on its foundations, that it 

" mould not be (haken for ever : 
*&lt; With the deep he furrounded her as with a gar- 

** ment : 

&lt;" The waters ftood above the mountains. 
" At thy rebuke they fled ; 
.&lt; At the voice of \hy thunder they haded away ; 

or, 
&lt;* At thy thrcatning voice they fell. 

" Then rofe the mountains; 

.* Then defcended the valleys ; 

" They defcended to the place where thou haft fixed 

" them. 
" Then didft thou fet bounds to the waters, which 

" they may not pafs over, nor turn again to 

cover the earth. 

" Thou makeft fountains to fpring up in the valleys ; 

* l They run among the hills : 

" They quench ilie thirfl .of the wild beads ; 

* Pfalm civ. 
K 4 Above 



136 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" Above them are the fowls of heaven ; 
" They fing among the branches. 

" Thou watered the hills from thy chambers ; 

" The earth is fatisfied with the fruit of thy works ; 

" Thou makeft grafs to grow for the cattle, and feed 

t( for the fervice of man ; 

" That he: may bring forth food out of the earth ; 
cc And oil which maketh his face to mine, 
&lt; And wine that maketh his heart glad. 

* ( The trees of the Lord are full of fap ; 
ft The cedars of Lebanon which he hath planted : 
&lt;c Where the birds make their nefts ; 
t( The Stork hath her houfe in the fir-trees ; 
* For the wild-goat the high hills are a refuge, and 
a the rocks for the conies." 

EUGENIUS. What a delightful, exhilarat 
ing view does the Sacred Bard take here of the 
earth ! It is the verdant mountain of Jehovah 
\vhich he hath raifed out of the water a feat 
of pleafure which he hath raifed above the fea, 
as an habitation for myriads of living creatures. 
The feries of images which the poet here 
fucceffively employs, forms, precifely, a natural 
hiftory of the earth. Firft, the waters ftand 
above the hills ; then the mountains rife in 
profpecl ; after this, the valleys defcend, and 
the waters fend through them their refrefhing 
ftreams. Finally, God aifigns to them all 
their proper bounds and eftablifhes the land. - 

Now 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 137 

Now the valleys become dry and verdant; 
the rivers flow in their channels, and the 
ftreams and rivulets rejoice the valleys with 
plants and flowers. Here the beafts of the 
field flock together the birds of the air fend 
forth their notes and the banks of the rivers 
begin to be lined with trees. We may find, 
perhaps, in the book of Job, more fublirne 
aad bold defcriptions of the formation of the 
earth, but none more beautiful and exact than 
this of the Pfalmift. 

ALCIPHRON. Truth and conformity with 
nature conftitute, no doubt, the beauty and 
perfedion of fuch pidures as thefe ; they are 
even effentially required in fuch pictures. 
What pleafure or profit are to be derived from 
thofe mythologies which teach us nothing? 
What do I gain by reading in the northern 
Edda^ that the firmament is the jaw-bone of 
a vanquiihed giant, out of whofe bones the 
earth was formed, and from whofe blood the 
rivers and fountains proceeded. Totally Dif 
ferent from this is the poetry of the Hebrews, 
which unites beauty with truth, enlivens them 
both with the mod interefting feelings, and is 

thus 



138 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

thus the poetry of the urjd.erflaridipg and the 
heart. 

EUGENIUS; The Orientals in their 
poetical views of nature feein indeed to 
unite thefe three .characters ; for their defcrip- 
tions are beautiful, true, and offering. How 
interefting as well as beautiful, for example, 
are their views of the natural world rendered 
by their manner of reprefenting the flowers, 
plants, and the other parts of the vegetable 
creation ? They aicribe a kind of life almoft 
to all things, and are peculiarly fond of that 
figure of fpeech,by which a fort of perfonality 
is attributed to inanimate beings. Thus God 
is reprefented as the foftering Parent of the 
plants and trees to which he has granted the 
bleflings of growth and fecundity. He waters 
them from the clouds of heaven : he pre- 
fervesthem, though in aftate of apparent death, 
during the feverity of the winter, and breathes 
into them new life and vigour, at the return 
of the vernal gales and fummer-fun. This 
revival of the vegetable world and its bloom 
ing verdure, is a beautiful emblem of the 
refurreftion of the dead, as its conftant pre- 

fervation 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 139 

fcrvation excites a clear and affecting idea of 
the care of a benign providence. The loves 
and connubial union of plants, feem to have 
been objects of attention in the earlieft times, 
and we find the Palm-tree, the Cedar, the 
Vine, and the Olive, furnifhing mod pleafmg 
and even elevated ideas to the Hebrew Bards. 
It is much to be lamented, that fo many of 
their productions are loft. Had we more of 
their Fables and paftoral Poems, fuch as the 
Parable of Jotham, and of their national 
poetry, fuch as the Song of So??gs, we fhouid 
undoubtedly find in them a poetic treafure, 
rich in ideas, images, and characters, much 
more beautiful and diverfified than thofe 
which we find in the dialogues between the 
Rofe and the Zephyr , the Rofe and the Nightin 
gale, the "Traveller and the Turtle-dove. At 
prefent we muft content ourfelves with a 
fingle collection of poetical compofitions 
which breathe the perfume of rofes, and fend 
forth the foft accents of the turtle-doves : fuch 
are the fongs which exprefs the love of 
Solomon. But, my friend, the fun mounts 
towards the meridian ! 

ALCIPHRON. Don t be in a hurry. 

Favour 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Favour me rather with fome beautiful hymn 
to the fun, if the Hebrews have any compo 
fitions of that kind. 

EUGENIUS. The Hebrew Poetry admits 
of no hymns or facred fongs addrefled to the 
fun, or to any other object in the natural 
world, for that would be deemed idolatry ;* 
and you know with what care the Hebrews 
were obliged to avoid every thing of this kind. 
Job fays* : 

" If I beheld the fun when it fhined, 

" Or the moon walking in brightnefs, 

" And my heart had been fecretly enticed, 

" And my mouth kifled my hand in fign of homage ; 

" Then mould I have been chargeable with a punifh- 

" able tranfgreffion, 
" For I ihould have denied the God above." 

Such a ferious way of thinking in religion 
as this, rendered it impoflible to addrefs any 
hymns or poetical oblations to the luminaries 
of heaven. On the contrary, it was the great 
and predominant objedl: of the Hebrew Poetry 
to oppofe this kind of idolatry, becaufe of all 
the created beings which were objects of 

* Job, xxxi. 26. 28. 

worfhip 






ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

worfhip among idolaters, there were none 
which attracted fo much the admiration of 
the Orientals, as the king and queen of 
heaven. Accordingly, in the poetry of the 
Hebrews, the fun and the moon are conftantly 
reprefented as \hzfervants of God ; and here 
again we fee in this poetry grandeur and 
truth, precifion and beauty happily united : 

" God faid Let there be two great lights for 

" rulers of the feafons ! 

" And they were placed in the great firmameni, 
" As rulers of the feafons *." 

Thus you fee that they are rulers of the fea 
fons, but they are fuch under God : they are 
hip fubftitutes, his vicegerents, but ftill his 
creatures : and in this manner are they 
always mentioned in the poetry of the 
Hebrews. 

ALCIPHRON. But when thus employed 
they do not feem of much ufe to this poetry. 

s 

Eu GENIUS. On the contrary, they pro 
duce a great effecl. The fun, moon, and 

* Genefis, i. 

liars, 



142 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ftars, are here reprefented as living beings* 
They have, in the heavens, dwellings and 
tents ; and this opinion is flill entertained by 
the Arabians and other Eaftern nations. 
This idea gives much fpirit and aftiori to 
poetical deicription, as you may fee in the 
following beautiful paffage, which is fuperior, 
perhaps, to any thing you will find in the 
Grecian Poets : 

* The fun hath fet his tabernacle in the heavens, 

" From whence he goeth forth as a bridegroom from 

" his chamber, 

" And rcjoiceth as a ftrong man to run his race ; 
" He goeth forth from one end of the heaven, 
* c And his circuit is to its other end, 
4&lt; And he fills the world with his heat *." 

The moon and ftars have alfo their habitations, 
in which they are reprefented as confined by 
the Creator, when they are to be darkened, or 
to which they retire with precipitation and 
terror, and hide themfelves when the fplen- 
dour of Jehovah appears. We fee a fublim^ 
example of this in the book of Habakkuk, 
where, when God comes forth in his war* 

* Pfalm xix. 

chariot 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 143 

chariot to divide the land, the fun and moon 
ftand fixed in aftonifhment at the doors of 
their tents. When his lightnings flaih and 
his arrows fly, they conceal themfelves as con 
founded at the pre fence of his glory. The 
fublime paflage runs thus* : 

ft The mountains faw him and trembled ; 

** The over flowing of the water patted by : 

" The deeps groaned *, 

The hills lifted up their hands ; 

" The fun and moon flood dill in their habitation : 

" At the light of thine arrows they went, 

" And at the mining of thy glittering fpear. 

More majeftic perfonifications than thefe feem 
fcarcely poffible. Heaven and earth liften 
with profound attention: the mod rapid 
powers of Nature Jland ftill, and the mofl 
fplendid are darkened. Thus alfo the ftars 
become God s armed legions^ and fometimes 
rejoicing children. Whatever is pure, beauti 
ful, and immortal, is compared with the ftars, 
and in them the angels are often perfonified. 

ALCIPHRON. But for what purpofes are 
thefe fhining hofts employed ? 

* Habakkuk, iii. 



144 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. For all fuch purpofes as God 
executes by the intervention of his fervants. 
The fun, by his very name, is reprefented to 
us as a meffenger ; but he is not acknowledged 
as the fource of vegetation, fertility, and 
beauty. The growth of the plants is not 
afcribed to the fun, but to the fupreme Parent 
who quickens the vegetable world by light, 
dew, and fructifying fhowers. It is only the 
province of the fun to lead on the feafons; 
He is the king of the Earth, but under God. 
The ftars march forth as his armies and give 
battle : to them are afcribed water-fpouts and 
inundations ; and in the fong of Deborah 
there is a beautiful perfonification of this kind. 
If they appear as angels or meflfengers, thefe 
meffengers may fometimes miftake their 
errand ; in fuch cafes he flops them in their 
courfes, and doth not place in them an unli 
mited confidence. He fees fpots in their luf- 
tre, and the heavens are notflure in his fight. 
Finally, when the future, the grand period of 
God s government mall arrive, then fhall the 
fun mine with a feven-fold increafe of luftre, 
and the moon fhall be as bright as the fun. 
Now my friend, a fpecies of poetry which 
takes in fuch a fublime and connected view of 

i the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 145 

the nature of things, and arranges all created 
beings in regular claflfes, which reprefents the 
Deity as the univerfal Shepherd, who knows 
the ftars as if they were his flock, calls them 
by their names, fcatters them in a variety of 
fplendid clufters through the blue vault of 
heaven, girds Orion, binds the fweet influ 
ences of Pleiades*^ and layeth up his treafures 
in the fouth. Such poetry is, I fay, the ofF- 
fpring of heaven and earth. When we come 
to the book of Job, what fublime defcriptions 
of the ftarry heavens fhall we find there ! 

ALCIPHRON. I am indeed highly pleafed 
with your views of this noble fubjecT:, and 
am already more reconciled to the ancient hif- 
tory of our globe. It difcovers a peculiarly 
fyrnpathetic attention to animals and living 
creatures, and feems to take a cordial concern 
in their lot. I remember well the great plea- 
fure I felt in my early youth, when I perceived 
that the animals (the dumb animals, as they 
are compaffionately called in this poetry,) 
were confidered as bearing fome refemblance 
of man s nature, and as only wanting fpeech 

* Job; xxxviii. 31, 

I. tO 



146 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

to claim a .kind of relationfhip to the great hu 
man family. The beafts of the field are fre 
quently denominated by the Hebrew Bards, 
living creatures in oppofition to the unadtive 
and Hill life of domeftic animals. I was always 
peculiarly pleafed when I obferved the accents 
which mark the diflindive language of differ 
ent animals, exprefled and imitated fo happily 
by the facred writer, that even by the very 
founds of the words he employed, he feemed 
to coo with the turtle-dove, and to caft ftones 
with the oftrich in the wildernefs. I was de 
lighted to find the forms of the flag, the lion, 
and the bull defcribed, or rather painted, in 
the moft lively colours, with their refpedive* 
characters and manner of living. Nay, I have 
often wilhed, that we had fewer facred hymns 
and odes, and more fables and allegories rela 
tive to the brute- creation, in this nature-poetry 
as you very properly call it ? 

EUGENIUS. You muft not, however, for 
get my friend, that religion and its great 
author and object, give the vital fpirit to this 
kind of poetry, in which, therefore, the name 
of God muft not be omitted. For Nature is 
the work of God the aflemblage of beings 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 147 

and things created and preferred by him that 
made them. He is the Father of the great 
family in heaven and earth the Father of all 
living creatures. He gives to all their food : 
the eyes of all things wait upon him : the young 
ravens cry and feek their meat from God. He 
lives and deals with every creature in his im- 
menfe family, in a manner fuitable to its na 
ture, wants and deflination. In his fight 
nothing is favage nothing contemptible* 
The hawk flies by his wifdom, and the eagle 
mountcth up at his command, and maketh his 
nefl on high*. He provideth for, and directs 
even the monfters. The frightful crocodile 
is the object of his care, and the behemoth, 
as defcribed by Job, is a mafter-piece of divine 
workmanfhip. In a word, the true poetry of 
Nature has for its great object, the wondrous 
works of Nature s author. It exhibits, in a 
lively and ftriking manner, the general order 
of created things, and the providential care of 
the univerfal Parent for the beings he has 
created. This poetry is drawn from the 
bofom of nature, and is foftered, if I may fo 
cxprefs myfelf, in her lap. 

* Job, xxxix. 

L 2 ALQJ- 



148 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. I now underftand you, and 
comprehend a thing which I have often ob- 
ferved with aftonifhrnent, and which ap 
peared, indeed, more or lefs {hocking : I 
mean the preference which, in this poetry, is 
fometimes given to the inferior animals, even 
before man. The afs of Balaam feems . to 
have been in higher confideration with the 
angel, than the Prophet himfelf. You will 
obferve alfo, that in the book of Job, God 
fpeaks with complacency of the behemoth 
and the leviathan, but fays nothing of the 
human fpecies. 

EUGENIUS. Man, however, is far from 
being overlooked (if your obfervation deferves 
a ferious anfwer) ; on the contrary, he is re- 
prefented as the image of God, the nobleft of 
his works, and as one of the vifible Eloblm 
here upon earth. But more of this here 
after In the mean time go on with your 
hymn of praife, and we fhall finifh our con 
ference with mine. 

ALCIPHRON. " He appointeth the moon for feafons $ 

&lt;c The fun knoweth his going down ; 

" He maketh darknefs, and it is night ; 

&lt; Then are all the beads of the foreft in motion ; 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 149 

The young lions roar after their prey, 

" They alfo feek their meat from God ; 

" The fun rifeth ; they gather themfelves together, 

" And they again return to their dens. 

&lt;c Then man goeth forth to his work, 

&lt;c He goeth forth to his labour until the evening. 

" O Lord how manifold are thy works ! 

" In wifdom haft thou made them all. 

" The earth is full of thy riches ; 

Cf So is this great and wide fea, 

" Wherein creatures innumerable live and move, 

" Both great and fmall beafts. 

" There go the mips, 

" There plays the Leviathan, 

&lt;c Formed by thee to fport in the great waters. 

" Thefe wait, all upon THEE, 

" That thou maveft give them their meat in due 

" feafon; 

" That thou giveft them, they gather ; 
" Thou openeft thy hand they are filled with good 
" Thou hideft thy face, 
" They are troubled ; 

" Thou takeft away their breath they die : 
" They return to their duft: 
&lt;f Thou fended forth thy fpirir, 
&lt;c They are again created : 
" And the race of the earth is renewed. 

" The glory of Jehovah endureth for ever; 
" Jehovah rejoiceth in his works. 
" He looketh on the earth and it trembleth : 
* He toucheth the hills and they fmoke. 

L 3 I wIU 



IJO ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" I will fmg unto the Lord as long as I live 

" I will fing praiie unto my God, while I have my 

* being. 

" And my fongof him (hall found fweetly, 
* I will be glad in Jehovah ! 
" Praife him, the Lord, O my foul. 

Hallclluiah ! 



DIALOGUE IV. 

look of Job and the proper mannerof 
reading it Reprefentation of the Deity as 
Creator of the world to whom the lumina 
ries of heaven, and all the pG^vers of Nature 
are fubjeclcd Elihus character as exprejfid 
in bis difcourfes Godfpeaks out of the whirl 
wind Of the poetry of Nature in general 
Of its objeff Of its perfonifi cations which 
give it a peculiar energy Examples of this 
from Job Striking defcriptions of the ob- 
jefts of the Natural World in this book Thefe 
conjidered as adapted to excite lively and ex- 
altedfeelings An APPENDIX containingfome 
perfonijicationsfrom 



( 53 ) 



DIALOGUE IV. 

\VHEN EUGENIUS vifited his friend, he 
found him reading the book of Job, and his 
friend began the converfation in the follow 
ing manner. 

ALCIPHRON. You now fee before you 
your difciple. I now read with fingular plea- 
fure the book you fee in my hand : I cannot 
however, accuftom myfelf eafily to the long 
converfations, complaints, and difcuffions it 
contains ; and ftill lefs to thofe vindications 
of Providence, which after all, prove but 
little. Of the plan of this book, and the 
thread of reafoning which runs through it, I 
as yet know nothing; but it certainly abounds 
with defcriptions of Nature, and fublime, yet 
fimple observations, concerning the divine 
perfections and government which elevate the 
foul. Give me fome moments of your leifure 
and patience, and I will open to you (to 
fpeak in the Oriental ftyle) the treafures of my 
heart, and read you fome paffages : but in 
your turn, you muft inform me and rectify 
14 my 



IJ4 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

my ideas with refpecl to the///?//, defign^ an 
tiquity , and author^ of this remarkable book. 

EUGENIUS. It is not a matter of indiffer 
ence what paflages we feledl for this purpofe. 
Togo through the whole book would be, for 
us, an undertaking much too laborious : we 
like brevity in Dialogues : we require a per- 
fpicuous feries and arrangement of ideas, 
which are not exhibited here in our manner, 
and in the method of inveftigation to which 
we are accuftomed. The Orientals are lefs 
animated in their focial meetings than we are ; 
they are fond of long conferences, and even 
of circumlocution, more efpecially in fuch 
poetical compofitions as this before us. Thefe 
indeed, contain pearls, but we mud dive for 
them as it were, into the depths of the 
ocean. They are not remarkable for their 
number; but in their quality, they are truly 
precious treafures of fcience and wifdom, con 
tained in proverbs and fay ings of the earlieft 
antiquity. 

ALC i PI-IRON. To what period of time do 
you allude \ We are furprifed to find here 
fuch extenfive and judicious views of the true- 

conftU 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 155 

conftitution of Nature, and, at the fame time, 
to meet fo often with poverty of expreffion 
and puerile ideas. 

Eu GEN i us. Let us turn, for fome mo 
ments, our attention from the author, and 
confine ourfelves to a confideration of the 
work itfelf, in its riches and poverty. The 
book of Job muft undoubtedly belong to a 
period of very high antiquity, and therefore 
I take it up with a certain kind of reverential 
feeling, when I attempt to decypher it. 
From the earlieft ages from the molt diftant 
lands from the hoary ruins of the greateft re 
volutions in tafte and manners, which may 
have taken place in the courfe of three or four 
thoufand years, I think I hear a voice, which 
fpeaks to me in this book ; and then, in- 
ftead of deciding concerning its antiquity, or 
endeavouring to adapt its interefting contents 
to more recent times, I fay within myfelf, 

*&lt; We are but of yefter.day an4 know nothing, 
&lt;( Becaufe our days upon earth are a fhadow ; 
" The fathers teach us and tell us ; 
.&lt; They utter words out of their heart *." 

* Job, viii. 8, 9. 

Begin 



156 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Begin therefore, my friend, with the beauti 
ful paflages of this book, which relate to the 
Deity and the natural world ; I love to hear 
the ideas and language of the primitive the 
infant-world. 

ALCIPHRON reads : 

t Dominion and fear are round about him ; 

" He decideth* in the high heavens ; 

* Are not his armies without number ? 

&lt;c And upon whom doth not his light arife ? 

" How then can man be righteous before God ? 

" How can he be pure, who is born of a woman I 

" See ! even the moon is fled with her tent f j 

" Yea, the ftars are not pure in his fight ; 

" And mould man be fo ? that worm ! 

" A fon of the earth." JOB, xxv. 

EUGENIUS. This is truly a fublime re- 
prefentation of God, the Supreme, the hea 
venly Ruler ! He decides between ftars and 
angels : numberlefs are his radiant hofts ! 
His fplendour darkens them all ! that is, his 
light, purity, truth, and reditude furpafs in 
finitely all the lines of moral excellence, 

In our tranflation. He maketh peace in his high places. 
-j- In the fame. Behold even to the moon and it fhineth not. 

which 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 157 

which are vifible in finite intelligences or 
powers of Nature. The moon with her tent 
difappears before HIM! The ftars are not 
pure in his fight : and from this height of 
heaven, how awful and fublime is the look he 
cafts upon man who prefumes to judge of his 
ways ! 

" And fliould man be fo ? that worm ! 
" A fon of the earth that mite !" 

ALCIPHRON. I am much pleafed with 
your explanation of thofe obfcure words, 

" He decideth in the high heavens, &c." 

I fee the Sovereign of the earth pronouncing 
judgment between ftars and angels, and the 
moon hiding herfelf from the prefence of his 
glory. 

EUGENIUS. Proceed to other paflages of 
Job, which are of a ftill iuperior kind* 

ALCIPHRON reads \ 

The abyfs is naked before him, 
" And deftru&ion hath no covering ; 

He 



158 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" He flretcheth out the north over the empty place ; 

He hangeth the earth upon nothing ; 

" He bindeth up the water in his thick clouds ; 

" And the cloud is not rent under it; 

" He eftablifheth all around his throne, 

* And fpreadeth his cloud upon it. 

" And marks, as with a compafs, the bounds of the 

" waters, 

" Until the light lofeth itfelf in darknefs. 
* c The pillars of heaven tremble : 
" They are aftoniflied at his reproof. 
" By his power he divideth the fea ; 
* By his wifdom he curbs the pride of its waves, 
* s Then by, his fpirit does he again garnifh the 

heavens, 

* c And his hand overtaketh the flying ferpent. 
" Lo ! thefe are only a part of his ways, 
* How fmall a portion is heard of him ? 
" But the thunder of his power who can underftand ? * 

EUGENIUS. You have been filling the 
place of the Poet I (hall now endeavour to be 
your expofitor : Job overcomes this objedor 
as he overcomes them all. He only exhibits 
a fingle fcene of the power and grandeur of 
the Almighty to confound him. He however 
takes his objeds and images from the moft pro 
found depths and raifesthem to the fublimeft 
heights ; fo that the bottomlefs abyfs and the 
throne of the moft High prefent themfelves to 
his imagination in awful contraft. The em 
pire 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 159 

pire of non-entities appears before God : the 
abyfs or deftruftion (as job terms it) bath no 
covering before Him. Now fince thefe are re- 
prefented as an unfathomable ocean, fo the 
vaft region of the unborn ftands before the Al 
mighty in the gloomy void, where the poet s 
eye, rolling with a kind of frenzy, perceives 
flitting fpedtres and fhapelefs forms, which 
raife themfelves up and wait. The abyfs 
where light had never pierced, (lands unco 
vered this is the awful, the dark moment, 
when .CREATION begins. It begins with 
heaven and earth. God fpreads abroad the 
heavens over the unlimited deep : he efta- 
blifhes the earth alfo over it (for thefe regions 
of night, fliadows and fpedres, are reprefented 
as fubterraneous) : He arranges with wifdom 
the heavens, and binds up the waters in clouds. 
He erecls his throne in the midft of the wa 
ters, and covers it with thick clouds. He 
compaffeth the waters within bounds, until 
the day and night are blended together at the 
horizon. After this, his power is defcribed 
in the thunder, and the fcene is rendered ftill 
more awful by the defcription of a fea-ftorm. 
Here the fwelling and rebellious waves are 
violent infurgents, which he drives before him 

and 



l6o ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

and reduces to filence. At his word the 
fea is calm, and the heavens are ferene. Now 
his hand overtakes thejtying ferpenf which (if 
we confider the images ufed in other places,) 
may fignify the fea-monfter of thefe regions, 
the crocodile, or may perhaps be a bold figure 
employed to defcribe the rolling and fwelling 
waves which the hand of the Almighty renders 
calm. The conclufion of the defcription, is as 
calm and ferene, as its commencement was ter 
rible and tempeftuous. And this (fays Job) is 
only a fmall part of bis ways. But the thunder 
of his power who can under/land ? Every 
morning which breaks forth from the dark- 
nefs of the night every tempeft that arifes, 
more efpecially in the fea, prefents this majeftic 
image to the mind. 

ALCIPHRON. We may add to thefe paf- 
fages, the difcourfe fo full of animation and 
tranfport, which Elihu delivered immedi 
ately before the laft fcene the appearance of 
God in the whirlwind. 

EUGENIUS. You muft, however, take 
notice, that this mud be confidered as belong 
ing to the back-ground of the piece. For the 

fayings 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. l6l 

faylngs of Elibu^ however plaufible and hap 
pily exprefled they may be, are, neverthelefs, 
in his own judgment, like new wine in fer 
mentation, which bur ft s the vejfd and runs 
over*. His images are noble, bat there is no 
end of them, and they are, at beft, no more 
than amplifications of thofe which Job and 
his friends had employed before with more 
brevity and equal energy. Accordingly, his 
difcourfe receives no aniwer. He makes a 
kind of preparation for the appearance of the 
Almighty, and publiflies it before hand with 
out knowing it himfelf. He defcribes a 
rinng temped in all its terrors, and announces 
thus, without perceiving it, the approach of 
the Judge. 

ALCIPHRON. I have never attended to 
this preparatory feries of images. 

EUGENIUS. This, in my opinion, is the 
foul, the vital fpirit of the whole fcene, with 
out which Elihu would, every now and then, 
be repeating the fame things without neceffity. 
As the whole difcourfe is too long, we fhall 
begin by this paflage, Behold God is great f . 

* Chap, xxxii. 19. f Chap, xxxvi. 26. 

M ALCI- 



162 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. " Behold God is great in his power $ 

u Who is wife and teacheth like him ? 

u Who can examine his ways ? 
" Who can fay unto him, Thou haft erred ? 

" Therefore remember and magnify his deeds. 

" For all men praife them ; 

" All men behold them ; 

" Only the weak fee them afar off. 

t( Behold God is great and* we know him not, 

" Neither cr.n the number of his years be fearched 

" out. 

* The drops of rain which defcend, 

" He draws up again in vapours ; 

" Which the clouds diilil anew on man abundantly. 

" And who can comprehend the fpreading of the 

" clouds? 

" And the noife of them in his tent ? 

s( Behold ! He furrounds them with his lightnings ; 

* And covereth the bottom of the fea ! 

* For by them he judgeth and punimeth the nations 3 

t( And giveth alfo meat in abundance. 

&lt;f With his hand he grafps the lightning, 
" And gives his order where it fhall fall ; 
&lt;c Ke (hews it to the wicked ! 
" The wicked is the prey of his anger." 

All thefe images will appear with more bre 
vity and beauty when the Almighty fpeaks. 
Now the florin rifes with violence, and 
ELIHU proceeds: 
*- " At 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, l6 $ 

* c At this my heart trembles ; 

lf It (hudders in my bofom , 

&lt;f Hear, hear, with terror, the noife of his voice^ 

* c And the words that go out of his mouth ! 

" He direcleth his voice under the whole heaven, 

" And his lightning to the end of the earth ; 

" After it a voice roareth He thundereth mar- 

" velloufly. 

ct God thundereth marvellouily with his voice ; 
ft Great things does he, which we cannot compre- 

" hend. 

&lt;f For he faith to the fnow, be thou upon the earth, 
" Likewife to the great rains the itreams of hi 

" might, 

" And \\efealeth up the hand of every man ; 
fc That all men may know that it is his work." 

ALCIPHRON. This paflage is expreffive 
On the hand of every man he fsis a fed, L e. 
they ftand furprifed and aftonifhed ; feeling 
that they can do nothing : a fenfation which 
is excited in every one of us during a thun 
der- ftorm. 



Si The terrors of the temped 
are thus farther defcribed : 

" Then the beads go into dens ; 

" And remain in their places. 

a Out of the fouth cometh the whirlwind, 

" And froft from the north. 

" By the breath of God froft is given \ 

" The 



164 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

&lt;c The wide fea becomes dry land. 

" And now his fplendour drives the clouds before it $ 

" His light difperfes them frr and wide ; 

" They wander in their progrefs according to his 

" will; 
" They go and execute what he orders on hills and 

" plains, 
* To which it pleafeth him to fend refrefhment." 

The Orientals alone can fet a juft value on 
the treafures of the rain, and obferve the mo 
tions of the clouds to and fro, in fucha man 
ner as to clefcribe them with fuch precifion 
and beauty. They are prefent we fee them 
before our eyes in the picture drawn here by 
Elihu, 

ALCIPHRON reads: 

" Hearken unto this, O Job * ( 

" Stand ftill and confider the wondrous works of 

God ! 

" Doft thou know when God difpofed them, 
" And caufed the light of his cloud to fhine ? 
" And doft thou know the balancings of the clouds, 
** The wondrous works of HIM that is perfect in 

" knowledge ? 

" Doft thou know how thy garments are warm, 
" When he quieteth the earth by the fouth wind ? 

* Chap xxxvii. 14, 

Haft 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 165 

*" Haft thou with him fpread out the fky, 

&lt;e Which is as ftrong as a molten glafs ? 

c&lt; Teach us what we (hall fay unto him ! 

* For we cannot order our fpeech by reafon of dark- 

" nefs, 

Shall it be told him that I fpeak ? 
" If a man fpeak furely he mall be fwallowed up. 
" Invifible is the light of the Almighty ! 
His fplendour is there behind the clouds ! 
ft Now the wind bloweth and cleanfeth them, 
c&lt; Now cometh gold * from the north ; 
cc Beautiful and awful is the luftre of Eloah f , 
" The Almighty, we cannot find him out ! 
* The great, the ftrong, the Judge unfpeakable in his 

(f righteoufnefs. 

" Therefore fear him ye fons of men ! 
" No fage ever faw him." 

EUGENIUS. You fee the conclufion to 
which the young philofopher is brought. He 
declares to be impoffible that which is now to 
take place : for, while he is affirming and 
maintaining that the dark cloud forms an 
eternal feparation between God and man, and 
that a mortal can never hear the voice of the 
Almighty, God appears arid fpeaks. And 
what a difference is there, my friend, be 
tween the language of Jehovah and that of 
JLlibu ? Feeble, prolix, nay childifh is the 

* Fair weather, f Chap, xxxvii. 22. 

M 3 latter. 



l66 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

latter, in companion with the concife, majef* 
tic words of thunder which proceed from the 
Creator ? He does not difcufs or difpute ; 
He brings forth a rapid fucceffion of lively 
images, and furrounds, aftonifhes, and over 
powers Job with the wonders of his creation : 

" The Lord fpoke to Job out of the whirlwind * j 

" He fpoke to him and faid ; 

Who is this that darkeneth God s counfel by 

" words without knowledge I 
&lt;c Gird up now thy loins like a man ; 
I will demand of thee anfwer me : 
" Where waft thou 

When I laid the foundations of the earth I 
Declare if thou knoweft it. 
" Who ftretched the line over it ? 
" Whereupon are its foundations fattened ? 
f e Or who laid the corner-done thereof ? 
" When the morning ftars fung together, 
" And all the fons of God fliouted for joy." 

EUGENIUS. Here let us, for a morqent^ 
lofe fight of the natural fcience and philo- 
fophy of later times, and confider this ima 
gery as the earlieft poetry of Nature refpecl:- 
ing the earth. In this point of view, it muft 
furely affet us in a pleafing manner. How 

* Cjiap. xxxviiz. 

beautiful 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 167 

beautiful and grand is it in its images, and in 
its fimplicity ! The earth is reprefented as an 
edifice, founded and meafured by the Al 
mighty ; and no fooner are its foundations 
laid, and the corner-flone fixed, than all the 
fans of God and the morning-Jlars rai le an 
acclamation of joy and a fong of praife to the 
great Creator. Now comes the formation of 
the ocean : 

" Who (hut up the fea within doors, 

" When it brake forth, as it were, from the wo mb ? 

" I gave her the clouds for a garment, 

(( And folded her in darknefs as in a fwaddling band, 

And faid, hitherto (halt thou come and no 

farther 
" Here (hall thy proud and ftormy waves be (laid." 

EUGENIUS. I do not believe that there 
ever was a more fublime and piffcurefque de- 
fcription of that element than is here exhibited. 
It breaks forth from the abyfs, from the 
bowels of the earth, as from its mother s 
womb. He who forms and arranges all 
things fpeaks to it as a Being newly brought 
into exiftence, and fpeaks, as the irrefiftible 
difpofer of all things, in few words and the 
Ocean is filent and obeys him for ever. 

M4 ALCI- 



j68 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON reads : 

" Haft thou, in thy days, commanded the morning? 

" And caufed the dawn to know its place, 

" That It might be extended to the ends of the earth^ 

&lt;( And the robbers be maken out of it ? 

" The images of things change imperceptibly, 

" Like clay in the forming hand of the potter. 

" From the wicked his light is withdrawn, 

" And his high arm is broken." 

EUGEHITJS. One would wifh to fee the 
dawn^ generally characterized more clearly 
as a meflenger of the celeftial Monarch, fent 
to difperfe the bands of the wicked. How 
elevated is this; idea and this occupation, when 
compared with the offices and titles which the 
weftern nations and Bards attribute to their 
Aurora ? The time of terror and rapine 
among the ancients was that which preceded 
day-break, as even in modern times it is ftill 
the cuftom of the wandering Arabs to go out 
in fearch of plunder at that early hour. 

ALCIPHRON reads : 

" Haft thou entered into the fprings of the fea ? 
*&lt; Haft thou walked in the depths of the abyfs ? 
tf Have the gates of death been opened unto thee ? 
The gates of deftrudion haft thou beheld ? 

" Haft 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. I 69 

?* Haft thou perceived the breadth of the earth ? 
ft Declare if thouknoweft it all. 

Where dwells the light, and what is the way to it? 

And as for darknefs, where is the place thereof ? 

" Canftthou follow her to her limits ? 

&lt; c Knoweil thou the path to her domain ? 

" Oh! fureiy.thou knoweft it, for, no doubt, thou 

* wert then born, 
" And the number of thy days is great." 

EUGENIUS. Every thing here is perfoni- 
fied, the light, night, death and deftrudlion. 
Some of thefe have their feparate palaces 
others their houfes, their dynafties, their 
boundaries. It is a whole poetical world a 
jcpfmography. 

ALCIPHRON reads : 

" Had thou entered into the treafures of the (how ? 
&lt;f And have you there feen the treafures of the hail ? 
" Which I have referved againft the time of trouble, 
C } ? or war arid flaughter ? J&gt; 

EUGENIUS. One can fcarcely help per 
ceiving fomething that has an appearance of 
irony in this part of the poem. It is as if 
God, apprehending an attack from his ene 
mies, had prepared above, clouds of hail- 

ftones 



170 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

ftones as magazines of war, and held them in 
readinefs. However, in the atmofphere as in 
the abyfs, every thing is defcribed in the moil 
poetical manner. Proceed, if you pleafe. 

ALCIPHRON reads : 

" In \vhat manner is the light divided, 
" When the eaft- wind fcatters it over the earth ? 
" Who cpens a courfe for the waters of heaven, 
* c And a path for the thunder-clouds and lightning, 
" That rain may fall upon the lands, where no man is-, 
, &lt;* And on the wildernefs where no man is feen ? 
" To fatisfy the defolate and wade ground, 
( And to caufe the bud of the tender herb 
** To fpring forth in the folitary defart ? 

Hath the rain a father ? 

* The drops of the dew, who hath begotten them ? 

" Out of whofe womb cometh forth the ice ? 

i* And the hoary froft of heaven, who hath gen- 

" dered it ? 
&lt; c The waters rife into mountains, and become as 

ftone, 
" And the furface of the waves is bound in froft. * 

EUGENIUS. This certainly is fublime 
poetry, rich in imagery powerful and im- 
preffive in defcription. It alfo takes in a wide 
range both of celeftial and terreftrial objeds, 

Above* 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 171 

Above, the light comes forth in ftreams, and 
the eaft-wind carries them over the land :-the 
Father of heaven and earth forms canals for 
the rain, and marks out a courfe for the 
clouds. Below, the waters becpme a rock, 
and the waves of the fea are held in chains of 
ice. Here, indeed, all is reality, perfoni- 
fication and energy. And peculiarly beauti 
ful and elevated are the defcriptions which 
follow : 

&lt;c Canft thou bind the fweet influences of Pleiades, 

" Or loofe the bands of Orion ? 

" Canft thou bring forth Mazaroth in his feafon ? 

" Or canft thou guide ArRurus with his fons ? 

" Knoweft thou the ordinances of heaven ? 

" Canft thou fet the dominion thereof in the earth ? 

" Canft thou lift up thy voice to the clouds, 

s&lt; That abundance of waters may cover thee ? 

ct Canft thou fend lightnings that they may go, 

" And fay unto thee Here we are ? 

4&lt; Who has directed withwifdom the clouds in their 

4&lt; courfes ? 

s&lt; And given underftanding to the meteors of heaven ? 
f Who counts the drops of the rain, 
&lt;f And ilays the cataracts of heaven fo that they fall 

" gently, 
&lt;e And waters the duft that it may hang together ?" 

pupENius, Thus ends the defcription of 
y/hat is called the inanimate creation : but 

Indeed 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

indeed there is nothing here which is not 
animated by the magic power of poetry ; 
nothing lifelefs, no dead inactive beings. 
The conftellations, that lead on the lovely 
fmiling fpring, are here reprefented as a fifter- 
train : Orion is an armed man who brings 
on the winter : The figns of the Zodiac ap 
pear as a garland, which defcends gently 
towards the earth :-The Father of heaven 
permits the Hear to feed with her young ones 
at the north-pole, or, (according to a different 
mythology and reading,) the night-wanderer^ 
a mother of ftars, who feeks her loft chil 
dren, (the fetting luminaries,) is comforted by 
Him, probably with a new and fucceeding 
progeny. "When at night the conftellation of 
the greater bear is feen to move, as if he were 
grazing with his young ones in the vault of 
heaven, as the poets exprefs it ; and w^e ob- 
ferve how the belt of the zodiac, with its 
figns or figures in beautiful array, changes 
gently its pofition and afpeft with the courfe 
of the revolving feafons : When we confider 
this, and at the fame time recollect, that in 
the earlier ages, the fhepherds who fed their 
flocks by night, under an unclouded fky in 
the Eaftern hemifphere, had thefe ob~ 

jefts 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 173 

jecls always before them, and gave them 
a kind of life, in the ruftic fimplicity of 
their wandering fancy ; when, I fay, we 
confider all this, we muft be particularly 
ftruck by the beauty of the paflage you 
have been reading. Of the fame kind is 
the following paffage, in which GQ& perfonifies 
and treats as intelligent beings, the dark abyfs, 
the wandering clouds and meteors. All thefe 
images ; the lightnings furnmoned, and their 
anfwer 5 God s walking upon the clouds ; 
his counting the drops of tbe rain; the left 
and gentle defcent of the mowers at his com 
mand : all thefe conftitute a beautiful Nature- 
poetry. 

ALCIPHRON. Youfeem to bean admirer 
of this fpecies of beauty ; and yet Our critics 
look upon it as the coldeft kind of poetical 
compofition : fcarcely will they allow it to 
be called poetry. In their opinion it is only 
mere defcription of things and forms, which 
are not always fufceptible of defcription. 

EUGENIUS. If this were the cafe, I would 
readily grant that fuch perfonifications did 
not deferve the name of poetry. Mere fer- 

vi!e 



174 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

file defcription of external objects is not 
poetry in the true and noble fenfe of that 
word. Thcfe laborious fcrjbblers, who paint 
the fpring, the flowers, the thunder, the ice^ 
the winter, in a manner which prefents 
nothing to the imagination, and confine them- 
felves to exact and fervile defcription, are 
neither true poets nor animated writers. To 
conftitute what I call the true poetry of Na 
ture, more is required, my friend, than a 
circumftantial and exad defcription of par 
ticular objects. 

ALCIPHRON. Explain your meaning 
more fully. 

si EUGENIUS. You know the very word 
poetry comprehends, in its fignification, creat^ 
ing power ; and imagination, which is its 
prime agent, has the magic faculty of vivi 
fying even inanimate objects, and giving 
them aftlon and perfonality, as you fee here in 
Job s diverfified and beautiful fcenery. For 
here the earth is a palace, of which when the 
foundations are laid by its Creator, the 
morning ftars^Jffg- together, and all the fons 
of God Jhout for joy. The ocean is a new- 
8 bora 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 175 

born child laid in its fix addling bands ; the 
dawn knows its place ; the lightnings fpeak ; 
each image is a new perfonification, and it is 
this circumftance which gives fuch animation. 

to the poetry of the Hebrews. 

ALCIPHRON. This may be true, but 
who will dare to imitate the bold imagery 
the arduous flights of the Eaftern bards ? To 
reprefent the ocean as a fwaddled child^ and 
the Creator as forming ftcre-houfes for the 
hail and /now, and channels in the Jirmanunt 
for the waters, are fuch bold, (I was going 
to fay) fuch audacious figures of fpeech, that 
I muit alk you again, who will dare to ibar 
fo high in the airy region of poetical licence J 

EUGENIUS. I fliould not, indeed, advife 
any of our bards to attempt it. Every 
people, language, and climate have, refpedt- 
ively, their peculiar rules and their particu 
lar advantages for poetical compofition ; and 
it would betray a great poverty of natural 
.genius to borrow fervilely from fuch remote 
nations, however they may have excelled : 
but we muft purfue the fame path in which 
they proceeded, and draw from the fame 

fource 



ij6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

fource by which they were fupplied. 
by this path and this fource, I mean Nature; 
and efpecially animated Nature. He to whofe 
eyes and perceptions Nature does not appear 
full of life, to whom fhe does not fpeak in a 
language both clear and affecting^ with 
whom fhe is not in friendly concert ; that 
perfon is not born to be a poet. Nature will 
be to him a dead mafs, and will alfo appear 
lifelefs and infipid in his defcriptions. 

ALCIPHRON. From all this one would 
think, that the early times of ignorance were 
more favoured than the fucceeding periods of 
improvement and knowledge, in which the 
careful ftudy of Nature produced fo many 
important difcoveries. In the former, poetry 
painted ; in the latter^ philofophy only 
defcribed. 

EUGENIUS. What do you mean by igno 
rance ? In all nations, where people had the 
ufe of their lenfes, they knew well thai 
Nature, of which they fpeak in their poetry; 
nay, they knew it better, and more feelingly 
for their purpofe, than the learned Botanift 
does from the Vocabularies of Linnaeus. It 

is 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 177 

is a matter indeed of prime confequence in 
Botanical Science, to enumerate and arrange 
the various kinds and clafles of natural objects, 
and to point out their fpecific differences ; 
but this does not render them fubjedls of 
poetical reprefentation. I love to think of 
thofe early times, in which the views of 
Nature, though lefs minute, accurate, and 
exteniive, were, neverthelefs, productive of 
noble^and elevated feelings^ when it was 
contemplated, principally in its relations to 
man, and was thus beheld with fenfibility and 
admiration. 

ALCIPHRON. You are always carrying 
me back to the times of ignorance ; and you 
are ingenious in your endeavours to render 
them venerable. 

EUGENIUS. In every period of time 
the fpirit and genius of poetry muft be in 
fluenced and regulated by the ideas men have 
of the fyftem of the univerfe, and of the 
affemblage of beings which come under 
their obfervation. If they think proper to 
overlook thefe, they muft at leaft flatter them- 
felves with the hope of producing a greater 

N effeft 



178 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

effect and making more lively impreffions by 
a fabulous nature than by adhering to the 
real truth of things. And is not this, my 
friend, often the cafe, even in more advanced 
and enlightened times ? The Philofophical 
Sy Items of Copernicus and Ntiaton^ and the 
difcoveries of ftill more modern philofophers 
may, no doubt, furnifh fubjects for poetry 
as iiiblime and affecting as thofe which more 
Ample views of Nature have, in effect, pre- 
fenteci to the illiterate obferver ; but why 
have we never teen this polfibility realifed ? 
Why have thefe learned and philoibphical 
difcoveries furniihed ib little to the poetry 
of Nature ? Whence comes it that the iimple, 
fabulous poetry of ancient and illiterate times, 
makes more lively impreffions on our minds, 
than the philofophieal difcoveries and meta- 
phyfical views of Nature and Man which 
have crowned the reiearches of modern Sages? 
I fee no other way of accounting for this than 
by fuppofing, that, in the early periods of the 
world, the innple bards of Nature viewed her 
appearances and operations with more lively 
feelings, from a notion that Nature was -the 
immenfe habitation of a Being, fnnilar in 
fome refpects to themielves, and that in this 
great dwelling all things were, in fome mea- 

Cure, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 179 ^ 

+ 

fure, animated, fufceptible of love and hatred, 
and poffeffed of beneficent or pernicious in 
fluences. The firft poet who (hall venture to 
contemplate the world of NEWTON, or even 
ofDefcartes, under this point of view, will 
make the fame lively impreffions on /his 
readers which accompanied the poetry of the 
ancient bards ; an impreffion, however, con 
nected with more accurate ideas and more 
enlarged views. It is much to be wifhed that 
fuch a poet may foon arife! In the mean 
time, let us not depreciate the fublime beauties 
which are to be found in the poetry of ancient 
nations, becaufe their bards were not natural 
philofophers nor metaphyficians. Many of 
their allegories and perfonifications difplay a 
more lively fancy, and alib a richer fund of 
ideas than are to be met with in bulky fyftems 
of philofophy ; and as to their power ot 
affedting the heart, that needs no proof. 

ALCIPHRON. - I muft however confefs, 
that what you call \hzpoetry of Nature, does, 
not appear to me fo affedting as you repre- 
fent it. 

EUGENIUS. It undoubtedly affedts in a 
pleafing and durable manner, and more fo, 

N 2 in 



l8o ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

i 

in truth, than any other poetry. Can any 
thing be more affecting and impreflive, than 
that kind of poetry which fpeaks to us, as it 
were, from God himfelf in the revolving 
feafons, in the wonders of each returning 
day, and announces his prefence with a voice, 
that goes throughout the earth, and words that 
reach to the end of the world? Is it not true 
that we live in the houfhold of God in the 
great family of the univerfal PARENT ? And 
do not both our pleafures and pains tend 
naturally to render this exalted, this delight- 
/p ful idea interefting to our hearts ? That 
fpecies of poetry, therefore, which prefents 
this idea to our thoughts, which gives us, as 
it were, an eye to contemplate the univerfe, 
to reflect upon ourfelves, and fo to connect 
and confider thefe objects, in their mutual 
relations, as to make us perceive all around 
us omnipotence, wifdom, and love ; fuck 
poetry is facred and fublime : it pleafes the 
fancy, it gratifies the underftanding, it com 
forts the heart. Where, O my friend, is the 
ion of affliction, who, in the midft of his 
forrows, raifing a penfive eye to the ftarry 
heavens, does not find his anguifh gradually 
ibothed by the great and glorious afpect of 

thofc 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. iSl 

thofe bright luminaries, which, in the folemn 
mence of the night, announce the glory of 
their Creator? and feel his complaints and 
mental pains imperceptibly changed into 
effufions of praife ? Nay, on fuch an occa- 
fion, it fometimes happens that a ray of fere- 
nity and hope diffufes its comforts through 
the fuffering mind. Recollect the queftion 
of the Almighty Haft th on bound ths fivect 
influences of Pleiades? The reader of feeling 
will confider thefe w r ords as addrefled to him 
from the ftarry heavens. This is the true 
fpirit, the genuine effect of the poetry of 
Nature. It is the true, the fublime Inter 
preter of the perfections and ways of God. 
It is not verbofe, but. by a word, it often 

/ * &gt; *^^w^-w *".* 

unfolds elevated ideas and affecting fcenes to 
the imagination of the poet, and fends them , 
directly and with energy to his heart ; morejl 
eipecially if his heart be endued with lenfibi-j/ 
Jity, and the love of what is great and good. * 

ALCIPHRON. The poets of Nature then, 
as you call them, muft have been always 
diftinguifhed by their J^nfibjj^tj^jnj^ 
voJence. 

N 3 ETJGE- 



l82 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Eu GENIUS. Without doubt this is the 
character of thofe poets of a fuperior order, 
whom Nature marks for her own; for fuch 
alone are capable of obferving with pene 
tration, and expreffing with perfpicuity, grace, 
and power, her wonders and her beauties. 
That poetry which is employed on low and 
contemptible fubje&s, which is always fearch- 
ing into the impure recefles of the .human 
heart, and, at the fame time, paints its objects 
In a lively and pleafing manner ; fuch poetry 
is adapted to corrupt both the bard and his 
reader. This, religious poetry neither does 
nor can do. As the field of contemplation 
it opens, is large and extenfive, fo does it 
proportionably elevate and ennoble the mind. 
It produces, no doubt, a variety of effeds 
and impreffions on different perfons accord 
ing to their refpelive tempers, characters., 
and improvement. It makes fome fedate and 
circumfpecl:, others active and ardent ; but it 
has certainly a tendency to render all free and 
cheerful. It infpires univerfal benevolence, 
It gives the underftanding vigour and acute- 
nefs in inveftigating the laws of Nature, and 
leads the inquifitive mind into the right path 
for ufeful difcoveries. All this is more efpe- 

cially 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 183 

dally true with refpect to the poetry of the 
Eaftern nations. 

ALCIPHRON. Do you think it alfo ap 
plicable to the poetry of Job ? 

EUGENIUS. Certainly, my friend! It 
would betray a palpable want of judgment, 
Indeed, to drain the phyfical fenfe of certain 
particular and poetical expreflions in fuch a 
manner as to give them the colour of modern 
fyftems, and to make Job fpeak and think in 
the manner of our philoibphers. Neverthelefs, 
the great idea that the world is the houfe, 
the family of God, in which he prefides as 
the univerfal Parent, in which all is directed 
by eternal rules and a perpetual attention to 
the minuted objects ; this idea is predominant 
in the Book of Job, and it is an idea equally 
elevated and affecting. It is illustrated by 
examples ; it is enforced by a multitude of 
particular incidents and events, which all in 
dicate a uniform defign, a regular connexion, 
and terminate in one ultimate and general 
purpofe. The moft wonderful phenomena 
are exhibited as the acts, the productions of 
a Parent-Creator always pervading, and ani- 

N 4 mating 



184 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

mating by his influence the univerfal fyftem. 
Shew me a poem in which the fyftem of 
Nature (as it prelents itfelf to our obfer- 
vations and refearches,) is difplayed in fuch 
bold fketches, with fuch animated perfonifi- 
cations, and with fuch a graceful mixture 
of uniformity and variety as in the Book of 
Job, and even in the chapter now before us ? 
Do not forget, I befeech you, the three effen- 
tial requifites in a perfect poem ; a lively re- 
pref^ntation of objects to the fenfes^ animated 
defcriptions of Nature for the heart ^ and a 
regular defign or plan, (fimilar to that which 
takes place in the creation,) for the under- 
Jlattd wg. The laft of thefe is often neglected 
by many of our modern painters of Nature. 

ALCIPHRON. You require what to me 
feems impoffible. How little can we perceive 
of the general plan of Nature in the parti 
cular fcenes of her operations ? The empire 
of this omnipotent Parent is fo vaft, her 
procedure fo flow, her views fo extenfive . . . 

EUGENIUS. Therefore you imagine, per 
haps, that the produ&ion of her poet muft 
be equally flow, progreffive, and vaft ? 

This 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 185 

This may be requiring too much. However, 
my friend, let me tell you plainly, that the 
bard to whom this great Parent has imparted 
no idea of her plan, her defigns, and the 
unity of her operations, muft impofe filence 
on his mufe, and not permit her to fing of 
Nature s works and ways. But he, for whom 
the great Parent has drawn afide her veil, and 
whom me has permitted to behold her, face 
to face, let fuch a bard point out to us the 
connexion, order, and benevolent arrange 
ment which reign fo confpicuoufly in all her 
works. The poetry of fuch a bard will be * 
(like the Creation) xorpog, a regular produc 
tion, formed and finiined on a clear plan, 
with wife circumfpection, and right views : 
and thus it will enliven Nature, and render 
its objects peculiarly pleafmg both to the un- 
derftanding and the fenfes. In the kingdom 
of Nature all things are connected, and to the 
eye of man they are connected in a manner 
that is analogous to his perceptive powers, 
and his mode of exiftence. The feafons of 
the year refemble the different periods of 
our duration. Lands and climates are con 
nected by the human race : ages and worlds 
are bound together by their derivation from 

one 



186 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

one ETERNAL CAUSE, God the Creator: 
He is thus, in a certain fenfe, the eye of the 
univerfe in all its boundlefs extent, and that 
EYE reduces all things to one point of view 
to immenfe UNITY. This view of things 
leads us again eaftwards ; for the Orientals 
introduced into their Nature-poetry unity of 
defign, as its principal and predominant cha 
racter, however rich or barren it might be in 
ebjeds : they faw, in all things, and in all 
places, the God of heaven and earth, the 
ONE SUPREME. This was not the cafe 
among the Greeks, Celts, or Romans. How 
far in this refpedl is LUCRETIUS below JOB 
and DAVID ? 

ALCIPHRON. You think and feel much, 
my friend, in the Oriental manner, efpecially 
with refped: to perfonificatlon. Read, how 
ever, our critics, and you will fee how earn- 
eftiy they exhort poets to employ this orna 
ment fparingly. 

EUGENIUS. If it deferves only the name 
of a mere ornament, and they confider it only 
as a piece of poetical finery, they are certainly 
in the right. But I do not look upon it in 

15 this 






ORIENTAL, DIALOGUES. 187 

this light : I confider it as life,foul^ animation^ 
a&ion. OSSIAN is not an Oriental bard, nor 
is he even a. painter cf Nature ^ in the ftridl 
and proper fenfe of that phrafe ; and, never- 
thelefs, all objecls are perfonified by his 
creative mufe. All is full of life and motion 
in his poetry, the winds, the waves, even 
the head of a thiftle. The fun is an active 
youth: the moon a virgin, who has other 
moons for her fillers in the firmament : the 
evening-ftar is a graceful boy, who comes 
forward, mines and retires. In a word, 
Offian, in the article of perfonification, may 
be called Job s brother. Of this I can give 
you a very pleafmg proof. Read the four 
pieces I have in my hand, and I am fure you 
will be fatisfied with the psrfonifications of 
the Eaft*. 



* Thefe four Pieces are the Addrefles of Offian to the 
fetting Sun, the rifing Sun, the Moon, and the Evening 
Star. 



( i88 ) 

OSS IAN. 

TO THE SETTING SUN. 

Haft thou left thy blue courfe in heaven* 

Golden-haired fon of the fky ! 

The Weft has opened its gates ; 

The bed of thy repofe is there. 
The waves come to behold thy beauty ; 

They lift their trembling heads. 

They fee thee lovely in thy fleep ; 

And fhnnk away with fear. 
Reft, in thy fhadowy cave, O Sun ! 

And let thy return be in joy. 



TO THE MORNING SUN. 

O Thou that rolled above, round as the (hield 

of my fathers ! 

"Whence are thy beams, O Sun 1 
Thy everlafting light ? 
Thou comeft forth in thy awful beauty ; 
The ftars hide themfelves in the fky ; 
The moon cold and pale finks in the weftern 

wave. 

But thou thyfelf moveft alone : 
Who can be a companion of thy courfe ? 

The 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 10 

The oaks of the mountains fall : 

The mountains themfelves decay with years : 

The ocean (hrinks and grows again : 

The moon herfelf is loft in heaven ; 

But thou art for ever the fame, 

Rejoicing in the brightnefs of thy courfe. 

When the world is dark with tempefls ; 

When thunder rolls and lightning flies, 

Thou looked in thy beauty from the clouds, 

and laugheft at the ftorm. 
But to Oflian, thou lookeft in vain ; 
For he beholds thy beams no more ; 
Whether thy yellow hair floats on the Eaitern 

clouds, 

Or thou trembled at the gates of the Wefh 
But thou art perhaps, like me, for a feafon, 
And thy years will have an end. 
Thou (halt ileep in thy clouds, carelefs of the 

voice of the morning. 
Exult then, O Sun ! in the flrength of thy 

youth ! 

For age is dark arid unlovely ! 
It is like the glimmering light of the Moon,, 
When it iliines through broken clouds, 
And *he mift is on the hills : 
The blaft of north is on the plain ; 
The traveller fnrinks in the midft of his journey 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 



TO THE MOON. 

Daughter of Heaven, fair art thou I 

The iilence of thy face is pleafant ! 

Thou comeft forth in lovelinefs. 

The ftars attend thy blue courfe in the Ea(L 

The clouds rejoice in thy prefence, O Moon ! 

They brighten their dark-brown fides. 

Who is like thee in heaven, light of the filent 

night ! 

The ftars are afliamed in thy prefence. 
They turn away their fparkling eyes. 
Whither dofl thou return from thy courfe, 
When the darknefs of thy countenance grows ? 
Haft thou thine hall, like Offian ? 
Dwelled thou in the fhadow of grief? 
Have thy fifters fallen from heaven ? 
Are they, who rejoiced with thee at night, no 

more ? 

Yes ! they have fallen, fair light ! 
And thou doft often retire to mourn. 
But thou thyfelf (halt fail one night, 
And leave thy blue path in the heaven. 
The ftars will then lift up their heads : 
They, who were afhamed in thy prefence, will 

rejoice. 

Thou art now clothed with thy brightnefs : look from 
thy gates in the fky.~- Burft the cloud, O wind, 
that the Daughter of Night may look forth ! that 
the fhaggy mountains may brighten, and the ocean 
roll its white waves in light. 



ADDRESS 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 19! 



ADDRESS TO THE EVENING STAR. 

Star of defcending Night ! fair is thy light in the weft ! 
Thou lifted thy unftiorn head from thy cloud : thy 
ileps are (lately on thy hill. What dofl thou be 
hold on the plain ? The ftormy winds are laid. 
The murmur of the torrent comes from afar 
Roaring waves climb the diftant rock. The flies of 
Evening are on their feeble wings ; the hum of 
their courfe is on the field. What doft thou be- 
hold, fair Light ? But thou dolt fmiie and depart. 
The waves come with joy around thee : they bathe 
thy lovely hair. Farewell, thou filent beam ! 



DIALOGUE V. 

A pifturefqite view of the animal creation-* 
Inquiries into Jotfs place of abode Whether 
It was in the valley o/^Gutta near Damaf- 
cus ?- T*he proverbial exprejjions in the book 
of Job y are of Idumean origin Concern 
ing the Egyptian images in thai book Whe 
ther the author of it was an Egyptian ? 
Whether by the Behemoth we are to under- 
Jland the Elephant or the Nile-horfe ? 
Whether Motes was the author of the book^ 
which bears the name of Job, or found it 
during his fojourning with Jethro ? When 
this book was known in Judea ? Whether it 
was tranfiated from the Arabic , or origin 
ally compofed in the Hebrew language ?- 
Whether the bijtorical introduction to the book 
is of the fume date with the book itfdf? 
Whether the idea of Satan in this book is of 
Chaldean origin Concerning the difcourfes 
of Job, his friends and accufers, and the 
fpirit of jurifprudence and philojbphy which 
appears in their reafonings on the difpenfa- 
lions of Providence. 







( 95 ) 



DIALOGUE V. 

./ILCIPHRON. I long much, my friend, to 
hear the fecond part of the difcourfe which 
God addrefles to Job, and in which the ani 
mals alfo are reprefented with the perceptions 
and feelings of human beings. I (hall read 
the paflages and leave it to you to explain 
them*. 

e&lt; Wilt thou hunt the prey for the lion, 
" Or fatisfy the defire of the young lions, 
" When they couch in their dens, 
(f And abide in the covert to lie in wait ? 

cc Who provideth for the raven his food, 
While his young ones cry unto God, 
And wander for lack of food ? 

&lt; c Knoweft thou the time when the wild goats bring 

" forth? 

" Or canft thou mark when the hinds do calve ? 
&lt;e Canft thou nurnberthe months that they fulfil, 
&lt;{ Or knoweft thou the time when they bring forth ? 

They bow themfelves, they bring forth their young 
" ones-, 

* Chap, xxxix. 

02 They 



196 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

They caft out the children of their forrows. 

c Their children are vigorous ; 

* f They grow up in the wildernefs ; 

" They go forth and return not unto them." 

The ravenous ferocity of the lion, the de 
formity of the young raven, which is never- 
thelefs an objed of God s providential care, 
and the defcriptions which follow, are beauti 
fully pi&urefque. 

ALCIPHRON reads: 

Who hath fet the wild afs free, 
" And loofed the bands of his fer vitude ? 
" The wildernefs I gave him for a houfe, 
The barren wildernefs for a dwelling : 
" He fcorneth the multitude of the city, 
" Neither regard e.th he the voice of the driver : 
" The range of the mountains is his pafture, 
And where the green tufts of grafs appear, thither 
" doth he climb." 



EUGENIUS. With what an animated and 
genuine fpirit of liberty is the nature of this 
animal defcribed ! The bleak and barren 
wildernefs is his habitation, which he prefers 
before the noife and hurry of the crowded 
city. He is not conftrained, like his enflaved 
brethren, to liften to the voice of the driver, 

but 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 197 

but fnuffeth up the wind at his pleafure, cafts a 
wild look towards the verdant hills, and feeks 
out, with ardour, every tuft of grafs. He 
lives, indeed, poor in his defart, but he has 
all he wants, and is free and frolickfome. 

Then follow the beautiful defcriptions of 
the ojlrich, the horfe^ and the eagle, which 
form the conclufion of feven pidures from 
animal nature in the moft brilliant manner. 

ALCIPHRON reads : 

&lt; The oftrich foars exulting on triumphant wings : 

Cf She trufteth her eggs to the earth, 

" And warmeth them in the duft, 

" And forgetting that the foot may crufh them, 

" Or that the wild beafl may break them; 

" She is hardened againft her young ones, as if they 

" were not hers : 
" Her labour is fruitlefs becaufe (he careth not for 

" them ; 

" For God hath deprived her of wifdom, 
" Neither hath he imparted to her underftanding. 
" Yet me lifteth up herfelf on high, 
" And fcorneth the horfe and his rider. 
" HaPc thou given the horfe lirength ? 
" Haft thou clothed his neck with thunder * ? 
" Canft thou make him fpring up as a grafshopper ? 

* Or, Haft thou adorned bis neck with a wavwg mane ? 
o 3 The 



198 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" The glory of his noftrils is terrible * : 

" He paweth in the valley and rejoiceth in his 

* ftrength j 

&lt;c When he goeth to meet the armed men, 
" He mocketh at fear and does not tremble, 
" Neither turneth he back from the fword. 
" The quiver rattleth againfthim, 
" And the glittering fptar and (hield. 
He fwalloweth the ground with fiercenefs and rage 5 
Neither believeth he that the trumpet founds. 
" He faith among the trumpets, Ha, ha. 
" He fmelleth the battle aiar off, 
" The thunder of the captains and the moating. 
" Doth the hawk fly by thy wifdom, 
** And fpread out her wing before the wind ? 
&lt;c Doth the eagle mount up at thy command, 
" And make her neft on high ? 
&lt;c She abideth and dwelleth upon the rock, 
" Upon the crag of the rockher ftrong place. 
" From thence (he watcheth her prey, 
" And her eyes behold afar off. 
&lt;e Her young ones alfo fuck up blood ; 
" And where the flain are there is flie." 

Eu GEN i us. Obferve, I befeech you, the 
fpirit, energy and truth which animate and 
enliven thefe three pictures. The oftrich is 
boldly painted by her towering flight, and the 
fudden emotion of wonder which it excites. 

* Or, His tremendous neighing excites terror. 

Her 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 199 

Her forgetfulnefs and fhipidity are wifely 
ordered by the Creator. Had this bird been 
endued with more fagacity and inftindlive 
fenfibility, fhe would fuffer keenly for her 
young ones, w hich fhe is obliged to leave be 
hind her in her flight to the wildernefs. 
Therefore hath the Creator withheld from her 
fagacity and forefight, and formed her for 
that rapid and winged motion, which is ac 
companied with the wild cry of exultation 
and joy. As to the defcription of the borfe, 
I think it the fineft that was ever given of that 
generous and noble animal, as the region in 
which this book was compofed was alfo the 
moft remarkable for furnifhing the bed horfes. 
He is here reprefented as the Arabians con- 
fider him, that is, as an intelligent, bold, 
warlike animal, which exults in victory, 
and whofe proud neighings have a grand 
effect amidft the war-ftiouts and acclamations 
of heroes. The eagle, finally, portrayed in 
a mafterly manner with refpecl to his royal 
afpecl:, his elevated dwelling, his thirft of 
blood, and his dexterity in purfuit of his 
prey, concludes the feries. It is terminated, 
as you fee, by a monarch of the feathered 
tribe, as it commenced with the king of the 

o 4 four* 



2OO ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

four-footed animals. The fea-monfters, 
Behemoth and Leviathan, now follow. 

ALCIPHRON. I fhall read the account of 
them when I am alone what I particularly 
defire at prefent, is, that you would give me 
your ideas concerning the general purpofe for 
which all this imagery, and all thefe pic- 
turefque defcriptions are introduced, as alfo 
with refpecl: to the tenour and connexion of 
the dialogues which we find in this ancient 
and remarkable book. I fhould likewife be 
glad to have fome information relative to the 
time and place in which the writer lived. 

EUGENIUS. As to the place, that cannot 
be determined until we know who the writer 
was. The firft and moft eflential point to be 
cleared is, Where the fcenes deicribed in this 
book were exhibited ? or, in other words, 
Where Job lived ? If the hiftorical intro 
duction, prefixed to this poem, be of high 
antiquity and worthy of credit, (as it appears 
to be,) then Job muft have dwelt in the land 
of I7z Where then was this little canton 
fituated ? 

* ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 2OI 

ALCIPHRON. It was, perhaps, the 
charming dale Gutta, near Damafcus*, 

EUGENIUS. If this be fo, the Introduction 
is at variance with the Book. For in the 
latter we meet with no fcenes but fuch as are 
Arabian or Egyptian. Nothing that is parti 
cularly relative to Syria is obfervable in Job s 
poetry, though that country, as you well know, 
was rich in natural and beautiful fcenery. 
We fhall therefore give up this opinion, which 
feerns to be founded only on a modern oral 
tradition, and inveftigate the matter by con- 
fulting the Hebrew writings. Have you 
no recollection of a place called Uz, befides 
that which is near Damafcus ? 

ALCIPHRON. Yes the name is given in 
the book of Genefisf , to one of the children 
of Edom. 

EUGENIUS. And where has Jeremiah 
placed the daughters of Edom ? 



: This was the opinion of the learned Michaelis. 
f Genefis, xxxvi. 28, 



ALCI- 



202 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. Rejoice, and be glad, O 
daughter of Edom, that dwelleth in the land of 
Uz*! 

Eu GENIUS. Nothing can be more clear. 
And from whence came the friends who 
vifited Job, and confequently muft have 
lived in the fame neighbourhood ? Eliphaz, 
as well as.Teman, was mentioned by Mofes 
among the fons of Efauf. In feveral places 
Teman is made known by the Prophets as a 
country or city of Edom J, eminent for 
wifdom and men of good counfel, fuch as 
Eliphaz here feems to be. Bildad of Shuah, 
Zophar the Naamathite,-and Elihu of Buz, are 
all from the diftridls or neighbourhood of 
Idumea. Suah was a near relation of Dedan, 
who alfo lived near Idumea. The other 
cities are likewife named by Joihua ; and, 
upon the whole, the manners, which predo 
minate in this book, are Idumean Arabian. 

ALCIPHRON. Did knowledge abound fo 
early in Idumea ? 

* Lamentations, iv. 21. f Genefis,* xxxvi. n , 12. 
J Jeremiah, xlix. 7. 

5 EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 2OJ 

EUGENIUS. If it had not made a confi- 
derable progrefs there, the poet would not 
have placed with propriety the fcenes of his 
piece. But he was a better judge of thofe 
remote objects than we can poffibly be. If 
certain fuperficial thinkers among us, were to 
decide on this head, they ^^pould, perhaps, 
with a temerity not uncommon, reject the 
whole book, and affirm, that in fuch an early 
period, and in fuch rude and barbarous 
times, it is impoffible that fo much wifdom. 
and fuch an exteniive knowledge of Nature 
could have exiited. Neverthelefs, every de- 
cifion of this kind is openly and pofitively 
contradicted by more than one prophet. 

ALC IPHRON. By what prophets ? 

EUGENIUS. By thofe who, in their time, 
when Edom was already brought under the 
yoke, regarded this fmall territory as a maga 
zine of Oriental, i. e. Arabian wifdom. The* 
-wife men of Teman, the fages of Edom, feem 
to be alledged as noted examples, and have 
been confidered as proverbial on this head*. 

* Jeremiah, xllx. 7. Obadiah, verfcs 8, 9. 

We 



-204 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

We know now in what the Oriental, i. e. 
the Arabian wifdom, confided. It was made 
up of proverbs, fublime images, and enig 
matical fentences, of which the book under 
consideration furnifhes many and remarkable 
examples. Befides, the fcene and the manners 
which it exhibits are entirely Edomitical. 
Job is an Emir^ and his friends were probably 
Emirs alfo ; and they who, in the books of 
Mofes, were afterwards called princes ofEdom, 
were undoubtedly Emirs. It is farther to be 
obferved, that the book of Job contains 
nothing that has any relation to the laws 
of Mofes. It abounds with ideas rela 
tive to jurifprudence ; but they all breathe the 
fpirit of an Oriental or ;?2/&gt;-legiflation. 
This fpirit reigns from the firft to the lafl 
chapter. It is the vital principle, as it were, 
of the whole book. 

ALCIPHRON. The book, however, con 
tains feveral descriptions of objects which are 
entirely Egyptian ; fuch as the Nile, (which 
here, as among the Egyptians, is called the 
fea^) the papyrus , the crocodile^ the Ifle of the 
dead 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 05 

EUGENIUS. You may add the Behemoth^ 
which was, probably, the Nile or river-borfe ; 
the fepulchres of the kings ; nor muft we 
forget the elephantiajis : but it is, neverthe- 
lefs, certain that Job did not live in Egypt, 
and the manner of thinking, which predomi 
nates in this book, is by no means Egyptian. 
It is the Hebrew or Oriental mythology that 
reigns in all the poems of which it is com- 
pofed ; and I ufe the word Oriental here, as a 
general" denomination for all the languages 
which are connected with the Hebrew. 
The ideas of the Deity, of the univerfe, of 
the origin of the world, of man, fate and re 
ligion, are truly Hebraic or Oriental, and in 
no other language are they fo properly and 
happily exprefled. The Egyptian images and 
ideas, which are employed in this book, bear 
the diftinftive marks of a foreign derivation, 
of riches brought from far. It is evident 
that this kind of Afiatic fplendor reigns 
throughout the book, in fimilitudes, compa- 
rifons, and allufions to the ufeful and liberal 
arts. We find treafures of Oriental wifdom 
in places where we fhould have little expected 
them ; this is alfo the cafe with many inte- 
refcing defcriptions, which feem to be placed m 

where 



2o6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

where we find them, merely on account of theif 
rarity, and as curious morfels of natural hif- 
tory. This is more efpecially true with re- 
fpedt to the accounts of the o/lrich, the behe 
moth, and the leviathan. Had the two laft of 
thefe animals been common in the country 
where Job lived, they would not have been 
fo circumftantially and fo pompoufly de- 
fcribed. But they are introduced as foreign, 
unknown, and wonderful beings : this is the 
reafon of their appearance on the fcene. 

ALCIPHRON. We can thus, methinks, 
eafily diftinguim between the fubjecls which 
were particularly known and familiar to the 
writer of this book, and thofe which he did 
not find at home, but which exifted in 
neighbouring lands. 

EUGENIUS. Very eafily. The manners, 
opulence, and jurisprudence of the Emir are 
perfectly known and familiar to him. The 
oblation is known to him ; but it is a patriar 
chal oblation ; for Job prepares and prefents 
it as the head of a family. Arabian defarts, 
fountains dried up, marching hords and cara- 
vanferas, bands of robbers, inhabitants of 

caverns 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

taverns lions and wild afles are frequently 
mentioned in this book. All the forms of 
the Afiatic jurifprudence, and many other 
circumftances and objects of fmaller import 
ance, feem plainly to point out that diftricT: 
in which the Septuagint places the fcene of 
this book even Idumea. On the other 
hand, the treafures of Mauritania, and the 
rarities of Egypt, appear only as ornamental 
famples of the author s learning. The levia 
than and behemoth come forth at the end of 
the book. 

ALCIPHRON. You faid that Behemoth has 
been confidered as the Nile-horfe or Hippopo 
tamus: but it generally pafles for the ele 
phant. 

EUGENIUS. In the opinion perhaps of 
fome modern writers. But according to the 
old and general opinion, the behemoth was 
the fame animal with the rhinoceros ; and 
not only the teftimonies of a refpedable num 
ber of learned men, but alfo remarkable and 
decifive circumftances in the defcriptions of 
the animal plead for this opinion. It is evi 
dent that the behemoth was an aquatic ani 
mal, 



208 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

mal, fince it is mentioned as fomething rare 
and extraordinary that he eats grafs like the 
cattle, that the hills furnifh him with food, 
and the beafts of the field fport with him. 
He fleeps in the reeds, and lies concealed in 
the mud under the banks of the river, and 
all thefe are circumftances which have no 
fort of relation to the elephant. He goeth 
againft the ftream, as if he meant to fwallow 
it, and thus is manifeftly a water animal. 
His Jtrength is in his loins, and his force is in 
the navel of bis belly, which is precifely the 
weak part of the elephant. His bones are as 
Jlrong pieces of brafs his back-bone is like a 
bar of iron. He that made him has provided 
him with afword (or harpoon), which indi 
cates plainly the long extended teeth of the 
rivcr-borfc *, while he is alfo placed together 
with the crocodile, in oppofitiori to the land- 
animals which form a feparate fpecies, and is 
confidered as a monfter (as the Orientals con- 
fider all aquatic animals) which terminates 
the animal kingdom. This opinion feems to 
be well founded ; and, if I am not much mif- 
taken, will in a little time be generally adopted. 

* Or Hippopotamus. 

Confult 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Confult on this head Bochart^ Ludolph, and 
Reimarus-) and you will find a remarkable 
agreement in their defcriptions of this out- 
landifh monfter. 

ALCIPHRON. But what do you fay of the 
fnout which he is faid to move and project 
like a cedar ? 

Eu GEN i us. There is no mention made 
of a fnout, but of a tail : nor is it the length 
of the cedar-tree, but rather the curvature of 
its branches which forms the point of compa- 
rifon. This circumftance of the branches of 
the cedar, is mentioned in the old verfions ; 
but we have dwelt long enough on this fub- 
jecl:. By whom do you think this book was 
compofed ? 

ALCIPHRON. It is faid to have been com 
pofed by Mofes when he lived in the family 
of Jethro. 

EUGENIUS. I am forry to be again under 
the neceffity of oppofing an ancient and gene 
ral opinion. I have a very high idea of 
Mofes as a poet ; but of this poem he cer- 

p tainly 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

tainly \fras not the author. I fhould as foon 
believe that Solon compofed the Iliad of 
Homer, or the Eumenides of ^fchylus. I 
will venture to affirm, that I have ftudied the 
fpirit of this poetry, and that of Mofes, with 
the greateft and the moft unprejudifed atten 
tion: I have alfo taken into confederation 
the variations in ftyle which may be produced 
by change of circumftances, lapfe of time, 
and diverfity of occupations ; but, neverthe- 
lefs, I muft ftill confider the poetry of JOB 
and that of MOSES as totally different from 
each other in ftyle and manner of expreffion. 
The former is fententious, bold, rich in 
ideas and images, and always in the higheft 
manner of pidurefque reprefentation : the 
latter is, even in the fublimeft paflages, more 
foft and flowing : nay more the ftyle and 
imagery, which are peculiarly remarkable in 
the poetry of Mofes, are not to be found in 
the book of Job : the voice that ftrikes us here 
is rough and abrupt, like a found tranfmitted 
through rocks and precipices, and not fuch a 
one as bears any conformity with the flat and 
uniform territory of Egypt. We find in the 
book of Job the genuine tone and manner of 
an Arabian, aa Idumean, exprefied both in 

the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 211 

the outlines of his pictures, and in little fa 
vourite touches which are peculiar and cha~ 
ra&eriftic. The imagination of the Bard 
feems to have been formed in his youth, and 
to have kept always its form, particularly in 
thofe lines which announce early impreffions. 
JOB is fo abundant in patriarchal and juridical 
defcriptions of the Eaftern Emirs, which he 
applies to the fupreme Governor of the 
world, that it is eafy to perceive in what 
country he was born and educated. MOSES 
faw nothing of this kind in Egypt, nor were 
any of his anceftors Eaftern rulers or princes. 
He was an entire ftranger to the tone and lan 
guage of fuch perfonages ; and it would have 
been a real miracle if, befides his poems, 
his laws and writings, he had alfo compofed 
the collection of poems now before us a 
collection accommodated to the genius of a 
quite different nation, to the manners, ideas, 
and cuftoms of what we might call the 
people of another world. This I could fully 
demonftrate by confidering fucceflively, the 
different pieces which compofe the book of 
Job ; but you can yourfelf eafily make the 
comparifon and draw - the conclufion. 

p 2 ALCI- 



212 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. But might not Mofes have 
tranflated this poem from the Arabic, while 
he fojourned with Jethro ? 

EUGENIUS. For my part I fhould be 
much pleafed to find that the poem had got 
among the Hebrews by the means of Mofes ; 
but how can this be proved ? The work, as 
it appears to. me, is not a tranflation, but an 
original compofition in the Hebrew language. 
I fee no reafon for confidering it as a tranfla 
tion. It bears a ftriking refemblance to the 
Arabian poetry ; and confidering the proxi 
mity of Iduinea to Arabia, this circumftance 
may naturally have produced a firnilitude 
between the ideas, manners, and poetical 
fpirit of the two countries. 

ALCIPHRON. Is it not poflible at leaft that 
Mofes may have found the book ia the family 

of Telhro ? 
J . t 



EUGENIUS. You feem unwilling to think 
that Mofes loft his time while he kept Jethro s 
flieep. But I muft tell- you, my friend, that 
though I fhould really T wilh to fee your fup- 
pofition confirmed, I ftill think it highly im 
probable. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

probable. If this book, which contains fuch 
an admirable collection of poetical pictures, 
had been known to the Hebrews by the 
recommendation of Mofes, we fhould find 
in the poetry of that people, more imitations 
of its manner and contents than w r e at prefent 
perceive. Have you never obferved how 
the prophets imitate and even copy one 
another ? how they borrow from each 
other imagery and expreffions which they 
employ each in his way, without adding 
any thing of their own ? But the book of 
Job, like a venerable old pyramid, ftands 
alone on its own foundation. It is not, and 
perhaps cannot be an object of imitation. 

ALCIPHRON. There are, however, if I 
am not miftaken, feveral imitations of it in 
the Pfalms, 

Eu GENIUS. Imitations perhaps of parti 
cular paffages and defcriptions : but you 
muft recoiled; that, in the time of David, 
Ifrael had an eafier and more direct way of 
being acquainted with Edom, than in the 
time of Mofes. 

F ALCI- 



214 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. True for David brought 
Edom under the yoke. 

EUGENIUS. And you may add, that this 
people refufed to Mofes even a paflage 
through their country. You muft alfo con- 
fider, that it was not at all agreeable to the 
defigus of Mofes or his manner of thinking, 
to borrow books or religious ideas from the 
nations of Canaan, fince his great objeft was 
to keep the Ifraelites as much as poffible, 
feparate in all things from other nations. 
Now in the time of David, things and cir- 
cumftances were greatly changed. When this 
monarch caft his Jhoe over Edom *, the trea- 
fures of fcience which were found there came 
within his power, as well as the conquered ci 
ties, and this monarch, who gloried as much 
in poetical as in regal acquisitions, muft have 
been highly gratified by any literary treafures 
which he might meet with among the fpoils 
of that conquered nation. It was in purfuit of 
thefe, that he met with this- venerable pro 
duction of ancient wifdom, this noble pane 
gyric on the ftedfaft piety of one of the ancient 

* As a mark of its fubje&ion* 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 215 

Emirs ^ which muft have been perufed with 
fingular pleafure by fuch a prince and patri 
arch as David. If, therefore, in fome of his 
later pfalms we find paflages which look 
like imitations of this ancient book, this only 
fhews that he felt the fublimity of this kind of 
poetry, and mingled it, fometimes, either 
through choice or imperceptibly, with his 
Idyllian numbers. I have not, however, 
found many paflages where this imitation is 
remarkable ; it is ftill lefs perceivable in the 
prophets, and Ezekiel is the firft who men 
tions the name of Job. For my part, I 
follow the moft ancient account we have of 
this venerable book ; it ftands in the Septua- 
gint tranflation, and is as follows : " This 
" book is tranflated from the Syriack, (from 
" a manufcript in Syrian characters). Job 
" lived in the territory of Aujltis^ onthebpr- 
" ders of Idumea in Arabia. His name was 
ct Jobab. He defcended by his father s fide, 
tc from the children of Efau, the fifth from 
" Abraham. The kings of Edom were by 
" name, Balak the fon of Beor, Jobab who 
&lt;c was named Job, &c. The friends who came 
" to him, were Ellphaz an Edomite, prince 
* 4 of Theman, Ealdad Emir of Suah, Zo- 
P 4 " pbar 



2l6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" phar King of Minaeers." Now you cannot 
fay that this account is entirely fabulous, 
fince it is not contradicted by any thing in 
the book itfelf. It may, however, be alleged 
that it has arifen from the refemblance in 
found between the names Job and Jobab^ 
and thus is only founded on the genealogy of 
the Edomites, which is given by Moles. 
What fhall we fay ? Perfect certainty is not 
attainable in matters of fuch remote antiquity, 
nor is it neceflary to our underftanding the 
book under confideration. * / 

ALCIPHRON. Do you think the hiftori- 
cal introduction to the poem as old as the 
poem itfelf ? 

EUGENIUS. I have fometimes had my 
doubts of this ; but on farther enquiry they 
appeared to be ill founded. The firft chap 
ters are compofed with fuch a patriarchal fim- 
plicity, graceful brevity, and calm fublimity, 
that they are entirely worthy of the author of 
the poem. I muft obferve farther, that the 
fcene in the firft chapter, is evidently the 
foundation of the whole book. 

i ~ vX t i . . . ..?* J.; .{4-i^ni . -1 * 

Attu* 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 11^ 

ALCIPHRON. But what, do you fay of 
Satan ? This is fuch a modern idea 

EUGENIUS, As . Satan appears here, I 
confider the idea quite otherwife, and as of 
the higheft antiquity. You muft take notice, 
that he is here among the angels, that is, in 
the family of the Supreme Monarch. , He is 
fent into the world to bring back an account 
of what pafles there, and he acts in perfect 
conformity with his commiilion. God fends 
him to Job : Sata/i follows exactly the or 
ders he had received, and the commiffion he 
executes is only a trial. God fits in judg 
ment ; for a confiderable time the procedure 
has not a promifmg appearance for Job, and, 
at the conclufion of the book, no more men 
tion is made of Satan. You fee then, my 
friend, that this tranfaction gives an idea of 
Satan totally different from that which the 
Chaldeans formed of him, and, therefore, I 
was fingularly furprifed to find that Mr. 
Heath and other learned men after him, con- 
fidered the whole book of Job as a Chaldean 
production. Here they have entirely mif- 
taken the matter. The Chaldean Satan is the 
Qrmufd, the firft principle of evil : but this is 

not 



2l8 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

not the character of the Satan in Job. I 
would not compare the latter, even with the 
Typbon of the Egyptians, or the being whom 
the moft ancient fathers of the human race dU 
flinguifhed by the name of the Evil Genius. 
The Satan of Job is the recording Angel of 
God, a meffenger fent forth to examine and 
difcover, to punifh and correct. 

ALCIPHRON. You furprife me ! 

Eu GEN i us. Every age* and every people 
get imperceptibly into the habit of transferring, 
in fome meafure, to heaven and hell, their 
own manners, cuftoms, and methods of 
tranfading bufmefs. In the firft chapter of 
this book God is reprefented as an Emir^ 
who fits in heaven, and at certain times 
affembles his fervants, the angels, to bring ac 
counts of the things which happen or are 
carried on upon earth. Accordingly Satan 
is fent down into the world to try Job, and to 
fee whether he is or is not a true worfhipper 
of God, and faithfully devoted to his fervice. 
What then follows from this proceeding? 
For a long time Job appears as a perfon who 
had been condemned without having been 

heard, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 21$ 

heard, and thus punifhed unjuftly. He only 
wifhes and wifhes with a noble confidence, 
to fee his Judge and to plead his caufe before 
him. His friends are advocates for God : 
they vindicate the conduct of the fupreme 
Judge towards him, and employ all the 
powers of their eloquence and art, nay, fome- 
times, even evafions to demonftrate its juftice. 
At length the Sovereign appears with majefty, 
and pronounces fentence in Job s favour* 
Job is filent is reflored to his profperity 
and is amply indemnified for the injuftice that 
was done to him. This is the true plan of the 
book. 

ALCIPHRON. I fliould be glad to fee this 
plan, which you have Iketched in fuch 
an interefting manner, more amply illuftrated 
and finifhed. 

EUGENIUS. I have employed fome pages 
on this fubjecl:, in which you will find both 
the thread of the difcuffion and the characters 
of the pleaders *. 

* See the Appendix to this Dialogxn. 

ALCI- 



20 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

ALCIPHRON. There is then, you think, 
a connexion between the difcourfes of the 
fpeakers, and a thread that binds together the 
fubjedts of their converfation ? 

EUGENIUS. Moft certainly, though not 
in our manner. Job begins with his com 
plaint* ; the three friends, or rather accufers, 
produce their arguments. lie anfwers them. 
The conteft becomes warm and obftinate ; 
it is renewed at three different times j~ ; but 
at the third conference Zophar does not ap 
pear. Job having vanquiflied his adverfaries, 
remains alone on the field of conteft, and 
continues to maintain his caufe in a fenten- 
tious difcourfe, which contains fome of the 
moft beautiful paflages that are to be found in 
this book J. He defcribes his former profpe- 
rity, his prefent affliction and innocence, in 
terms the moft affeding, and concludes with 
the following wifh : 

&lt;f Oh that one would hear me 1 

&lt;c Oh that the Almighty would anfwer me ! 

" And that fome one wrote my caufe in a book ! 

" Surely I would take it upon my moulder, 



* Job, iii. f Chap. iv. xiv, xv. xxi, xxii. xxvi. 
J Chap, xxvii. xxxi. xxxv. xxxvii. 



And 



ORt ENT AI/ DIALOGUES. 42 1 

** And would wind.it as a princely ornament about 

" my turban ! 

fs I would declare unto him the number of my fteps. 
" As a hero would I o near unto him. 



As fuch he appears in reality and permits 
Elihuto fpeak without interruption until God 
appears as fupreme Ruler, with inexpreffible 
majefty. 

t r " " *-* I i " i\ 

ALCIPHRON. We are r then to confider 
this book as a kind of drama, or theatrical 
compofition ? 

?:m. f : f r! (Li// ,r T! i.; j vnuir- ; 

EUGENIUS. A dramatk compofition^ in 
our manner, it .certainly is not; How could 
fuch a= fubjedt,. confidering the defign with 
ivhich if was treated, be prefented in a dra- 
nYatic manner? Here there is no .-aftion. 
All is ftill,/ and exhibits nothing beyond the 
tenor -of ordinary converfation. Long dit- 
cotirfes an d proverbial fentences conftitute the 
eflence of the book. The hifiorical part of it, 
in the beginning and the conclufion, may be 
called, if: you pleafe, prologue and epilogue^ 
for I fhall not difpute about words. There 
is alfo, I grant, a certain kind of divifion and 
arrangement in the conferences, but nofcenes 

in 



22 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

in the proper and dramatic fenfe of that term. 
We have here a meeting, a company of fomc 
fages, who pleads/or and againft the juftice 
and equity of the fupreme Ruler of the 
world in a given cafe a philofophical conteft 
on the caufe between God and Job, confe- 
quently no drama. 

ALCIPHRON* You think, then, that this 
book is founded on a real hiftory ? 

EUGENIUS. That is a matter quite indif* 
ferent to me, with refped to the arrangement 
of its contents and its defign^ which I have 
endeavoured to point out. It is effentially 
the hiftory of all virtuous fufferers upon earth, 
in all places and periods of the world, I 
acknowledge, neverthelefs, that I find a cer 
tain pleafure in thinking that fuch a man as 
Job did really exift, and that he was diftin- 
guilhed by the magnanimous character and 
elevated underftanding which are attributed to 
him in this book. On this fuppofition, the 
book is for him a memorial fuch as he wiihed 
for a memorial more folid and permanent 
than that which is engraved on brafs, or carved 
n a rock. This memorial is infcribed 

deeply 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 223 

deeply in the hearts of the virtuous and the 
wife, and engraven with indelible characters 
on the tables of endlefs fame. 

ALCIPHRON. But furely you cannot 
think that all the converiations which we 
find in this book were held in reality ; nor 
is it to be fuppofed that certain things which 
are here related, fuch as QQ&S fitting in judg 
ment l , and his vifible prefence, were real events. 
The appearance of Satan, alfo, and feveral 
other relations, muft naturally be confidered 
as poetical fidions, though founded on real 
and important truths. The difcourfes, more 
over, delivered by the feveral interlocutors, 
do not feem to have been extemporary effu- 
flons. And then an unhappy fufferer . . . 

EUGENIUS. The compofition of this 
book is undoubtedly poetical from the begin 
ning to the end ; but it is a poem which, in 
all its parts, (ketches and paints from Nature 
and truth. The Orientals were fond of fuch 
meetings, fuch learned conventions as we 
find here, of long reafonings in elevated ex- 
preflions and proverbial phrafes, propofed 
and anfwered with an eloquent facility. It 

5 was 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

was with an intention to exhibit fuch a literary 
conteft, that the lublime and pious poet fat 
down and chofe for his fubjed: the painful 
ftruggles of fuffering virtue, and both the 
conquefts and the defeats of human wifdom. 
How far hiftorical fad: was the object on 
which thefe conferences turned, and whe 
ther the difcourfes were delivered in reality, 
and at one or more fittings, thefe are 
points which it concerns us little to know. 
The poet has certainly treated the fubjedt in 
the nobleft manner, and difplayed a perfect 
unity of defign in the whole compofition, 
It is only under this point of view ^ that I mean 
at prefent to confider it, and when thus con- 
fidered, I think it will appear to be the moft 
ancient literary compofition now exifting. 

ALCIPHRON. I am much pleafed with 
this idea. It is highly interefting to know 
what the fages of the moft ancient times 
thought concerning the providence of God 
and the deftination of man. 

EUGENIUS. We muft on another occa- 
fion examine the traditions of the eaft, rela 
tive to the creation and deftination of the hu 
man 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

tnan race. We fliall then find ourfelves in a 
garden, blooming with poetical ideas, and 
perceive a great variety of flowers and fruit 
which were tranfplanted from thence into the 
poetry of later times. I think this inveftiga- 
tion will pleafe you. You know what a 
high value the Orientals, and indeed all thofe 
who are attached to the pleafures of the 
imagination, fet upon thefe fragments of 
the -ancient world,- the fay ings, names, me 
moirs, and tranfadlions of the firft patriarchs. 
It is upon thefe, that the earlieft poetry and 
the whole train of ideas, obfervable in the 
Book before us, were really founded. 

ALCIPHRON. I fhall follow you with 
great pleafure in your Walk through the gar 
den of the ancient world of the Hebrews. 

EUGENIUS. In the mean time, here is 
the Piece relative to the book of Job, which 
I mentioned to you ; you may look over it 
at your leifure. 



Q,. 



APPENDIX 



TO TH 

FIFTH DIALOGUE: 

CONTAININS 

AN ANALYTIC VIEW OF THE BOOK OF JOB 

CONSIDERED AS A COMPOSITION. 



A HERE is a twofold fcene in this book, which is 
carried on, at the fame time, in heaven and upon 
earth. The afiion is carried on above ; the conver- 

ationy relative to it, is held below. The terreftrial 
reafoners know nothing ofthedefign of the cekflial 
actors -, and hence the plot, or tranfaction, goes 
backwards and forwards as if it had no iblid found 
ation. This is very frequently the cafe among 
philofophers, and thofe who undertake the vindi 
cation of the divine government. 

The fubject of the book is a virtuous man who 
fuffers innocently, and who is vifited even with 
fevere bodily pains and difeafes. His plaintive 
exprefiions are therefore excufed, fince even a hero 
is not di&onoured by fuch expreffions under acute 
bodily fufferings. He perceives the approach of 

death, 



228 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

death, and longs for its arrival. His life is bltter- 
Jiefs Why may he noc figh and complain ? 

The fufferings of Job are to terminate in a vin 
dication of the juftice and glory of God : his cala 
mities were permitted in order to verify the folemn 
declaration of the Creator with refpecl: to him. 
Can man fuffer for a nobler purpofe ? The great 
defign of the book, is a vindication of the fupreme 
Governor of the univerfe, very different from that 
which is here undertaken by the wife men of this 
world ; though it mult be confeffed that their ob- 
fervations are fomctimes juft, and their fayings ele 
vated and fublime. 

But their difcourfe brings no confolation ; it 
rather embitters than ibothes the pains of the fuf- 
ferer : Job even furpaffes them in his fublime repre- 
fentations of God s wifdom and power, and, riever- 
thelefs, ftill continues unhappy : a common cafe, 
this, in fcenes of affiition, when the fources of 
confolation are fought for here below. The views 
of Job s friends are too narrow and limited : they 
look for foundations of comfort in the dud, when 
they are only to be found above the flars. But 
who, among them, can rife fo high ? None of them 
entertain the leaft idea that the caufe of Job s fuf 
ferings muft be fought for in the place which was 
pointed out in the beginning of this book*. 

Chap. i. 8 12. ii. 3, 6. 

How 



APPENDIX. 229 

How is the dunghill ennobled on which this fon 
of affrclion lies, faying to the worm, Thou art my 
father I It is a fctne worthy of the contemplation 
of angels, and of all the heavenly hoft. Job vindi 
cates his virtue, and julliries the declaration of his 
Creator, who holds forth the crown and covers him 
with glory. 

This twofold fcene, and the invifible fpectators, 
who are intent upon the mannerin which Job 
fhall bear his calamitous trials, render the whole 
tenor of the book interefling and facred. 

* 

The man, who is to exhibit to celeftial beings a 
fublime example, of human ftrength and perfever- 
ance, appears upon earth engaged in a painful con 
flict of vvifdom ; and here lie is a man like other men. 

The facred poet reprefents him with an irritable 
and ardent temper, which appears foon in the hif- 
tory j for even at the firft difcourfe of Eliphaz, 
which was mild and fedate, it carried him too far, 
and betrayed him into impatience. At the fame 
time this temporary ferment contributes to the re 
inforcement of his virtuous feelings. It alfo ani 
mates the converfation, which would have been 
tedioufiy prolix if Job had not poured forth his 
complaints, and if his friends had only prefented 
to him confolatory exhortations. 

Q 3 Through 






330 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Through all thefe difcourfes and reafonings there 
runs a fine thread , which gives them an interefting 
connexion. The three Arabian fages argue and 
declaim againft Job, who furpafTes them in the 
conteft, both as a phiiofopher and a poet. The 
moft temperate andmodcft of the three is Eliphaz, 
who, in his firft attempt to counfel and correct 
Job, fpeaks not as of himfelf, but as on the part of 
God*. Bildad attacks the fufFerer more keenly; 
and Zophar exceeds them all in the feverity of cen- 
fure : he is alfo the firft who retires from the combat. 

There are three repeated attacks made by the 
combatants f. At the end of the firft, the bufmefs 
is already carried fo far, that Job appeals from his 
accufers to God J. In.the fccond, the thread of the 
difcuffion is the moft entangled and perplexed ; and 
here, indeed, is nearly the knot of the controverfy ; 
for at the end of this onfct, Job himfelf proves 
againft Zophar, that events turn out favourably, 
alfo for the wicked , to which he is inconfiderately 
led merely by the warmth of the conteft. Eliphaz 
endeavours, by an ingenious turn of fophiftry, to 
make a diverfion from the fubjecl ; but the dif 
cuffion is too far advanced, and Job perfeveres. 
Bildad has little to propofe |j ; Zophar is reduced to 
iilence^ ; and Job obtains the victory. He appears 
like a lion in the midft of flaughtercd enemies, re- 

* Chap. xv. 12, &c. f Chap, iv xiv. xv xxi. xxii xxvi. 
J Civa p. xiii. Chap. xxf. j| Chap. xxiv. f Chap xxv. 

yokes 



APPENDIX, 231 

vokes what he had inconfiderately thrown out in the 
heat of controverfy *, and brings forth, in three 
divifions or parts, proverbial fentences and wife 
reflections, which form one of the principal orna 
ments of the bookf. 

However uniform the general tone of theie dif- 
courfes may appear, they exhibit ftriking and mod 
intercfting effects of light and made. The thread 
of the difcuflion continues dill the fame, but the 
confufion in treating the fubjecls upon which it 
turns, increafes from conference to conference, 
until Job grows more calm, reflects with more pru 
dence, and foftens the harih things which he had 
advanced with too much ardour and precipitation. 
It is necefTary to attend carefully to this circum- 
ftance ? and alfo to obferve how Job wrefts from 
the hands of his adverfaries their weapons, and turns 
them againft themfelves, either by expreffing better 
and with more -precifion what they had advanced, 
or by employing their proportions and arguments 
to the confirmation of his own opinions. They who 
do not give a proper attention to this cireumftance, 
will not feel the true beauties nor enter into the 
genuine fpiritof this wonderful book. 

Job begins with a beautiful elegy J, and he gene- 
nerally doles his difcourfes with effufions of fen- 

* Chap, xxvii. f Chap, xxviii. xxxi. J Cliap. in". 

0^4 iibilicy, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

fibDity, which are plaintive and pathetic. Thefe 
refemble, more or lefs, the chorus in ancient tra 
gedy : and they render the contents of the piece 
highly interefting. 

After the victory of Job over the wife men, a 
young prophet appears in the fcene *. He is (like 
many of the enthufiafts who affume that title) pe 
tulant, audacious and fclf-fufficient. He pours 
forth pompous drains of eloquence without meaning 
or purpofe, and, accordingly, nobody deigns to an- 
iwerhim. At the appearance of the Almighty, he 
vanifhes as a fh &lt;dow. His intervention, however, 
in the general arrangement of the piece, is wifely 
managed and inftrudive. 

God appears of a fudden and with majefty. He 
interrupts the prophet in his reafoning : the pro 
phet, without knowing it, had dcfcribed his ap 
proach, but had, however, declared it impoffible. 
God fpeaks to Job, but takes no notice of the de 
fenders of his providence. He fpeaks to him fir ft, 
not in his quality as Judge, but as a lage f : -He 
propofes to him, who thought himfclf ib well in- 
(Iru6led in all things, a variety of queftions relative 
to the myfteries of creation and providence. The 
wife men of the earth (land confounded. 

* Chap, xxxii. xxxvii. -j- Chap, xxrviii. 

Then 



APPENDIX, 233 

Then comes a defcription of feven wild animals, 
and alfo fea- mongers, which the great Father of all 
had created, and to which, as the objeds of his 
bounty, he daily extends his providential care. 
Why were thefe creatures brought into exigence ? 
They are not dertined for the uie of man. The 
greateft part of them are even hoftile and detri 
mental to the human race. The wife men of the 
earth (land again confounded at theic queftions, and 
are afhamed of their ignorance : hence the duty of 
iubrniffion under an humble fenfe of God s infinite 
wifdom and man s imperfect views, and the (tak 
ing marks of benignity and care which the Father 
of the univerfe extends even to the crocodile and 
the raven. This is the folution of all the questions 
relative to the government of the univerfe and the 
lot of humanity, and it comes from the mouth 
of the iupreme Ruler himfelf, who pronounces it 
in the midlt of a tempeft, and addrelTes it to the 
whole creation. The true &lt; Tbeodicea ) or way to 
vindicate the divine government, is to itudy with 
attention the goodnefs, wifdom, and power of the 
Deity, in the general arrangement and conftitution 
of Nature ; and, at the fame time, to acknowledge 
with humility, that his immenfe plan and deep de- 
figns infinitely furpafs our limited and narrow views. 
Accordingly, we fee that God does not make known 
to Job the particular reafons for which he had been 
vifited with the (harp trials of adverfity ; he only 
reftores the fufferer to his profperity and in 
demnifies 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

demnifies him for his fufferings, and more than 
this what could a mortal expect ? The common 
place reafonings, conjectures, and difcuflions, which 
we ufually meet with among thofe who undertake 
to vindicate the ways of Providence, come fo little 
into confideration here, that they feem rather to 
have required an expiation, which Job was obliged 
to make upon the occafion. 

The plan, the fcope of the book is truly fublime. 
I have given here only fome feeble lines of its pre 
cious contents. If it was not compofed by an 
Eaftern prince, it is, at lead, worthy of a writer of 
high rank as well as genius ; for the ideas and ftyle 
of the writer are, indeed, elevated and noble in the 
higheft degree. Through the whole work the Su 
preme Being acts as a Monarch, a Father, and a wife 
Benefactor to the whole creation : angels and men, 
the raven and the behemoth, are equally the ob 
jects of his providential care. The moit beautiful 
and elevated defcriptions of the divine perfections 
and government, the mod rational fources of hu 
man comfort, the various reaibnings of fophifts and 
fages concerning the ways of Providence and the 
deftinatton of man, are found in this book, not in 
words and phrafes fo much as in events, and efpe- 
cially in the fublime fptdtacle of a great and good 
man ftruggling with adverfity : Eccejpeftaculum dig- 
num ad quod refpiciat intentus cperijuo Deus Vir 
forth cum mala for tuna compofitus ! 

" And 



APPENDIX. 235 

ef And where is thy grave, O venerable Sage, rq 
" whom we are indebted for this ^heodicea^ this 
" Epic treafure of celeftial wifdom derived from 
cc a fimple ftory, the ft ate of a fufferer on his 
" dunghill in all the variety of wretched nefs, -a 
* f fufferer, whom thou haft adorned with the 
* c brighter! rays of wifdom and virtue, which break 
cc forth with luftre through the gloom of his forrow ? 
" Where is thy grave, fublime Bard, who fee me (t 
" to have been entrufted with the fecrets of hea- 
cc ven, and to have known the ways of angels and 
* c men&gt; thou who didft comprehend heaven and 
" earth in one rapid and fublirne point of view, and 
&lt;c who from the abodes of forrow and the gloomy 
" manfions of the dead, didft mount on the wings 
&lt; c of poetic fancy, holy faith, and elevated dcfircs, 
&lt;f even beyond the flarry frame ? May the cyprefs 
" preferve always its bloom and verdure on the 
cc place where thou art laid ! Is that place un- 
* c known as well as thy name, which thou haft 
" withheld from our knowledge ? However :.hat 
* 6 may be, thy work remains and it will be to thee 
" for .an everlafting memorial. It will bear teiti- 
" mony to thee, while exalted far above our fpoc 
" of clay, and the clouds that cover it j thou flialc 
ec for ever fing Halleluia to the SOVEREIGN, 
&lt;c with the morning ftars and the celeftial armies 
" that rejoice before his throne. 

&lt;c Or, 



236 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" Or, wert thou thyfelf the hiftorian of thine own 
cc forrows, humiliation, and triumph ? Wert thou 
cc thyftlf the happy child of affliction, the perfc- 
* e cuted man and the rewarded faint ? Then didft 
" thou alleviate the forrows of thy heart by its pious 
fe effufions, as thou haft perpetuated the triumphs 
of thy virtue through ages and worlds. From thy 
fc afhes has fprung up, with this book, a triumphant 
* e palm, whofe roots drink the fpring of Immorta- 
cc lity,-and whofe branches fhall not wither, Thou 
cc haft made heaven defcend gently upon earth, and 
f * ranged the celeftial armies around the death-bed 
" of the righteous. Hence his fufferings become 
&lt;c an object of the contemplation of angels, and a 
ie token of God s love of his creatures, on whom 
&lt;f he looks from above with a gracious eye, as it 
&lt;c were, to juftify his ways and to difplay the equity 
&lt;c of his government in their deliverance. It is, 
&lt;c therefore, with propriety that we count thofe 
" happy which endure: Tehaveheard of the patience 
" of yob i and havejeen the END of the Lord, that 
&lt; e the Lord is pitiful and of tender mercy V 

* James, v. H 



DIALOGUE VI. 

The origin and dejliny of man His name bor 
rowed from fragility weaknefs duji~ 
Elegy of Job on the dejliny of man~0f the 
breath or SPIRIT of God confidered as the em 
blem of power in thoughts, iv or ds^ and ac 
tion A hymn on the dignity of human na 
ture as bearing lines of the divine image 
"The high rank of man in the creation From 
*wbat idea an epic poem on human nature^ 
confidercdin its natural and fpiritual frame ^ 
muji fet out ? An UUift ration of this from 
the poetry of the Bible- Why the ear lie/} mo 
ral poetry and moral fcience miift be derived 
from GOD? Origin of the notion that was 
formed of the region or empire of the dead 
An elegy on this fubjeB Whether it is in- 
conjiftent or compatible with the immortality 
of the foul? A poetical view of graves in 
Oriental necrology , and of the manner of ex- 
ifting of the deceafed in them Pifiturefque 
defer ipt ions of the regions of the dead, made 
by the Hebrews &gt; Celts, and other nations 
Probable origin of the gigantic accounts of the 

region 



&gt; 

region of the dead given by the Orientals 
Why whole kingdoms and cities are f aid to 
Jleep there ? Of Belial the king oftheghojls 
orjJjadows, and of the fcheol his palace 
Images derived from hence in the New Tejla- 
ment Of the influence of thefe ideas on the 
human mind Of the tranflation of Enoch. 



. 



DIALOGUE VI. 

OOME time had pafled before the fubjecT: of 
the preceding conference was refumed. 
ALCIPHRON had loft one of his beft friends, 
who died fuddenly, and this event had funk 
his mind into a gloomy ftate ofinaclion and 
defpondency. At length, on a fine evening, 
when the fetting fun, which is a daily image 
of our great journey 3 was defcending beneath 
the horizon with unufual fplendour and 
beauty, he addreffed to Eu GENIUS, with 
that foft and penfive dejedion which was 
become the habitual difpontion of his mind, 
the following difcourfe. 

ALCIPHRON. You have perhaps forgotten, 
rny dear Eugenius, that expreffive fentence, 
that fundamental law which points out the 
origin and deftination of man in fuch an af- 
fe&ing manner earth to earth thou artdujl^ 
and to dijl thou Jhalt return. Of this Adam 
was the firft example : he returned to the bo- 
fom of mother-earth from whence he came. 
Duji to dujl^ is a voice which is perpetually re- 
founding 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

founding from all the flages of human life- 
It vibrates ftill in my ears from the laft fhovel 
of earth that was thrown upon the coffin of 
my friend ; and from that time I have taken 
a penfive pleafare in mufmg over feveral 
pieces of Oriental poetry, for which I had be 
fore no taite. All the denominations by 
which man is chara&erifed in that poetry, ex- 
prefs his fragility and vanity. They announce 
the term of his prefent exiftence. He is a 
cottage of clay , which the worm and the moth 
are perpetually gnawing a flower bending 
beneath the ftorm or parched by the fcorch- 
ing heat of the fun. It may perhaps be 
affirmed, that no poetry prefents the images 
of this tranfitory exiftence, this empty fhow, 
in fuch an affecting manner as that of the 
Hebrews, and they are all derived from the 
roots of the language itfelf, as the primitive, 
the original images of man s deftination* 

&lt;c Does it feem good unto thee to opprefs, 

" And defpife the work of thy hand* ? 

" Remember, I befeech thee, 

" That thou hail made me as the clay, 

4C And that I muft foon return to the duft again. 1 

* Job, x. 3, 9. 

i la 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 24! 

In this calm evening-twilight, while the fun, 
the guide of our earthly labours, has with 
drawn his beams, and the toiling race of man 
with the inferior creatures are finking into 
reft, permit me to read to you a plaintive 
{train which never made fuch an impreffion 
upon me as at theprefent moment. Job was 
truly a philofophical poet : he was well ac 
quainted with the nature and ftate of man : 
he knew what life is what it is not and 
what we have to expect when its courfe is 
fmifhed. Thus he fpeaks, or rather pours 
forth the folemn ft rain * : 

(S Hath not man the life of a fervant upon earth ? 
" Are not his days alfo as the days of an hireling ? 
" As a fervant earneftly defires the {hadow, 
" And as n hireling look eth f-jr the reward of his 

" work, 

" So am I made to poffefs months of vanity, 
" And wearifome nights are appointed to me : 
" When I lie down, I fay with a heavy figh, 
ec When (hall I rife, and the night be gone ? 
" For me the night is long and tedious, 
" And I am befet with fearful dreams, until the 

" dawning of the day. 

" My fleih is clothed with worms ?nd clods of dull j 
** My Ikin is broken ard become loathfome j 

* Chap. vii. i, &c. 

R " My 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

" My days have fled away ; 

" They have fled fwifter than a weaver s fliuttle: 

* And are fpent without hope. 

" O remember that my life is wind ; 

" Mine eye (hall no more fee good. 

" The eye that fought me (hall find me no more ! 

" Thine eye (hall feek me, and I am not ! 

(e As the cloud is confumed and vanifheth away, 

" So man defcends into the regions of darknefs, 

&lt;( And mall come up no more : 

" He fliall not again return to his houfe : 

&lt;s Neither fliall his place know him any more. 

* { Therefore I will not refrain my mouth -, 
" I will fpeak in the anguifh of my fpirit ; 
" I will complain in the bitternefs of my foul ; 
" Am I the Nile-flood or the crocodile thereof, 
" That thou fetteil a watch over me ? 

tf When I fay my bed fliall comfort me, 
*&lt; And my couch mall eafe my complaint, 
" Then thou fcareft me with dreams, 
" And terrified me with vifions, 
So that my foul chufes ftrangling, 
&lt; And death rather than lifer. 

I loath life ; I would-not live always : 

" Let me alone, for my days are vanity ! 

What is man that thou fhouldfl magnify him ? 

And that thou moulded fet thy heart upon him, 

" And that thou (houldeft vifit him every morning, 

" And try him every moment ? 

How 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 243 

* r How long wilt thou not depart from me, 
11 Nor l. t me alone until I draw my breath ? 
" Have I finned ? wh it have Tdone unto thee ? 
* f O thou preferver of men ! 
ft Why hail thou fet me as a mark ngainll thee, 
ff So that I am a burthen to myfelf ? 
&lt;f Why doft thou not pardon my tranfgreffion, 
" And take away mine iniquity P 
* * For now mall I fleep in the duft, 
ef And thou (halt feek me in the morning, but I 
" (hall not be." 

Here, my friend, you fee the lot of man ! 
"Thou art duft, and to duft thou JJjalt return. 
This is the original, the only oracle or decla 
ration of the Supreme Being with refpet to 
our deftination, and what more can this ta 
bernacle of clay, in which a tranfitory fpirit 
breathes, require in order to know that defti 
nation* 

EUGENIUS. But you feern to forget, my 
friend, that this houfe of clay is animated by 
the Infpiration of Jehovah ! You feem alfo to 
forget that this infpiration is the germ, the 
principle of all perfection, and even of 
immortality. You have not, I apprehend, 
fufficiently attended to the images equally fub- 
lime and affeding, which announce that in 

R 2 the 



244 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

the SPIRIT of the Almighty all power, all 
the wonders of thought and intelligence, all the 
energy of efficient will, all the fources of di 
vine confolation effentially refide and are- 
from thence diffufed into the human mind. 
Your prefect affliction confines ypur atten 
tion to only one afpedt of the lot and condi 
tion of man ; but there is another and a very 
different view of his condition and profpefts, 
exhibited with equal evidence in the Hebrew 
poetry. 

ALCIPHRON. With equal evidence? 
That is a bold affertion What is a breath 
an infpiration ? You do not furely think that 
the metaphyfical foul of our modern philofo- 
phers is to be found in a blaft of air ? 

EUGENIUS. No thank heaven ! nor in 
any analyfis of its powers in our ufual man 
ner, but in a much fuperior kind of inform 
ation, which afcertains the great object, even 
the eternity of its effence in the important in 
formation which tells us that this intelligent 
and moral prmciple comes from God and re 
turns again to him ; that in its frail habitation 
of clay it exerts divine powers, and particu 
larly 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 24^ 

larly that it is dependant on the word, on the 
breath of the Almighty. All this is fet forth 
in the plaineft and moil energetic manner in 
the poetry now under confideration. 



is 



ALCIPHRON. You furprife me. It 
there fcarcely unfolded at all. How late was 
it ere any fuch thing was thought of? In a 
book written before the captivity of Babylon, 
we read, for the fir ft time, that " the BREATH 
" (in our tranflation the^/V/V) flail return to 
" God who gave it- ;" and this is manifeftly 
a tenet of the Chaldean philofophy annexed to 
this old, plain expreflion. In the hiftory of 
Adam, the book of Job, and the Ffalms, we 
find nothing of it, 

EUGENIUS. To obtain clear ideas on this 
fubject, it will be proper to take a clofe and 
attentive view of the opinions relative to 
man s immortality, weaknefs and ftrength, 
particularly by inquiring into the true fenfe of 
that expreliion, that his foul is a breath or in- 
fplrction of the Deity. If I am not much 

miftaken, you have overlooked many things 

j o v 

* Ecclefiaftes, xii. 7, 

fc 3 winch 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

which are of real confequence on this fubjeft, 
or yielded too haftily to the impreffion of 
new opinions. Let us review the fubject j * 
it is highly interefting in many refpe&s. 

The/pint of God breathes upon me ; 

" The breath of the Almighty gives me life : 

" My countenance is like yours in the fight of God j 

* ( I am alfo formed of the clay as ye are. 

" As long as my breath is in me *, 

&lt; c As long as the fpirit of God is in my noftrilSj 

" My lips (hall not fpeak wickednefs, 

" Nor my tongue utter deceit f." 

Is this now feeble or vigorous ? 

ALCIPHRON. In words^ it is certainly 
highly expreffive and energetic, 

EUGENIUS. And what are words but the 
meflengers of thoughts,, of volitions, and all 
the powers of the foul. It was early confi- 
dered as fomething ftriking and wonderful, 
that the foul thinks, the tongue fpeaks, and 
the hand moves and ads : and, on attentive 
reflection, it muft, at firft, have appeared in* 
comprehenfible, that when the foul thinks 

* Chap, xxxiii. 4. 6. f Chap, xxvii. 3, 4. 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 247 

and wills ) its ideas or volitions are underftood 
by others merely by the intervention of 
the breath of the mouth. Even to the Deity 
breath or fpirit was afcribed as a mighty 
agent ; it was compared to the moft power 
ful caufes and agents in the natural world : 
nay, it was exalted far above them. While 
every thing elfe is tranfitory and tends to 
decay, fat fpirit of God remains and is aftive 
without ceafing, active as the winds which 
purify the air, quickening as the rain which 
defcends in fructifying mowers, enriches the 
earth, and animates and enlivens all things. 

ALCIPIIRON. True this is the fpirit of 
God in the kingdom of Nature, the immedi 
ate volition and exertion of his omnipotence : 
but as to the breath of God or his fpirit in 
man What does that mean ? 

EUGENIUS. Here alfo, its influence is 
mighty and truly divine : for hence arifes 
the important diftindtion in man between 
flefti and fpirit, or in other words, between 
human weaknefs and divine power. You 
f urely recollect the expreffion of the Moft 
High before the flood came upon the earth : 

.?. 4 My 



248 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" Myjpirit fhall not always dwell in man, 
For they a 



And we fee how this laft declaration was 
rifled by a univerfal degeneracy, and more 
efpecially by the influence of fenfual pleafure, 
and the weaknefs and effeminacy it produ- 
ccth. Let us go back to the firft intention 
with which God feems to have introduced 
the human fpecies into the world. They 
were deftined to be the image of the Eloblm^ 
a vifible copy of their invifible powers. Like 
the Elobim they were to be endowed with 
activity and fuperintendance. As you have, 
a moment ago, expreffed fo much fatisfadion 
at the recital of an elegy on the weaknefs and 
littlends of man, mail I now read to you a di 
vine hymn in which you will find a magnifi 
cent defcription of his power and dominion ? 
A Pfalrn which reprefents man as a kind of 
divinity upon earth as far exalted above all 
the other vifible works of Jehovah, over 
which he alfo exercifes dominion and as 
crowned with the luftre and glory of angelic 
natures? This Pfalmf feems to have been 
compofed exprefsly to exercife the piety of 

* Gencfis, vi. 3. f Pfalm viii, 

devout 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 249 

devout minds, and to be addreffed from grate 
ful hearts to the Author of nature under the 
vaft expanfe of the ftarry heavens, which at 
this moment fhine over our heads with inex- 
prefiible glory, 

PSALM viii. 

* c Jehovah, ou^ God, how excellent is thy name in 

all thr earth ! 

" Thy pralfe refounds through the heavens : 
t Out of the mouth of babes and fucklings 
c&lt; Hail thou ordained ilrength, 

" ^.gainft thine enemies, which they could not refift. 
" When 1 confider thy heavens, 
t( The work of thy fingers, 

&lt;( The moon and the ftars which thou haft ordained, 
" What is man that thou art mindful of him ? 
* f And the fon of man that thou fheweit him favour ? 
" Thou hall placed him a little lower than the 



t{ Thou hail crowned him with honour and glory, 
" Thou haft made him to have dominion over the 

" works of thy hands : 

Thou haft put all things under his feet ; * 
All {heep and oxen, and the beafts of the field, 
The fowls of the air and the fim of the fea, 
(f O Lord our God, 
How excellent is thy name in all the earth !" 

Apply, now, this pindaric hymn of praife to 
the work of creation, from the hiftory of 

which 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

which it was taken*, and then you will 
perceive, with a peculiar fenfibility, the ma- 
jefty with which man makes his appearance 
upon earth. When the natural world is 
finifhed, its Creator, if we may fpeak after 
the manner of men, feems to paufe he takes 
counfel with himfelf, v and draws, as it were, 
from the depth of his eflence, his ow r n image. 
The whole creation, which had not as yet re 
ceived its accomplifhment and its crown, 
fecms to wait for it in the filent expectation 
of its vifible chief. Now what affefting de- 
fcriptions have the Hebrew bards given of 
man, confidered not only with refped: to his 
natural powers, but alfo, and that principally, 
with refped: to his moral qualities and charac 
ter ! What elevated and beautiful ideas have 
they not drawn from the Old and New Tefta- 
ment, concerning the image of God as it is 
unfolded in the nature and moral constitution 
of man ! Adam was a fon of God. Enoch, 
Abraham, and the moft eminent of the patri 
archs, vrece friends of God. A fecond Adam 
appeared to exhibit to his brethren the true 
image of a fon of Jehovah, and thus to excite 

* Genefis, i, 

the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 25! 

the fons of men to admire the beauty, and 
afpire to the refemblauce, of tlvs glorious 
image. Where ihall we lind in poetry or 
prole a more noble idea of the ftate of ex- 
altatioR for whicu man is formed ? 

ALCIPHRON. I only apprehend that it is 
too pure and elevated for us. What do we 
know of God ? And how can a mortal at 
tempt .o imitate his perfect character, with 
out finking into defpondency under a con- 
fcioufnefs of his own impotence ? The hif- 
tory of our deflination, and the nature of our 
moral frame, muft be investigated, by arifing 
from the examination of ourfelves to the de- 
figns and purpofes of HIM that snade us. 
All true moral doctrine is derived from this 
two-fold fource ; from what man is, we can 
arrive at iome knowledge of what he is 
deftined to be ; and notices of the counfels, 
and purpofes of the maker , are in fome degree 
declucible from his works. The difcovery 
of our future deftination and moral frame 
muft be derived from the nature of man, as 
well as from the ccunfds of God. 

i 

EUGENIUS. Thefe two methods of in- 

veftigation 



2J2 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

veftigation are combined in all true moral 
dotrine. You have juft now remarked 
yourfelf, how graphically the weaknefs and 
littlenefs of man are defcribed in the Hebrew 
poetry. When confidered with refpecl: to 
the body, we cannot, according to the pure 
doctrine of the Eaft, be regarded as {hefoiis of 
God ; for God has no corporeal form, and we 
are clay. But a divine energy formed us, 
and the breath or fplrit of the Almighty is 
vifible on the animated human countenance. 
Now, my friend, a fpecies of poetry which 
never lofes fight of human infirmity, and yet 
is not deterred by this humiliating view, from 
attributing to man a noble origin and a fub- 
lime dejftnation fuch poetry is without, 
doubt elevated and rational. It holds forth 
man as a child of God, deftined for eternity, 
but, at the fame time, as a feeble, a mortal 
child .... 

ALCIPHRON. Aye, truly a child; for 
both the poetry and moral doctrine of the 
Eaftern nations exhibit ftriking marks of hu-* 
man infancy, weaknefs and dependance. 
There all the ideas of man are fuppofed to 
originate from God all moral obligation 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

and rules of ation are derived from his will. 
Now I need not tell you that this way of 
thinking mud, in the iiiue, reduce both the 
will and the intellectual powers of man to an 
ignoble ftate of duwfy indolence. It rnuft 
terminate in a blind and flothful fubmiffionto 
the will of God. In one word, it muft pro 
duce a kind of i/Iamifm. 

EUGENIUS. You recoiled:, I hope, the 
following reflections in the book of Job * : 

" Can the rufli grow without mire ? 
&lt;c Can the water-liliy grow without water ? 
c&lt; It is green before the fun, 
(( And its branch fhooteth forth in the garden 5 
* f But it witliereth before any other herb ; 
" So are the paths of all that foVget God, 
" And the hypocrite s hope fliall perifli, 
ff The hope of the wicked (hall be cut down, 
" And his truft (hall be a fpider s web. 
* f lie {hall lean upon his houfe, 
&lt;c But it {hall not {land j 
He {hall hold it fa ft, 
But it (hall not endure ; 
" Suddenly is he removed from his place, 
" And it {hall deny him, 
" Saying, I have not feen thee." 

* Chap, Yiii,.io/n, &c. 

ALCI- 



^54 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES- 

ALCIPHRON. You give me a lively pio 
t ure, but no anfwer to my quefiion. 

EuGENitfs. The picture, my friend, is a 
fufficient aniwer. All poetry without God, 
is a miferable rum without moiftiire. All 
moral do&rme without him is a plant fpring- 
ing up from froth. It blooms beautifully in 
words and fpreads its branches on every fide ; 
it even feems to penetrate into every recefs 
of the human foul : But what follows ? The 
fun rifes and it is no more. It is not my in 
tention here to depreciate, in any degree, 
pfychologlcal refearches or moral delineations* 
I mean only to affirm that the firftj the moft 
ancient poetry and morality, which breathed 
a fpirit of filial deperldance and fubmiflionj 
knew nothing of pfycbology ; for otherwife, 
they would have been embarrafled in a 
labyrinth of Intricate propofitions and con- 
clufions. Poetry and morality flood in need 
of a quite different foundation and fupport. 
The idea of God, the ETERNAL MIND, was 
to be their pure and folid foundation, and 
this alone could conftitute their refpedtable 
fimplicity. In this centre all their parts 
were to be united, and to derive from thence 

their 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

their elevation, dignity, and power. There 
was no occafion for any olher connexion of 
things. The fear of Gcd y without farther 
difcuffion, was here alib the beginning O f 
wifdom. 

ALCIPHRON. The beginning, I grant: 
this principle conducted them to the right 
path ; but why fliould it be regarded as their 
infeparable condudor ? It held them always 
in leading-firings, if I may ufe that term, and 
the child never thought of learning to walk 
alone. Is not this the courfe that things took 
in the Eaft ? This childilh manner of think 
ing in the old world gave rife to the fervile 
religion of Moles ; and the human mind, 
inftead of rifmg towards perfection by moral 
improvement, funk rather into a kind of 
degradation by a paffive obedience. Why ? 
Becaufe it only looked up to God without 
learning to know itfelf, and to try the ftrength 
of its own internal faculties and powers. 

EUGENIUS. What it was that gave occa 
fion to thzfcrvile Mofaic worihip, as you are 
pleafed to call it, we (hall, if you think proper, 
examine fome other time, that we may not 

transfer 



2^6 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES 

j 

transfer modern ideas to an ancient period, 

when moral fcience, as well as the land in gene-* 

ral, flowed with milk and honey. In the mean 

time you muft agree with me in thinking, 

that it is good for a child to know and follow 

his father. Now in the moral poetry of the 

Orientals, the idea of God is as the fun in the 

firmament, which gives light to the whole 

horizon of human exiftence, and points out 

and illuftrates, with a penetrating ray, the 

whole circle of relations and duties. This 

fun appears to us now, perhaps, to have 

beamed with an overpowering" ardour and 

brightnefs, but at that early period this was 

neceffary ; for moral inftrudion founded, as 

It were, on the contemplation of the Deity, 

and derived entirely and directly from the 

Great Being, to a people as yet in an 

infant-date, could only produce its proper 

effect by being prefented to them with 

affeding marks of majeflic fimplicity and 

authority. Both in this world, and in the 

world to come, God ever was and is the 

Father and the Guide of man. 

ALCIPHRON. In the world to come alfo ? 
This is a point on which we were beginning 

to 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

to fpeak a few moments ago. How flow 
and gradual has the progrefs of the human 
mind been towards any clear or fatisfa&ory 
ideas of a life to come ? Conclusions often 
too haftily drawn arguments which piove 
too much fond wi flies and forebodings 
which prove nothing Are not thefe the frail 
foundations on which the doctrine of immor 
tality has been entertained ? Adam was 
formed of clay and knew nothing of immor 
tality : he law Abel weltering in his blood, 
and this fiift victim of death was bitterly 
lamented and, in appearance, lamented 
without hope. No angel or meflenger of 
comfort came to confole the mourning parents 
with even a glimpfe of immortality. His foul 
was poured out upon the earth with bis blood i 
from thence it cried to heaven and was 
buried. This was the belief of the old world, 
and it fubfifted even after the deluge. The 
fathers jlept^ their days are counted, and we 
know nothing more of them than that they were 
gathered unto their fathers ; that is 5 laid in their 
graves. Thus in procefs of time the grave 
was confidered as the region of the dead,, 
Caft an eye, 1 befeech you, on the dark and 
doleful poetical defcriptions of the fub terra- 

s neous 



258 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

neous empire of the dead, which we meet 
with fo frequently in the Old Teftament ; 
or rather permit me to prefent to you one of 
thofe dirges, which will ferve as an oblation 
to the memory of my departed friend. If he 
really exifted and could tranfport himfelf 
hither, he would, at this moment be gliding 
about us. But alas ! even this miferable 
confolation is not adminiftered by the follow 
ing funeral ftrains, in which it is affirmed 
that there is no return from the region of the 
dead. 

" Man that is born of a woman * 

" Is of few days 

" And full of trouble ! 

" He cometh forth like a flower and fades 5 

" He fleeth like a fhadow; 

" And continueth not." 

i 

And again : 

" There is hope of a tree, if it be cut down, 

" That it will fprout again ; 

" And that the tender branch thereof will not ceafe ; 

" Tho igh the root thereof wax old in the earth j 

" And the ftock thereof die in the ground, 

&lt;c Yet through fcent of water it will bud, 

* Job, xiv. i. 5. 

And 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 259 

^ And bring forth boughs like a plant : 
f( But man dieth and wafleth away, 
** Yea man breathes out his fpirit -And then where 
is he s" 

And again : 

u O that thou wouldeft hide me in the grave ! 

t( That thou wouldeft keep me until thy wrath be 

pad, 
t( That thou wouldeft appoint me a fet time and 

" remember me. 
&lt;c But alas ! if a man die&gt; 
ic Shall he live again ? 
&lt;f All the days of my appointed time 
" Will I wait till my change come. 
if But alas I the mountain failing, 
" Cometh to nought, 

" And the rock is removed out of its place. 
&lt;c The waters wear the (tones : 
i Thou wafheft away the things which grow out of 

{C the duft of the earth, 
" And thou deftroyeft the hope of man," 

What do you think of thefe plaintive drains ? 
Has that difmal truth, " That from the re- 
&lt;c gion of death there is no return/ ever 
been, prefented in ftronger expreffions than 
thefe ? Nay, is it poffible to affirm in a more 
clear and pofitive manner, that no account 
either of happinefs- or mifery was ever 

s 2 brought 



260 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

v 

brought from that empire of fhadows, where 
eternal filence and profound oblivion reign B 

Eu GENIUS. You are in the right, my 
friend, according to one fignification of the 
word here employed by Job ; but of what 
return do you think Job fpoke in the paflage 
you have quoted ? He fpoke, manifeftly, of 
a return to human life, to a new poffeffion of 
the world and its advantages, of which, in 
his prefent circumftances he could have fo 
little enjoyment. The paflage, therefore, 
which you have been repeating, does not fur- 
nifh even the appearance of an argument 
againft the immortality of the foul and of a 
life to come. Who of the paffengers through 
a prefent world, ever returned to vifit this 
firft ftage of his^exiftence ? And, neverthe- 
lefs, Job confidered the foul as ftill exifting 
in the region of the dead and thus furviving 
its feparation from the body, as we fee evi 
dently, by his wifhing that God would bide 
him in the grave and keep him fecret until his 
wrath had ceafed, and the appointed time for 
his rejloratlon mould come. He feems, how 
ever, in the fucceeding moment, to perceive 
the temerity of this hope, and fubmits to his 

lot* 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 261 

lot. Let us, therefore, confider more atten 
tively the opinions of the Orientals concern 
ing what was the Jhadowy domain, or the 
abode of departed fpirits, and tracing them to 
their origin, enquire what ideas they formed 
of this abode. 

ALCIPHRON. They undoubtedly meant 
no more by it than the grave, the perma 
nent, the eternal refidence of the dead. We 
muft only recollect here that they did not 
confider the inhabitants of this refidence as 
abfolutely dead. They were regarded (fond 
illufion !) as ftill pofleffing a kind of life even 
in the grave. On this account, they called 
the grave, the boufe of reft, the permanent 
maniion of peace. I have feen fome poems 
of the Arabian Bards, in which they confi 
der and vifit the graves of their friends as 
habitations, hold converfe with them in thefe 
gloomy manfions, and water and plant the 
earth about their houfes, as if they themfelves 
were deftined one day to inhabit them. This 
is a notion of great antiquity in the Eaft, 
where it was almoil univerfally entertained. 
It was in later times introduced among the 
Hebrews, and gave rife to a great variety of 
S 3 traditions, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

traditions, funeral ceremonies, and alfo of 
pilgrimages to the graves of departed friends 
and relatives. Now the foul being thus con- 
fidered as a made, a ghoft, or an animated 
blaft, where do you think they placed it ? 
In fubterraneous dwellings, in a region of 
repofe and perfect equality. This is the 
circumftance which Job exprefles fo patheti 
cally in his plaintive {trains, even that kings 
and flaves, fervants and their matters, are 
there, all free, equal, and at reft ; but all defti- 
tute of activity and vigour, like a ghoft or 
phantom which is without nerves or fmews. 
All this I own was mere fiction or idle fancy. 
Love and regret for their departed friends 
betrayed the good people into thefe childifh 
errors, and that to fuch a degree, that they 
neither could nor would confider the de- 
ceafed as dead^ but believed them to be ghofts 
or fplrits ftill living, even in their graves. 
The life of vigour and activity they confider, 
indeed, as pall with relpect to them ; but 
they fancifully reprefent them as difembodied 
beings flitting about in the regions of the 
dead. There, darkfome and filent ftreams 
flow heavily ! There, reigns the difmal king 
of fliadows ! There, defcend the princes of 

the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 263 

the earth and continue to act their parts on a 
vifionary theatre. They cannot divert them- 
felves of their former propenfities and habits. 
The dreams of wordly pomp and grandeur 
ftill purfue them ; but they are mere dreams. 
How often did David pray that God would 
grant him upon earth profperous days, which 
might be fubje&s of his grateful hymns,, fince 
in the region of the dead the voice of joy is 
never heard, nor are any oblations of praife 
fent up to heaven for victories, and fpoils of 
conquered nations and vanquifhed enemies, 
nothing but filence ! The truly philofophical 
writer of the Ecclefiaftes exprefled himfelf 
on this head, with brevity and energy, when 
he faid, 

&lt;c Whatfoever thine hand findeth to do 3 

" Do it with thy might ; 

* For there is no work, nor devicej 

Nor knowledge, nor wifdom, 
" In the empire of (hadows* 
" Where thou goeft." 

You have not, I fuppofe, forgot your favour 
ite OSSIAN and his Celts. His heroic an- 
ceftors whofe feparate ftate, after this tranfitory 
life is placed in the clouds, continue ftill to 
S 4 grafp 



264 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

grafp the fword ; but the {word is wind, it 
is a reddifh cloud, and the hand that grafps 
it is alfo a lhadow, which flies away at the 
firft appearance of the light of the morning. 
And not only the Celts and Hebrews^ but all 
the ancient nations believe the exiftence of a 
region of departed fpirits, where each indi 
vidual follows the occupation which he had 
upon earth fome affembled on verdant 
plains others in the clouds, from whence 
they behold the pleafures and purfuits of their 
pofterity upon earth. The Orientals, who 
adopted the primitive idea of a grave, placed 
the manfion of the dead under the earth. All 
this, you muft grant, is fond illufion. An 
aggregate of phantafins and non-entities, 
which do not carry the fmalleft proof that 
their inventors had any perfuafion, or even 
idea of the immortality of the foul. It is a 
mere Jloado w which conftitutes the fubjecT; of 
all this poetry, thefe fantaftic defcriptions of 
the lives of ghofts and hobgoblins. 

Eu GENIUS. Softly, my friend ; you feeni 

to forget that every Jhadow fuppofes a fub- 

Jlanee. Even fancy is a madow of truth. 

Cari you conceive that this notion, this per- 

fuauoq 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 265 

fuafion of immortality, would have prevailed 
ib univerfally if it had not a general foundation 
in the heart of man, or in the tradition of all 



ages? 



ALCIPHRON. This pleafmg or dejeting 
dream was produced in the human heart or 
fancy, by defire, friefidfliip and hope ; and, 
by the influence of thefe feelings, the dream 
might eaiily grow into a tradition, which 
would gain credit from age to age, and, in 
procefs of time, become univerfal. Do you 
think that it was natural for man to fee with 
indifference, his fellow-creatures, to whom 
he was bound by various ties of affedtion or 
intereft, perifh before his eyes like the brute- 
animals ? Was it not, on the contrary, more 
natural to contrive fome way of perpetuating 
tender and focial connexions with departed 
friends and parents, and with children carried 
off in the dawn, or prime of life ? The de-^ 
luge no doubt, furniihed the firft and the moft 
folemn occafion for poetical fictions relative 
to a future fcene of exiftence, and for fanci 
ful defcriptions of the regions of the dead, 
Confider the influence which this tremendous 
event, the deftruclion of a whole world of 

living 



266 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

living creatures, mufl have had in multiplyin 
the traditions of fucceeding ages. 



&lt;c There were giants in the earth in thofe days, 

** Which fprung from the conjunction of the fons of 

&lt;c God with the daughters of men : 
* c Mighty men were they and men of violence, 
* The renowned heroes of ancient times *," 

Thefe were now the repbaim, the giants 
which feemed to figh and fob under the water, 
whofe voice was fuppofed to be heard in the 
roaring waves, and whofe violent and con- 
vullive motions produced florms and earth 
quakes. Thefe are the moft ancient gigantic 
inhabitants of the region of the dead. This 
notion or tradition was gradually foftened into 
a milder one, and the manfion of the dead 
became exadly, the calm and peaceful aflem- 
hlage of the deceafed, which we find de- 
fcribed by Job and by the Hebrews. There 
remained ftill legions of heroes in the empire 
of death : fhadowy kings fat on fhadowy 
thrones ; nay, whole cities, kingdoms, and 
vanquifhed armies were crowded together in 
this manfion of fhadows ; while every object, 

See Qenefis, vi. 4. 

not 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 267 

not even excluding things which we deem 
inanimate, had its peculiar fpirit, Thus, iq. 
procefs of time, the fubterraneous kingdom 
obtained a monarch, whofe name was 
BELIAL, the ghoftly king of imaginary be 
ings, without fubftance or power. The 
SCHEOL became a palace, an impregnable 
fortrefs with gates and bars of brafs. It was 
a devouring gulph which never reftored any 
thing it had fwallowed, nor accepted of a 
ranfom for the fouls which it had made cap 
tive. Even % in the New Teftament we find 
many expreffions and modes of fpeaking 
which bear the marks of this mythology, as 
in the king who had the power of bell and 
death, who opened gates, which none but he 
could open, fubdued potentates, and delivered 
fouls, which he alone could fubdue and 
deliver. It would bs a very improper man 
ner of il 111 ft rating things to apply all this to 
our ideas of hell and death. It is neverthe- 
lefs certain, that thi.s kind of mifapplicatioq. 
has taken place with refpeft to many ideas 
and expreffions, which otight to be confined 
to the particular times in which they were 
employed. In the mean time, the idea of 
hero or governor confidered in the extenfive 

fignifi- 



268 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

fignification of thefe terms in the ancient 
poetry, denoted great things, awful power 
and dominion. The potentate who reigned 
over human fouls and had the power of death, 
became an unrighteous tyrant, and the 
anointed of the Lord wrefted from him both 
his dominion and his prey. Thus you fee, 
my friend, that during the fpace of five 
thoufand years, the human race, deftitute of 
any defence or fupport again ft this dreadful 
ihadow-potentate, were in a long ftate of 
fervitude and terror, or, to life he language 
of a facred writer, were, through the fear of 
death) all their life-time fubjetl to bondage. 
Hence the doleful lamentations of Hezekiah ! 
Hence that dejection which prevailed among 
the Hebrews at the profpet and approach of 
death, which the chieftains and people of 
other nations beheld and refifted with mag 
nanimity and valour. In this refpeft, the 
Hebrews were, if I miftake not, the moft 
daftardly people upon earth. The difmal 
ideas of \hzjh adow-kingdom tormented them, 
perhaps, ftill more than the belief of a total 
annihilation would have done. 

EUGENIUS. I have allowed you, my 

friend, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 269 

friend, to go on without interruption. And 
now allow me to tell you frankly, that your 
hiftorical view of the empire of death, ftruck 
me while you were fpeaking, as the plaintive 
effufion of a melancholy fpirit, which loves to 
wander, in folitary filence, through the 
region of fhadows. You feem to have often 
vifited in fancy this dark domain, and to have 
ftudied with a gloomy kind of complacence, 
its vifionary objects. But now, I befeech you, 
raife your eye to the ftarry vault which is ex 
tended above our heads with fuch fplendour 
and glory. See there, ALCiPHRON,the Book 
of Immortality which God opens for us and for 
all nations every night. And when the rifmg 
morn brings frefh vigour and alacrity to 
wearied mortals, remember that every new 
day is a fyrnbol of the refurreffiion^ as the 
fleep of each returning night is the image of 
death. Thefe fymbols are clear and beauti 
ful ; their language is as univerfal as it is 
affe&ing. But conlider, befides, another 
fource of hope which was opened to men, 
with clearnefs iufficient to itrengtheti and 
arm them againft the gloomy terrors of death 
and the grave. How early, for example, do 

we find it faid of the virtuous man, 

/ 

" He 



27 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" He walked with God, 

f( And becaufe God loved him he was not : 

For God took him *." 



ALCIPHRON. I hope you do not corn 
fider this paffage, which was probably the 
fragment of an old fong, as a narration of the 
refurredtion and afcenfion of Enoch. It is 
the foft voice or echo, which poetical fancy 
fends from the grave of ibme perfon who 
had died in early youth, and had not arrived 
at the advanced age of his brethren and pa 
rents. As children have no idea of another 
world, their queftioning curiofity about 
their departed friends was frequently fatisfied 
by fuch anfwers as thefe, Your brother is 
" with God God took him away fo foon 
" becaufe he loved him, on account of his 
" virtue." The primitive world was in 
fuch a ftate of fimplicity and infancy, that it 
was necefTary to fpeak in this manner. 

EUGENIUS. That I do not deny : andean 
early removal from a prefent world, is no 
doubt adapted to make that childim kind of 
impreffion of which you fpeak. Not only 

* Genefis, v. 24* 

among 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 07! 

among the Hebrews, but alfo among other 
nations we find ideas and expreflions of this 
nature : " This beautiful and virtuous young 
" man was taken away by the gods" " that 
" innocent and amiable virgin was carried 
cc off by Aurora." But you do not feem to 
comprehend clearly and fully the ideas which 
fuch expreffions were defigned to convey, 
and which were really affixed to them in the 
mind of the fpeaker. The conftant traditions 
of the Eaflern nations conveyed nobler ideas 
by thefe expreffions, than you feem to be 
aware of, and the poetry of the Hebrews 
manifeftly improved thefe ideas. " God 
" took him" is the ufual phrafe am ong them 
to denote the happy lot of God s favoured 
fervants in another world, and this fenfe of 
the expreffion was evidently derived from the 
cafe of Enoch, the friend of God. He lived 
in degenerate times, and was zealous in pro 
moting the praftice of piety, and the glory of 
his Creator. He was no doubt expofed to 
the raillery and perfecution of the wicked. 
This is often the lot of the righteous in times 
of prevailing iniquity. This was afterwards 
the cafe of his brother in fuffering, the 
illuftrious Elias, and it pleafed the God 
7 whom 



272 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

whom he had ferved, to diftinguifh him in a 
fimilar way. He was raifed, not perhaps 
with fuch pomp and fpleadour as Elias was, 
but certainly with equal favour, to the man- 
fions of immortality. It is in this fenfe, that 
St. Paul ufes the expreffion : it bears the 
fame fignification in the laft book of the holy 
fcriptures, in the vifion of the afcenfion feen 
in the cloud ; and it is alfo interpreted in the 
fame manner in the neighbouring countries 
of the Eaft. The Arabians tell many fabu 
lous (lories of a wife, folitary, perfecuted, and 
virtuous prophet named IDRIS, (fo they call 
our Enoch,) who was carried up to heaven 
and lives in Paradife. By other nations he is 
placed on Albordy^ the radiant mountain 
where the gods are affembled ; and their tra 
ditions alfo make mention of his walking, not 
with God, but with the Elobim. The in- 
ftrudive removal of Enoch, is thus a ground 
of hope, a particular and comforting pattern, 
as it were, of the fubfequent exaltation of 
other friends of God to fimilar honours. 

ALCJPHRON. Other friends of God, you 
lay ? I recoiled none but Elias. 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 27* 

Eu GENIUS. Abraham was a friend of 
God as well as Enoch ; and you know with 
what a peculiar and emphatic diftin&ion the 
Supreme Being was called the God of Abra^ 
ham, Ifaac and Jacob. But obferve now, 
with a facred writer *, that God is not the 
God of the dead but of the living : therefore 
they all live. With refpecl: to this vifible 
world, the Fathers died without having had 
any enjoyment of the promtfes which God 
had folemnly made to them : they pafled 
from their frail and tranfitory dwelling here, 
into the manfion of their celeftial Friend, 
into a better country ; and the being gathered 
together ^vith the fathers was the popular and 
familiar expreffion of the Hebrews to fignify 
their region of the dead, or rather of the happy. 
They were, like Abraham and Enoch, in the 
Paradife of their friend. 

ALCIPHRON. For my part, I underftood 
nothing more by this expreffion than the 
placing their dead bodies in the graves of 
their *efpetive families, 

* This reafoning is not taken from the New Te {lament i 
on the contrary, the reafoning in Matthew* xxii* 32. aird 
Hebrews, xi. 13. is founded upon thefe ideas, and is illuftrated 
by them. 

T EUGE- 



374 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. No doubt this external rite was 
connected with their religious opinions, and 
was therefore religioufly obferved. But when 
it was rendered impracticable by any circum- 
ftance, (which feldom happened,) they knew 
how to fupply its place in their imagination ; 
and after all, it 9 was not precifely the inter 
ment in the family grave, which conftituted 
their being gathered to their fathers ; for 
Abraham was gathered to his fathers although 
he was not buried with them, and Jacob de- 
lired to defcend to his beloved fon in the region 
of fhadows, though he confidered him as hav 
ing been torn to pieces by a wild beaft. You 
have remarked, yourfelf, that all the nations of 
the world, even thofe whom we call favage, be 
lieved fuch an qffcmbKng with their fathers in 
the world of fpirits. This alfo as you may 
eafily imagine, prefented in fancy, the mofi 
affeding fcenes to the feelings of the heart, 
\vhen the father was reprefented as in the re- 
fidence of his fon, the mother in that of her 
child, and when friends were thus reftored to 
each other with renewed fenfibility and 
mutual delight. As a proof of this, I fhall 
communicate to you a pathetic funeral dirge. 
lit the writings of travellers, we find many 
compofitions of this kind, the productions of 

a people 



bRIENTAL DIALOGUED 27^ 

a people who lived in thejhdde^ if I may fo 
expreis myfelf. They had only a feeble 
glimpfe of knowledge, and their hopes were 
founded merely on tradition. Accordingly 
they depided the manjion of the dead23\& their 
being gathered to their fathers in a manner 
conformable to their refpetive ideas, and 
their particular manner of living. The 
Hebrew line followed the opinions of their 
fathers: and as it was the peculiar glory of 
this race, that Abraham and the reft of theif 
fathers were deemed the friends of God^ fo 
muft they have adopted with the utmoft com 
placence, that natural and foothing idea that 
God who had loved his friend the good pa 
triarch here below, and had granted him the 
protection of his paternal providence to the end 
of his days, would not forfake him in the grave, 
nor permit the dark region of the infernal ty 
rant to be his only portion. This conclufion 
was juft and fairly drawn ; and it was the 
foundation of their faith and hope. That faith, 
even now, maintains its ground, and reprefents 
the GREAT BEING as the friend of thofe that 
love him, and as the aufpicious protector, 
who opens to them after death, his glorioua 
manfion for their eternal refidence. " He 
" took him to himfelf" IF alfo the beautiful ex- 
preffion of this idea in the Pfalms. 

T 2 ALCI- 



276 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. I do indeed recoiled fome 
Pfalms, which feem relative to this objedt | 
but I cannot help thinking them very ob- 
fcure. 

Eu GEN i us. We are now near home, and 
I fhall read to you two of them, if you pleafe 9 
before we part. The firft may almoft be con- 
fidered as an evening-prayer*; and fome 
have looked upon it as an infcription on the 
tomb of the Poet. 

** Hear all people ! 

&lt;* Give ear all ^e inhabitants of the earth F 

" Ye fons of men, ye fons of heroes, 

" Rich and poor, hear ! 

My mouth mall fpeak wifdom : 

c&lt; And my heart fhall mufe of underftanding : 

* I will incline mine ear to a parable, 

" I will open my dark fayhigs upon the harp f. 

" Wherefore mould I fear in the days of evil, 

" While the iniquity of my enemies compaffeth me 

&lt; ( about ? 

" They that truft in their ilrength, 
" And boaft themfelves in the multitude of their 

&lt;k riches ; 

* Pfaim xlix. 

f The bard liflens to his guitar as if the verfes came to 
him from its firings. Lyric poetry, fong, and inflrumental 
mufic were, in thefe ancient times, combined. The darkfay-^ 
tng, or enigma, he had to explain and illuftrate, was the 
feeming felicity of the wicked in the pofleffion of temporal 
profperity, as we fee in the following verfes. 

Can 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 277 

** Can any of them redeem his brother, 

" Or give God a ranfom for him ? 

&lt; That he mould (till live for ever, and not fee cor- 

** ruption ? 

** For he feeth that wife men die, 
(t Likewifr the fool and the brutHh perfon perifh, 
" And leave their wealth to others, 
rc Their inward thought is that their houfes fhrill 

" continue for ever, and their dvvelling-places 

" to all generations ; 

&lt; They call their lands after their own names. 
" Neverthelefs man being in honour abideth not ; 
" He is like the beads that perifh, 
" Like meep they are laid in the grave ; 
" Death (hall feed on them, 
" And the righteous fhall have dominion over them 

te in the morning ; 

" And their beauty fliall confume below, 
" Where they dwell among the fhadows. 
" But God mall redeem my foul from the region of 

" the dead, and receive me in his dwelling. 
4C Therefore fear not when one is made rich, 
" And the glory of his houfe is increafed ; 
s For he mall carry nothing away with him when he 

" dieth, 
" Neither (hall his pomp follow him," &c. 

ALCIPHRON. I have never confidered the 
different parts of this Pfalm in this clear con 
nexion. 

EUGENIUS. That may be, this con 
nexion, however, is perfectly conformable 

T 3 with 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

with the fenfe of the words. The different 
ftates alfo of departed fouls are pointed out 
here in the cleareft manner. The fouls which 
have been addicted only to fenfual gratifica 
tions, and have afpired to no other objects of 
enjoyment and felicity, are driven like flopks 
pf fheep to the abyfs, and are there devoured 
by the King of Terrors. The fouls of the 
righteous, on the contrary, are delivered and 
redeemed from the Qrcus^ the infernal regions, 
by God, and tranfported to his celeftial man- 
fions. The former become the prey of death, 
and are abandoned to putrefaction, and the 
righteous rule over them in the morning^ that 
is, foon and without delay, as after night, the 
feafon of fleep, a clear and brilliant day 
breaks forth. The other Pfalm, which I re 
commend to your attention, ftates this import 
ant diftinction ftill more circumftantially. It 
reprefents the Supreme Being as taking under 
his protection and care, even in the grave, 
the bodies of his faints, and conducting them 
through a fecret path, to the manfions of 
eternal light and joy. 

ALCIPHRON. You mean, I fuppofe, the 
fixteenth Pfalm ; but I underftand this a$ 

little 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 279 

little as that which you have been repeating. 
It looks like the effufion of a fick prieft, vhom 
God furnifhes with meat and drink, and who 
prays for a fpeedy recovery of his health. 

EUGENIUS. It is certainly a player of 
David ; you muft obierve in it, from verfe to 
verfe, his ufual manner of exprefTing his 
feelings, and the effential lines of his cha 
racter. 

" The Lord is the portion of mine inheritance, and 

" of my cup ; 

u Thou maintained my lot : 

" The lines are fallen unto me in pleafant places ; 
" Yea, I have a goodly heritage. 
" I willblefs the Lord, 
" \Vho hath given me counfel ; 
" My reins (or heart) mail inftruft me in the night- 

" feafon. 

" I have fet the Lord always before me ; 
" Becaufe he is at my right-hand, 
t( I mall not be moved. 
u Therefore my heart is glad, 
" And my glory rejoiceth ; 
Yea, my fkft alfo mail reft in hope ; 
" For thou wilt not leave my foul in the grave (or in 

** the region of (hadows), 
" Neither wilt thou fuffer thine Holy One to fee 

" corruption. 

" Thou wilt ftiew me the path of life ; 
" In thy prefence is fulnefsof joy, 
*&lt; At thy right hand are pleafures for evermore." 

T 4 This 



2So ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

This Pfalm, methinks, not only by its con 
tents, but alfo by certain flriking characters 
which diftinguim it, appears evidently to be 
a Pfalm of David. c * God is his guardian 
" and protedor" (i. e. combats for and with 
him as a friend}, " God had given him a 
" goodly heritage which his father had 
" not left him" (i. e. a crown in the land of 
Jehovah). " This heritage had fallen to him 
" by the counfel of God, by the lot" (as 
that of the refpedive tribes of Ifrael had 
fallen to them). In his various troubles and 
conflids with adverfity he is an object of 
God s providential and paternal care. There 
fore was he fredfaft in his communion with 
God, and efteemed as his treafure tiptfanGtu- 
ary of Jehovah. He would have nothing to 
do with foreign idolatrous kings and their ob 
lations : Jehovah was his portion and his cup. 
Is not all this manifeftly applicable to 
David, and is it not, at the fame time, 
diftindively charaderiilic of the author of 
this Pfalm * ? 

* That David muft be confidered in this Pfalm as a type 
of the Mtfiiahmay be proved from the New Teftament ; but 
this does not belong to our prefent fub jcft. We are here only 
to confider the character of the perfon who appears in this 
Ffulm, and of the connexion that is obfervable in it. 



DIALOGUE VIL 

Concerning the Ideas refpeEling Providence in 
the poetry of the Orientals Illujlration of 
certain relations which have given rife to the 
later views and ideas of Providence The 
Deity reprefenied as the avenger offecretjins 
in the hiflory of Cain- differing and poeti 
cal Jlrokes in this hiflory- Righteoufnefs and 
mercy in the divine predictions Tranfition 
to fome animated perfonifications in the poetry 
cf later times Of the blood that cries The 
Hood bird of vengeance, &c.-* Explication of 
the divine procedure in the Deluge How we 
ought to judge of events of this kind In 
what fpirit the narrations of this event are 
given A new arrangement of the earth 
after the flood Of gigantic relations The 
fans of God Journal of the Ark Of the 
renovation of the earth Why the rainbow 
was the Jign of a new homage to the 
Creator? Of the rainbow in the northern 
poetry reprefented as a bridge of the giants 
Of the Tower of Babel The objecJ and 

fpirit 



( 282 ) 

fpirit of the relation concerning this Tower* 
Of Nlmrod the mighty hunter before the 
Lord A latent irony in this recital Of the 
general character of the poetical traits in fa- 
cred hiftory relative to Babel Lamentation 
cf Ifaiah on the king of Babel Of God con- 
fidered as the judge and avenger of tyrants 
A j unification of contrajls in the poetical de- 
fcriplions of human characters Of the im- 
prejjion of this fpecies of poetry on the human 
heart Comparifon between the Oriental 
poetry and that of other nations in this re- 
fpccJ Views of Providence from Job Utility 
of fuch poetry The mojl ancient eulogy of 



DIALOGUE VII. 

IN a certain company the converfation turned 
upon the vifible direction and government of 
Providence in the courfe of human affairs. 
Many events and examples were brought to 
prove that the Great Being, who created the 
world, extends his paternal care to its inhabit 
ants, watches for their prefervation, often 
covers them with his prote&ion in the time of 
danger, and, in a multitude of cafes has deli 
vered them from the very jaws of deftrudHon. 
Among other things it was remarked, that 
the children of poor but pious parents 
meet, generally fpeaking, liberal fuccour and 
fupport, that fecret frauds and crimes are fre 
quently brought to light and punifhed with a 
juft feverity ; while the prayers of the 
righteous are often anfwered by remarkable 
difplay s of providential goodnefs. All the com 
pany, by turns, had communicated their ob- 
fervations on this intereftingfubjeft, and they 
feparated in a pleafing frame of mind, as they 
were all edified and delighted with the con 
verfation. Our two Oriental friends remained, 

and 



284 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

and ALCIPHRON (whofe fmgular turn of 
mind has already appeared on feveral occa- 
fions) refumed the fubjedt in the following 
manner : 

ALCIPHUON. What do you think, my 
friend, of the converfation in which we have 
been now engaged ? Is not the manner of 
proceeding, which has been attributed to the 
Deity, too much accommodated to our wifhes, 
ideas, and manner of acling ? To me it has 
always appeared unphilofophical, and even 
vulgar and trivial, to trace all the events 
vrhich happen in the world to the direction 
of a Divine Providence to feek out for de- 
fign and final caufes in every occurrence, and 
to attribute to the Deity in the laft inftance, 
all our actions with all the pleaiing or un 
happy confequences which proceed from 
them. In our friendly conferences in which 
this fubjecl; has been either formally difcufled 
or occafionally confidered, you feemed to 
differ from my way of thinking on that head, 
and I recollect that you even maintained your 
opinion by very plaufible arguments ; but I 
muft confefs that you rather embarrafled than 
convinced me ; and while I found myfelf in 
capable 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

capable of anfwering your arguments, there 
was fomething within me that effaced their 
impreffion. In the poetry of the Orientals, 
(as in the converfation we have now heard,} 
men are placed in the world, if may ufe 
fuch a coraparifon, like pawns on a great 
chefs-board/ which the invifible agent moves 
as he finds good, and places or difplaces with 
out their perceiving his agency. This may 
give to their poetry, as you lately obferved, a 
certain air of dignity and fimplicity ; but I 
think there is more fancy than truth in this 
reprefentation of the actions of men : and 
with all its air of dignity and fimplicity, it 
would be produdive, were it univerfally be 
lieved, of the moft pernicious effects. Such 
a reprefentation of things muft render man in- 
fenfible, indolent and feeble, as it naturally 
leads him to a paffive recumbency on the di 
vine will, confidered as the fole univerfai 
agent, and thus difcourages and precludes all 
effort to improve his nature and faculties. 
Thus men when they pray and perform reli 
gious rites, are eafily induced to think they 
have done all that is required of them, while 
they neglect to att their part on the fcene of life 
which is their true and principal deftination, 

and 



$86 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

and leave all to the direction and agency of 
the invifible worker. The fpecies of poetry, 
therefore, of which we are now fpeaking, 
notwithftanding all its pompous and Unking 
contrafts between God s providential, omni 
potent agency and man s feeble efforts, is only 
a combination of pleafmg founds with little 
fenfe and lefs utility. It is, as it were, an 
opiate to the foul, whofe activity it fufpends, 
and whofe faculties it lulls into a foft lethargy. 
It is always exalting the decrees of God s 
providential wifdom, while it negleds fetting 
in a proper light the power and obligations of 
man, to avoid or overcome evil, and to attain 
to true felicity ; thus while in appearance 
it advances the glory of God, it difcourages 
the efforts and weakens the powers of man : 
it dazzles us with the fuppofed light of 
heaven, but it turns the light, which is in us, 
into darknefs. And if man prefumes to judge 
of the ways of Providence by his narrow 
views, and the guidance of his reafon which 
is fo limited and imperfect, he is accufed of 
prefumption, and his decifions are deemed 
rafh, felfifh, and erroneous. All this ap 
pears evident to me when I compare the 
poetry of the Orientals with their biftory. 
8 The 



DIALOGUES. 387 

The former is rapid and foars aloft, the latter 
creeps. The former amufes the fancy, but 
has upon the conduct of life either no influ 
ence at all, or a kind of influence which is 
rather pernicious than falutary ; and as to the 
latter, it afcribes every thing to God, and 
then all is done this is thought fufficient. 
The poetry of the Eaft, confidered in this 
point of view, does not appear to have con 
tributed much to the improvement either of 
the undemanding or the heart : it has rather 
retarded the progrefs of the one in ufeful 
knowledge, and that of the other in virtuous 
feelings and purfuits. 

EUGENIUS. I perceive, my friend, that 
the root from which your prejudices are nou- 
rifhed, has ftill a faft hold in your mind ; and 
until it is entirely eradicated, it will be need- 
lefs to talk of the beauty of any poetry what- 
foever. I freely acknowledge that the moil 
fublime poetry is of very little ufe either to 
religion or morals, when it is an opiate^ as 
you exprefs yourfelf, to the foul, when it 
is not guided in its flight, by an attention to 
the true nature of things, or fpreads before the 
eye a fallacious veil which hinders it from 

difcern- 



288 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

difcerning the real forms of the obje&s of 
which it treats. But the poetry of the Eaft 
will lofe nothing of its merit by this acknow 
ledgment. The ideas it gives of the Deity, 
and its manner of reprefenting and explaining 
the ways of Providence were derived, not 
from metaphyfical fpeculations, but from 
particular and determinate events. Every 
event and circumftance in which, according to 
the judgment of the fpectators, the direction 
and fuperintendance of the Deity were vifible, 
tended to confirm thefe ideas ; and an atten 
tive obfervation of the events which happen 
in human life, ftill continues to prefent to the 
philofophic and even to the vulgar eye,reafons 
for believing that important doctrine, that hu 
man affairs are under the government and di 
rection of a wife Providence. Let us go then, 
my friend, to the fountain-head. Let us confi- 
der the particular events in the early periods of 
Oriental Hiftory upon which this belief was 
founded ; for I do not like reafoning from 
vague exprefilons and general aflfertions. 

ALCIPHRON. Neither do I and we can 
eafily find in the records of ancient times, 
events and objects that will anfwer our pur- 

pofe. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 289 

pofe. The hiftories of Cain and Abel, of the 
Deluge, of the Titans of Babel, of Sodom and 
Gomorrba prefent themfelves in a ftriking 
manner to our view on this occafion. It was 
perhaps from theie events, that the primitive 
inhabitants of our globe formed their ideas of 
a governing Providence. 

EUGENIUS. Undoubtedly it was and 
we muft confequently confider thefe events, 
not. fuperficially, or in a general point of view, 
but fucceffively and feparately ; thus we {hall 
fee more fully the great and awful truth in 
which they terminate. We {hall begin with 
the hiftory of ABEL. It is prefented to us in 
the Sacred Records as a drooping flower, 
ftained with blood ; and it is as poetical in its 
fimplicity, as it is admirable in its tendency 
to difplay the juftice of divine Providence in 
the punifliment of wickednefs : 

Where is Abel thy brother * ? 

c &lt; What haft thou done ? 

cc The voice of thy brother s blood crieth unto me 

" from the ground. 
" And now art thou accurfed, 
( Banifhed from the earth, 

* Genells, iv. 9, Sec. 

v Which 



1290 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" Which hath opened her mouth to receive thy 

u brother s blood from thy hand. 
" When thou tilled the ground, 
" It fhall not henceforth yield unto thee her flrength ; 
" A fugitive and vagabond (halt thou be on the 

" earth." 



Let me now afk you, What ftrikes you moft 
in this picture, ihejeverity of God as judge 
or his goodnefs as father ? Who, in this cafe, 
could have exercifed juftice and inflicted pu- 
nifhment, if God had not interfered ? The 
father furely could not think of avenging the 
blood of one fon by fhedding that of another : 
was then the atrocious deed to be left unpu- 
nifhed, and the blood of a man to be ftied, 
with indifference like that of a brute-animal ? 
Was an odious crime by remaining unpu- 
niflied, to ferve as an encouragement to fimi- 
lar abominations ? All thefe confequences 
muft have followed, had the punimment of 
the crime in queftion been left to Adam. 
What could he have done if the murderer 
had concealed his crime, or in a moment of 
defpair, even raifed his hand againft his 
father ? The earth could not dilcover it 
to the latter, but (as the bold figure of the 
facred text expreffes the thing,) it could 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 2QI 

proclaim it to God. The blood cried aloud y 
and demanded punimment. Be pleafed to ob- 
ferve farther, with what fimplicity and 
energy all the circumftances of this tragical 
.ftoiy are here reprefented ! The blood that 
cries, (in which for a long time the life of 
the human foul was fuppofed to refide,) the 
crying meffenger the mother-earth which 
drinks with horror the blood of one of her 
fons, fhed by the hand of his brother, and 
withdraws from the murderer for the time to 
come, the fpontaneous produce of her ferti 
lity. Obferve alfo, my friend, with what 
perfed equity the Supreme Being puniflies ; 
for the curfe unfolds only the natural confe- 
quences of the tranfgreffion. The murderer 
could not remain any longer in the houfe of 
his father, for there he was an objed of horror 
to himfeif and to every one about him : 
Neither could he continue in the place where 
the crime had been committed ; for the blood 
cried to heaven and demanded retribution. 
Cain himfeif faid, IJhall be a fugitive and a 
- ^vagabond in the earth, and itJJjall come to pafs 
that every one that findeth me Jhall flay me *. 

* Genefis, iv. 14. 

U 2 Iu 



292 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

In this dreadful emergency, the merciful Judge 
does for the malefactor what the defpairing 
wretch could not do for himfelf. He places 
him at a certain diftance from the paternal 
manfion, and thus from a variety of objects, 
which could only excite the moft bitter reflec 
tions and the rnofl painful emotions. He 
places him in a lefs fruitful, and probably in 
a hilly country, where the fruits of his labour 
would be lefs abundant, but where, at the 
fame time, he would be fecured from the per- 
fecution of thofe who were favoured with a 
better portion. A brother s blood is thus ex 
piated without bloodfhed, and the malefactor 
is, at the lame time, punifhed and faved. 
Surely you muft perceive in this hiftory, as in 
a mirrour, an example of the paternal go 
vernment of the Deity ; and when you con- 
iider it in all its parts, docs it not appear to 
yon, at the fame time, terrifying, monitory, 
mild, and inftruflive ? 

ALCIPIIKON. Was it, in effect, attended 
with thefe good fruits ? 

Eu GENIUS. Undoubtedly it w?s- recall 
Ib your remembrance the blood \hz.\. ftill fends 

forth 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 293 

forth its voice in the laftbook of the New Terra- 
ment. The fouls there reprefented as crying 
under the altar* with a loud voice, are the fouls 
of thofe who had been ilain for the word of 
God, and fealed their teftimony with their 
blood. They call for vengeance but white 
robes were give?? unto each of them in token of the 
triumph they had gained over death and all 
its terrors, and they were comforted with the 
promife of a future and glorious retribution in 
the day of the final and righteous judgment of 
God. God has reterved for hiinfelf the right of 
avenging the wrongs they have received. It 
is he that executes judgment at the proper 
feafon, againft all adls of violence, and more 
efpecially againft all fecret crimes. Corn- 
plaints that can be made to no mortal, may 
be addrefled, with the greateft facility, to him ; 
what no earthly fovereign can puniih, muft 
arid will be punimed by him, both as the 
Father and the Judge of the human race. 

" He fets our iniquities before us, 

" Our fecret fins in the light of his countenance f ; * 

Or within the reach of his tribunal. 

* Revelations, vi. 19. f Pfalm xc. 8. 

y 3 This 



294 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

This is the comlant and peculiar fpirit, the 
idiotifmus of Hebrew poetry, and this you fee, 
is at the fame time, a fublime idea and a falu- 
tary and inftru&ive leffon for the human 
fpecies. Thus conference was kept awake, 
and men were reftrained at leaft by fear from 
ads of iniquity. It was, moreover, the pe 
culiar purpofe of God to keep their hearts 
and their hands free from the ferocity of ven 
geance, and the guilt of vindictive blood-fhed, 
and to referve the execution of juftice to him- 
felf. Hence the blood that was unjuftly fhed 
was reprefented as crying to heaven for retri 
bution, 

ALCIPHRON. Neverthelefs the end pro- 
pofed was not obtained. With what violence 
does the paifion of fanguinary revenge Hill 
rage among the Arabians.! and even among 
the Hebrews it wa& fpuiid neceflary to enacT: 
law r s for mitigating the violence of vindictive 
juftice. 

EUGENIUS. This only proves that the 
fpirit of revenge was uncommonly violent in 
the hearts of that people, and confequently 
that whatever could tend to diminifh and miti 
gate 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

gate it, was looked upon as falutary. In the 
poetry of the Arabians, the venom of the 
bafilifk is faid to iffue from the bodies of per- 
fons who have been murdered, and continues 
to flow until it is flopped by the blood of vin- 
didive retribution*. A bloody bird is even 
faid to fpring up from the wounds of the 
deceafed which purfues the affaffin ; and it is 
well known that among the Arabians ven 
geance was tranfmitted from generation to 
generation, fo that the avenger in his turn, 
became a prey to vindictive reprifal. In this 
violent ftate of the human mind, agitated by 
propenfities fo fatal to its internal peace and 
moral improvement, whatever had a tend 
ency to foften its afperity and raife its views 
above the world, muft have been regarded as 
a precious gift of heaven ; and if the Orientals 
did not avail themfelves of the falutary and 
affecting leflbns (fo proper to improve them 
in this refped) which are to be found in 
their own poets, they were furely inexcufable. 
Beautiful indeed, and affecting are many paf- 
fages relative to this fubjed, in the Pfalms of 

* There is in the Hamafa, a confiderable number of Ara 
bian poems of this kind and complexion, and many marks of 
Jergcity and vengeance in their hiftory. 

U 4 David, 



296 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

D^vid, and in the Prophets ! How pathetic 
the complaint of Job* ! 

" My eye Is foul with weeping, 
" On my eyelids is already the (hadow of death ! 
. &lt;c Not for any injufnce i,n my hands ; 
s( Alfo my prayer is pure : 
" O earth, cover not thou my blood ! 
&lt;c And let my cry have no place ! 
&lt;c Alfo now behold, my witnefs is in heaven, 
* e And my record is on high : 
&lt; c My friends fcorn me &gt; 
" But mine eye pours out tears unto God." 

Such mild and gracious feelings as thefe, 
are the fineft ftibje&s for poetry, as they are 
the nobleft ornaments of human nature. 

ALCIPHRON. But to return to the difmal 
ftory of the two brothers, Would it not 
have been more worthy of the Judge, as a 
provident Father, to have prevented the fan- 
guinary deed of Cain ? to prevent evil 
feems (till more eligible than to punifh it. 

EUGENIUS. This he did where it was 
poffible : Ke continues fo to do where evil is 

* Job, xvi. 1 6. 

avoid- 






ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 297 

avoidable : in many cafes he undoubtedly 
prevents it. 

" Jehovah had refpeffc to Abel and to his offering ; 
" But to Cain and his offering he had not refpet ; 
" And Cain was very wroth, and his countenance 

fell ; 
" And the Lord faid unto Cain, Why art thou 

" wroth ? 

ic And why is thy countenance fallen ? 
* If thou doell well, (halt thou not be accepted ? 
" And if thou doeft not well fin (as ablood- 

" thirfty fiend,) lieth before thy door V 

This was all that could be addrefled to 
Cain as a moral agent. The Supreme Pa 
rent fpeaks to him as to a wayward fro ward 
child, feems to unfold to him the fecret and 
violent movements of his own heart, and 
frowns upon him, as one would do upon a 
favage beaft, a lion or a tiger, at his door. 
The approaching crime is thus denounced 
and painted in the molt aflfeding manner ; 
and what God did with refpect to Cain, he 
ftill does with refpecl: to every man who will 
give attention to the voice of his Creator, 
which fpeaks in the dictates of his own con- 



fcience. 



Geriefis, iv. 6, 7. 

ALCI- 



298 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

ALCIPHRON. But how will you folve the 
difficulties arifing from the Deluge ? How 
can you juftify the Ruler, who on account of 
certain giants or men of violence^ punifhes the 
whole world, devotes to deftrudtion all living 
creatures, becaufe they (perhaps the animals 
included) had corrupted their ways, and 
fpares only eight perfons with what they 
could fave in the ark, as the only innocent 
part of the human fpecies ? Muft not this 
ftory appear {hocking to the fober fenfe of an 
equitable judge and excite ideas of partial 
ieverity in the Supreme Being ? 

Eu GEN i us. No fhort-fighted creature of 
yefterday may or can arraign the proceedings 
of the ETERNAL MIND, or judge defini 
tively concerning his ways. Events which 
extend over the whole earth, zctz general laws 
of Nature, to which every individual muft 
fubmit with refignation. The ruins of a 
deftroyed city, or the difmal remains of ex- 
tenfive regions which have been funk by 
earthquakes or covered by inundations, are 
not the proper places or objeds for philofo- 
phical fpeculation. Therefore we muft con- 
fider this awful event aqd the hiftorical ac 
count 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 299 

count of it, la a moral and practical point of 
view, and thus we fhall perceive the impref- 
fions they are adapted to make upon attentive 
and unprejudiced minds. The accounts we 
have of the defirudtion of the inhabitants of 
the ancient world, and its unhappy caufe, are 
in the higheft degree lamentable and affecl:- 
ing. 

ALCIPHRON. They are fo, indeed, and 
that becaufe they are gigantic ftories, handed 
down to us from the terrified perfons who 
efcaped. 

EUGENIUS. This circumftance renders 

the narration the more original and authentic. 

The penfive tone that predominates in the 

whole journal of the ark, feems to announce 

the antiquity of its hiftory, and correfponds 

with what you call \hzgigantic ftories of that 

lawlefs rapine and violence which preceded 

the Deluge. And if you compare our Ihort 

fpari of life and our bodily ftrength with the 

accumulated years and ibe conftitutional 

vigour of the primitive Titans of the ancient 

world, (who felt ftill within .them the energy 

of the firft ad of creation, but perverted its 

force 



303 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

force to the purpofes of oppreffion, fenfuality, 
and injuftice,) you will more eafily compre 
hend the horrors that compofe and difhonour 
their hiftory. Even in our times, we fee 
what dreadful calamities and defolations may 
be produced by men of vigorous powers and 
extenfive authority during the fhort period of 
their duration, judge then what an accumu 
lation of evils the earth may have fuffered 
from the violence of thefe Antediluvian op- 
preffors, whofe lives were drawn out to fo 
long a period. If you confider all this with 
due attention, you will find the recital of this 
ancient tradition very natural : 

And Jehovah faw that the wickednefs of man was 

" great upon earth *, 
* And that every imagination of the thoughts of his 

tc heart wag only evil continually, 
&lt;c And it repented the Lord that he had made man 

" upon earth." i. e. men who made -fucli an 

atrocious progrefs in iniquity. 

Accordingly Jehovah aded in the cafe as a 
Judge, and at the fame time as a Father he 
gave the earth another direction or arrange 
ment. 

* Genefis, vi. 5, 6, 7. 

ALCI- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 30 1 

ALCIPIIRON. What do you mean ? 

EUGENIUS. I mean, that the conftitution 
of the globe underwent a change or new 
modification in confequence of the Deluge, 
and the life of man was confiderably abridged. 
At the fame time, in whatever manner we 
may attempt to inveftigate and explain the 
caufes and circumftances of this tremendous 
inundation, we mult always come to this 
conclusion, that it was the remit of the gene 
ral laws of Nature. The earth had been 
gradually formed by the Creator from water, 
the water had, probably, at different times 
covered its furface, and, in the fir ft periods 
of its population, inundations muft naturally 
have been frequent every where. It is 
highly probable, that in thefe early times the 
hilly mountainous parts of the globe were 
alone habitable, and that the reft lay under 
water. A fliock here or there, might raifc 
the water above the more elevated places 
which had been recently inhabited, and the 
earth s axis may have met with an impulfion 
which changed its diredion wiili refpecl to 
the ecliptic. In a word, however fecond 
caufes may have operated in tins great and 

awful 



302 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

awful revolution, certain it is, that all things 
then came into the ftate under which the crea 
tion now groans *, and the firft heroic period^ as 
it is called, muft probably have exhibited 
nothing more than the afpecl: of a human 
race forming anew, but bearing the marks 
of its priftine diforder. The duration of 
this new ftate, required new arrangements. 
At the firft formation of the human race a 
long life was neceflary ; but it is no longer 
fo : our condition here and our future de- 
ftination do not require it. After the Deluge, 
God made a new covenant or arrangement 
with refpect to feafons, manners, laws, and 
the duration of human life. From this 
period commences, though with feeble glim 
merings, our hiilory, the hiftory of the pre- 
fent human race. The narrations and events 
of preceding periods found in our ears only 
as ftories of heroes and giants, which come 
to us from an immenfe diftance over the 
floods or waves of a drowned world. 

ALCIPHRON. I wiih, however, that we 
knew fomething more of thefe giant fables. 

* According to the fcripture expreflion, Rom. viii. 22. 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 303 

Eu GENIUS. That is not at all necefTary ; 
for even the little that we know of them has 
been miferably perverted. Many abfurd and 
romantic ftories have been invented concern 
ing thokfofts of God who made amorous vifits 
to the daughters ofmen^ and, neverthelefs, we 
find the denomination,^^/ ofGod^ i. e. heroes, 
men of extraordinary ftrength and beauty, 
generally -ufed in all the heroic poems of an 
cient times. But we lofe liht of our fub- 



ALCIPHRON. By no means, if we confider 
this difmal cataftrophe of the earth, though a 
confequence of the general laws of Nature, 
yet, at the fame time, as a punifhment of the 
atrocities of the giants, and their licentious 
connections with the daughters of men, and 
alfo if we confider Noah as faved from the 
general Deluge, becaufe he was a. good man &gt; a 
favourite of heaven. 

EUGENIUS. Such indeed, he was. God 
made him inftrumental in crufhing the vio 
lence of the tyrants, and thus in reftoring 
peace and tranquillity upon earth. This 
righteous man had been opprefled and tor 

mented 



304 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

merited by the men of violence, and was now 
delivered from their fury, though by a pain 
ful, affliding, and terrible cataftrophe. How 
narrow and difmal is his habitation in the 
ark ! With what anxious expectation does 
he open the window of his floating manfion* 
and fend out the dove ! How reviving and 
delightful is the firft olive-branch with -which 
the bird returns from the watery wafte ! 
The whole {lory (and this is a moral proof of 
its authenticity) contains no contemptuous 
invecYive, or malicious triumph, in defcribing 
the downfal of the men of violence. It only 
relates with iimplicity the anxious feelings of 
the fmall number who were faved from the 
general wreck, who beheld the firft beautiful 
rainbow as a pleafing token of the returning 
fun and the divine mercy, and who trod the 
mud of old Mother Earth with that unufual 
kind of tranfport which is excited by a 
fplendid vifion or a delightful dream. 

" And Jehovah fmelled the fweet favour of their 
* firft oblation, and laid, I will not again curfe 
* the ground any more, for man s fake V 

* Genefis, viii* 

And 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES; 305 

And then follows the gracious promife that 
Vvhile the earth remained, the order of the 
feafons fhould not be again interrupted, nor 
feed-time and harveft, fummer and winter, 
day and night ever ceafe. What a fublime 
mixture of grandeur and goodnefs expreffed 
with the greateft fiiiiplicity, muft an attentive 
mind perceive and feel in this promife ! If the 
fnajefty of the righteous Judge was awful, 
how reviving is the mild expredion of his 
benignity ! He beholds the returning rain 
bow even with a kind of paternal pleafure. 
He exhibits it as the fplendid emblem of his 
goodnefs ; as the firft fmileof a revived world 
on the dark and clouded atmofphere ; and in- 
ftitutes it as the fign of his inviolable and 
everlafting covenant. He encircles the earth 
anew with a perpetual choir of chearful hours, 
regulated in their motion by the brilliant 
fource of day, with whom they ftill perform 
their courfe. 

ALCIPHRON. I have 1 never confidered 
the poft-diluvian rainbow under this point of 
view, and I have often been at a lofs to com 
prehend how a tranfient cloudy phenomenon 

x could 



306 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

could be employed as the fign and memorial 
of an everlafting covenant. 

EUGENIUS. Yes, my friend, of a cove 
nant fo firm and permanent, that the prophet 
Ifaiah applies to this great event the follow 
ing declaration of the Governor of the world : 
" The mountains fo all depart^ and the hills Jh all 
" be removed, but my loving-kindnefs Jhall not 
" depart from thee, neither fhall the cove- 
" nant of my peace be removed, faith the 
u Lord that hath mercy on thee. In a little 
&lt;c wrath I hide my face from thee for a mo- 
" ment, but with everlafting kindnefs will I 
" have mercy upon thee, faith the Lord, thy 
u Redeemer* ." The Northern traditions, 
according to their manner of reporting and 
modifying the fats recorded in facred hiftory,- 
reprefented the rainbow as a bridge, which 
is fattened at the two extremities of the 
earth, and can never be broken but by the 
thunder-ftorms and volcanic eruptions that 
fhall finally involve the globe itfelf, in general 
ruhr. This indeed is an awkward reprefent- 
ation, or rather depravation of the old and 
facred record, but fhews, however } its mean- 

* Ifaiah, liv. 7. 10. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 307 

ing, and the awful objedl to which it points. 
Hence alfo proceeded another tradition, in 
tended to fhow, that as the world was not 
again to be diffolved by water, its final de- 
ftrudion would be accompliftied by fire. In 
fhort, my friend, thefe fcattered fragments of 
hiftory and tradition, terminate in one great 
objecl, and as man is a reafonable creature he 
ought to confide,!" all thefe things in a rational 
manner. It was expedient that the earth, 
defiled by the vices of its inhabitants, fhould 
be cleanfed by the waters of the deluge, and 
that the perfons who efcaped that tremendous 
defolation, fhould come into the new world, 
with deep impreffions of the awful manner in 
which the Supreme Being punifhes tranfgref- 
fion and revolt, and endeavour to render thefe 
impreffions general. The laws of Noah are 
folemn and pofitive on this head. They bear 
witnefs to the defperate obftinacy and vio 
lence of preceding times, and may be confi- 
dered as the firft code of the laws of Nature: 
and the rights of man, (and why not of bead 
too ?) in a renewed world. As foon as at the 
building of the Tower of Babel, there was 
even a flight appearance of a firnilar attempt 
of new giants, or men of violence, to trouble 

X 2 



308 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

the world, the celeftial Judge comes forth 
again 

ALCIP&RON. Aye, there we have again 
a fine ftory. The whole human race fpeak 
one and the fame language ; and as if it had 
been poffible to preferve always this famenefs 
of language, and remain in the fame place, 
againft the will of Providence, which was 
that the reft of the world fhould be peopled, 
they attempt building a tower whofe fummit 
jfhould reach to heaven This is not all God 
is reprefented as entertaining ferious appre- 
henfions concerning this audacious project, 
and in order to make them abandon it, he 
performs, I know not what kind of miracle, on 
their lips and language, that an event might 
be brought about, which muft have naturally 
happened in procefs of time, I mean their fe* 
paration from each other, and their difperfion 
into different parts of the world. Pardon me, 
EUGENIUS, if I tell you frankly^ that this 
ftory, whether confidered in itfelf, or as a 
mark of the interpofition of the celeftial Judge, 
appears to me very abfurd* 

o * 

Eu GENIUS. Its appearing fuch to you, is 

not 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 309 

not a demonftrative proof that it is fuch I a 
reality. Be fo good as to coniider where this 
ttory is placed. 

ALGIPHRON. It is placed between genea 
logical tables of Noah and his defendants *. 

EUGENIUS. And after genealogies, which, 
as you will obferve, are already divided, 
with refpedt to languages, lands, and nations. 
The collector of thefe relations knew, that in 
confequence of the migration of families, and 
the formation of civil eftablifliments in new 
diftricts, and with new inftitutions and occu 
pations, language muft naturally have under 
gone variations ; and he therefore inferts the 
ftory of Babel between the two genealogies, 
to give fome idea of the incident which placed 
men in the painful neceffity of feparating and 
inhabiting different regions. 

ALCIPHRON. They propofed then to 
keep themfelves together by erecting thU 
ehildifli Tower ? as a point of reunion ? 

* Genefis, xi. 



310 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. It is accordingly reprefented 
afc a foolifh undertaking, and has a fuitable 
conclufion. Becaufe they were of one tongue 
or language, they formed the idea of building 
a Tower that {hould reach to heaven, and 
when they were attempting to execute this 
extravagant purpofe, they found an alteration 
in their tongues and fpeech. They wanted a 
common rendezvous to prevent their difper- 
fion, and, neverthelefs, they were difperfed. 
The object and defign of the narration, you 
fee, are evident. 

ALCIHPRON. And what do you fay of 
God s being reprefented as coming dovu?^ and 
of his fears on the occaiion ? 

EUGENIUS. It is evidently no more than 
kfatirical manner of fpeech to caft derifion on 
their proceedings. In fhort, the whole ftory 
is a fatire. Have you ever confidered the 
fecond Pfalm with attention ? There reigns 
in it a fpirit of raillery, if I may ufe that 
term, entirely firnilar and relative to that be- 
fpre us. 



4&lt; Why do the nations rage, 
" And imagine a vain thing ? 



The 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 31! 

tf The kings of the earth fet themfelves, 

( And the rulers take counfel together, againft 

" Jehovah? 

t He that fitteth in the heavens (hall laugh ; 
* f Jehovah (hall have them in derifion." 

In this paflage you have the beft poflible illuf- 
tration of the whole ftory. Obferve in the 
chapter preceding *, who it was that reigned 
in Babel. 

ALCIPHRON. It was Nimrod " the 
* c mighty hunter before the Lord." 

EUGENIUS. And why was he fo called? 
It was not furely for fuch a filly reafon as 
that of his running after foxes and hares in 
the plains of Senaar, which is neither a hilly 
nor a woody country ; befides, my friend, 
foxes and hares are not hunted before the 
Lord. We muft therefore, in our refearches, 
confine ourfelves to the plain and common 
fignification of the words. Pray what is 
pieant by a hunter in the Hebrew language ? 



, It fignifies a maker of 

f Genefis, x. 8. 

X 4 fnares, 



312 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

fnares, or the perfon who employs them, - 
an enfnarer. 

EUGENIUS. A mighty hunter is therefore 
an enfnarer; that is, a man who reduces 
others by art and cunning, under his power 
and dominion. Such a man was Nimrod ;~ 
In this i4ght does he appear in the traditions 
of the aft, in which he is frequently men 
tioned ; and this confirms the narration 
which you feem diipofed to confider as, ridi 
culous. He found in his excurfions a beauti 
ful and extenfive plain he alfo found mate 
rials and "artificers to build there, not only a 
! permanent reficlence, but even a lofty, regal 
tower. The pour people, who were little 
better than innocent favages and whom he 
Ijad hunted^ that is, eufnared into fubjedion, 
were made to believe that thp tower they 
were to build, was defigned for their common 
fafety an^l as a point of reunion, while in fris 
intention, it was to be no more than a memo-? 
rial of his own grandeur and theii fervitude. 
Now, you know that in the earlieft times, 
heaven was confidered as the refidence 9f the 
*); confequently whatever approached 
acaven, was adapted to excite admiration 

and 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 313 

and awe. On this principle, the daring en- 
terprize of Nimrod is founded : 

" And they faid, go to, 

" Let us build a city, and a tower, 

Whofe top may reach unto heaven." 

Upon this, God is reprefented as faying, 

&lt; Go to, let us go down, 

" And there confound their language, 

That they may not underftand one another s 

f&lt; fpeech. 

And this they begin to do, 
&lt; c And now nothing will be retrained from them, 

* that they have imagined f,o do/ 

You furely perceive the fpirit of irony that 
runs through the whole of this paflage. 

ALCIPHRON. I begin now to be fur-? 
prifed that I did not perceive it fooner, 



EUGENIUS. The keeneft ridicule is 
haps that which is founded on the contempti 
ble iffue of arrogant and pompous undertak 
ings. This people aimed at no lefs than the 
fcaling of heaven : God is faid to have 
Apprehended that they would perfevere in 

their 



3 :I 4 : ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

their gigantic project, until they brought It 
into execution ; and therefore flightly touch 
ing their lips, as it were, with the tip of his 
finger ; he altered a little the direction of the 
breath that flowed over their tongues, and 
down fell, at once, all their lofty projects. 
The unfiniftied tower remains. It is called 
Babel, i. e. confufion, and is an everlafting 
memorial of audacious pride confounded by 
a volition of the Moft High. The narration 
is carried on in a manner perfectly fuitable to 
the nature of the event. It is a beautiful ex 
ample of fine irony and derifion, prefented 
with a calm fimplicity, and delineated in the 
action itfelf, where we fee grandeur and 
littlenefs, arrogance and difappointment, in 
the moft ftriking contrafts. God does not 
employ here the mighty and awful inftru- 
ments which execute his commands in the 
kingdom of Nature a fmall change in the 
breath of the mouth is as powerful in his 
hand, as the moft formidable peals of light 
ning and thunder. Accordingly the ufurper 
of his fovereignty is crufhed and overcome by 
the moft minute and inconfiderable object 
that can be conceived. He ftands before us 
as an object of deferved contempt. He an4 

his 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 315 

his royal refidence are terms of derifioru 
" This was the violent man-hunter before tht 
" LordC who looked upon himfelf as nearly 
equal to Jehovah, who attempted to mount 
up to heaven on the fhoulders of a deluded 
and enflaved people. That my illuftration of 
this remarkable paffage of Scripture hiftory is 
admiffible, will appear evident from all that 
has been faid concerning Babel by the Hebrew 
bards, particularly to thofe who cpnfider, 
with attention, the tone and chara&er of this 
ancient ftory. 

ALCIPHRON. What do you mean ? 

EUGENIUS. I mean that the term Babd^ 
continues to convey the fame ideas that are 
connected with it in this ftory. It is the 
permanent and expreffive fymbol of arro 
gance, confufion, tyrannical pride, infidious 
ambition, oppreffion and violence. Babel is 
every where what it appears here. It is, on 
the one hand, the emblem of enterprizing 
and impious ambition and on the other, the 
fymbol of confufion, defolation, and of the 
contempt and difdain with which God be 
holds, the gigantic and arrogant defigns of 

man, 



316 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

man. In former times, a proud Queen held 
In her hand a cup of intoxication, whofe 
contents, as here, fhe firft dealt about to the 
inhabitants of the earth, and of which fhe 
was to drink herielf, in her turn : her glory 
patTed like a dream, and this Queen was 
Babel. 

ALCIPHRON. You really give me a kind 
of key to all the prophets who fpeak of 
Babel ; for all their poetical expreffions con 
cerning it are of this flamp. 

EUGENIUS. The poetical defcriptions of 
other nations are in a fnnilar ftrain and 
equally charadteriftic, as we fhall fee at 
another time. In the laft book of the facred 
writings, Babel comes forth again in nearly 
the fame portraiture. She has in her hand a 
cup of enchantment, with which fhe has in 
toxicated the nations. On her forehead is 
the name viblafphemy, and fhe finks at length, 
like a mill-ftone, while a burlefque lamentar 
tion accompanies her fall, fimilar to the jocu 
lar narration before us: " This mighty 
" fcourge of the world, this man-hunter be- 

v fore. 



DIALOGUES. 

u fore the Lord, is expofed to eternal fliame 
u and reproach." 

ALCIPHRON. This recalls to my mind a 
beautiful funeral poem in Ifaiah, of which I 
took particular notice in our conferences con 
cerning the region of the dead. It exhibits 
the fame kind of calm and folemn derifion 
which you then mentioned : its very found 
refembles that flute-tone which is fuited to a 
gentle, ftill fpecies of pleafantry. The verfe 
proceeds flowly, in long elegiack words, like a 
funeral dirge which is performed over the 
dead ; and nevertheless, it is from beginning 
to end, full of derifion and irony. 

EUGENIUS. Be fo good as to read it. 



ALCIPHRON reads: 

" In the day that Jehovah (hall give thee reft from 
" thy forrow, from thy fear, and from thy 
st hard bondage, 

f&lt; Then (halt thou take up this fong agumft the King 
* of Babel, and thus fmg : 

fl How hath the oppreiTor ceai ed ? 

" How is the cxatirefs of gold become dill ? 

" Jehovah hath broken the ftaff of the wicked, 

l{ The rod of the tyrants. 

Pie 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" He who fmote the people in wrath, 

" With a continual ftroke which none efcaped j 

" He that ruled the nations in anger, 

s And none hindered the oppreflbr, 

* { Is iijw oerfecuted, and none hinderetlu 

if Now the whole earth is at reft ; 

&lt;c The nations break forth into firiging 5 

* f The fir-trees rejoice ever you ; 

f The cedars of Lebanon, faying, 

" Since thou art fallen, 

" No feller cometh up againft us. 

*&lt; The empire of death from beneath was moved 

" through fear of thee j 
t It rofe to meet thee, at thy coming : 
" It ftirred up the ghofts for thee : 
" The kings and heroes of the earth all flood up : 
s They rofe from their thrones to welcome thee* 

" and faid : 

" Art thou alfo become a fhadow ? 
" Art thou become like unto us ? 

** Thy pomp is caft down to the grave,* 
** And the rioife of thy viols ; 
" The worm is fpread under thee, 
And the worms cover thee. 

" How art thou fallen from heaven,? 
" O morning-ftar, fon of the dawn I 
" Thou art cut down to the ground : 
" Thou which didft crulh the nations I 

" Thou didft fay in thy heart, 
&lt;* I will afcend to heaven, 

Above 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

&lt; Above the ftars of God will I exalt my throne : 
4&lt; I will fet my throne in the mount of the congrega- 
" tion, in the higheft regions of the north. 

" I will afcend above the heights of heaven ; 

" I will afcend above the heights of the clouds 3 

I will be like the Moft High. 

" Yet thou (halt thou be caft down to hell, 

" In the depths of the pit. 

s&lt; And they that fee thee (hall look down upon thee, 

" and fay, 

&lt;f Is that the man that made the earth tremble ? 
" That deftroyed the kingdoms ? 
" That made the world as a wildernefs, 
" And deftroyed the cities thereof? 
" And opened not the houfe of his prifoners ? 

" All the kings of the nations fleep in glory, 

f( Every one in his houfe the grave : 

g&lt; But thou art cad out of thy grave, 

" As an abominable branch, 

" Covered with carcafes which have fallen by the 

" fword; 

" Which go down to the (tones of the pit : 
f( So lied thou, as a carcafe trodden under feet* 

if Thou malt not be joined with them in burial, 

" Becaufe thou haft deftroyed thy land, 

" And {lain thy people : 

" The feed of evil-doers iliall never be renowned. 

* l Prepare {laughter for his children, for the iniquity 
* of their fathers 5 

" That 



J20 ORIENTAL DIALOGUED 

&lt; That they do not rife and inherit the land, 
" Nor fill the world with cities* 

(t I will rife up againft you, faith Jehovah Sabaothj 
* I will cut off from Babel the name and remnant, 
The fort and trephew, faith the Lord. 
" I will alfo make it a poffeflion for the bittern, and 

" pools of water, 

" And I willfweep it with the beforri of deftrucYidn, 
" Saith Jehovah Sabaoth*" 

EUGENIUS. Here then you fee Babel, 
this arrogant oppreffor, attempting to take 
even the heavens by ftorm, and to raife her 
throne above the ftars and then what 
follows ? The Mofl High beholds her with 
derifion, and finks her to the depths of hell 
{he becomes the emblem of humbled pride 
and chaflifed arrogance in the Hebrew poetry, 
and feveral lines of the elegy you have been 
reading, are perfectly deicriptive of Nimrod 
and the famous Tower, But we begin to 
wander from our fubjedl:, like the difperfed 
people of which we are fpeaking. The great 
and important truth, which 1 propofed to afcer- 
tain and illuftrate, is this, " that the poetry 
" of the Eaft is peculiarly adapted to fix our 
" attention on that over-ruting Providence of 

" the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 32! 

the celeftial Judge, which confounds and 
crufhes the arrogance of tyrants, and 

ALCIPHRON. And exalts , you mean to 
fay, the bumble. Aye here we come to the 
contrafts in the government of Providence, 
which I mentioned in the beginning of our 
conference. But there is in thefe contrafts 
fuch a uniformity of tone, if I may ufe that 
expreflion, fuch a famenefs, that 

EUGENIUS. Such alfo you found the 
parallelifm when I firft mentioned it, but you 
were foon reconciled to it. The contrafts of 
high and low, which are prefented to us in 
the fcripture accounts of God s providential 
government, with fuch ftriking effects of 
light and made, what are they but the very 
nature of things ? Do they not exhibit a 
lively picture of the real events and revolu 
tions of the world? What do we fee, 
wherever we turn our eyes, but ebb and flow, 
elevation and downfall, growth and decay ? 
Nothing remains long, nothing continues 
always in the fame ftate. All things here be 
low are a perpetual motion, under the eye of 
the GREAT BEING, who is ever the fame. 

Y The 



322 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

The world with all its noify and gigantic 
heroes, is but a frail bubble. Hefiod and 
Homer, jEfchylus and Pindar, hold this lan 
guage, and could not indeed fpeak in any 
other manper, when they fpeak of the ordi 
nary courfe of human affairs comparatively 
with their Deity, or Superintendant, Immut 
able Dejliny. They point out the fame con- 
trafts of weaknefs and ftrength, elevation and 
downfall, as if they had copied the Eaftem 
bards. Now I am ready to acknowledge, 
that changes and revolutions in the lot of the 
great and mighty men of the earth, may have 
been peculiarly rapid, numerous and awful 
in the fcenes of Oriental defpotifm ; but 
after all, my friend, change, revolution, and 
decay, are every where the conclufion of the 
hiftory of man. When now, we confider 
thefe changes and revolutions in themfelves, 
they afford neither inftrudion nor pleafure ; 
but when we view them with attention, in 
telligence, and reflection, and compare them 
with our own actions, enjoyments, trials, 
and fufferings, they will become, by analogy, 
ufeful monitors ; for the life of man may be 
confidered as a miniature of the fate of na 
tions. I efteem, particularly on this account, 

the 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 323 

the book of Job, the Pfalms, and the Pro 
phets, in which the changing fcenes of hu 
man life are defcribed with truth, energy, 
and a noble fimplicity. 

ALCIPHRON. You might add, that our 
own hymns are not without merit, in this 
refped: . 

EUGENIUS. By no means; many of 
them are truly pathetic and fublime, more 
efpecially thofe which have been modelled on 
the poetry of Job, and the Pfalms, and treat 
of the wifdom, grandeur, and goodnefs, of the 
Divine Providence. They have, accordingly, 
produced falutary effects on the hearts of many. 
They have comforted the afflicted, ftrengthen- 
edthe weak, and given courage and resolution 
to the timorous. They come to the dejected 
and the difconfolate like a voice from heaven, 
which fpeaks to them in the defert, and 
renders their journey through it, more com 
fortable and cheerful by the views which they 
exhibit. The book of Job, and the Pfalms 
contain an ineftimable treafure of moral ob- 
fervations on human life, on happinefs and 
mifery, pride and humility, a rational and 
y 2 a prefump- 



324 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

kprefumptuous felf-confidence, and above all, 
on that fum and fubftance of human comfort^ 
an humble, but firm confidence in God. 
And as through the whole of this poetry, the 
eye of God is reprefented as always open and 
attentive to the affairs and actions of men, 
it gives, methinks, by this very circumftance, 
to the events of human life a certain afpect of 
unity and fimplicity, without leading us to 
lofe fight of the connection between fubordi- 
nate caufes and efFedls in the natural world. 
The poetry of the Greeks is gaudy and 
iplendid, but it has not the pure and fub- 
lime fimplicity of the Oriental mufe : that of 
the Celtic bards paints from Nature, and is 
admirable in many refpeds ; but when I 
read it, I think I am walking under an even 
ing Iky befet with clouds. It exhibits, indeed, 
beautiful fcenes in the clouds, and on the 
earth, but without a fun, without God, 
without any ultimate end^ which points out 
the connection of things and their iflue. 
In fuch poetry we are carried here and there 
like a cloud before the wind ; while in the 
Eaft we Hand firm and ferene, on the rock 
of ages, the eternal and unchangeable God. 

I will 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 325 

I will feck unto the Lord *, 

" Unto God will I commit my caufe, 

&lt;c Who doth great things and unfearchable, 

(( Marvellous things without number. 

" He giveth rain upon the earth, 

" And fendeth water upon the parched deferts ; 

" To fet up on high thole that be low, 

" And exalt to fafety thofe that mourn. 

" He difappointeth the devices of the crafty, 

&lt;{ So that their hands cannot perform their enterprife; 

" He taketh the wife in their own craftinefs, 

&lt;c And the counfel of the froward is carried headlong, 

" So that they meet with darknefs in the day-time, 

" And grope in the noon-day as at midnight. 

(&lt; But he faveth the poor from the fword, 

&lt;c And delivereth him from the hand of the mighty ; 

" So that the poor hath hope, 

&lt;c And iniquity (toppeth her mouth. 

" Behold, happy is the man whom God correteth : 
" Therefore defpife not thou the chaftening of the 

" Almighty. 

" Eor he maketh fore and bindeth up ; 
&lt;c He woundeth and maketh whole. 

&lt;c In fix troubles (hall he deliver thee ; 
ft Yea, in feven, lhall there no evil touch thee. 
" In famine he (hall redeem thee from death, 
** And in war, from the power of the fword. 

* Job, v. 8, 

y 3 " Thoij 



526 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" Thou (halt be hid from the fcourge.of the tongue ; 
" Neither (halt thou be afraid of destruction when it 

" cometh. 

" At deftruction and famine thou malt laugh, 
" Neither (halt thou be afraid of the beafts of the 

field. 

" Thou malt know alfo that thy feed (hall be great, 
" And thine offspring as the grafs of the earth j 
&lt;c Thou (halt come to thy grave in a full age, 
" As a mock of corn cometh in, in his feafon." 

Let it be our ambition, my friend, to afpire 
after the character of the favourites of Provi^ 
derice. It will be our own fault, if we forfeit 
the comforts of that happy relation, by an in 
dolent neglect of the ufe of our faculties and 
means, arifing from a fupine and prefumptuous 
reliance on its extraordinary fuccours. With all 
due deference to the opinions of others on 
this fubject, it appears evident to me, that an 
intelligent and attentive obfervation of natu 
ral objects, of the courfe of human affairs, 
and of the moral conduct of men, is per 
fectly adapted to produce that fpecies of 
poetry, which animates the moft powerfully 
to confidence in the Deity and his providen 
tial government. The Orientals have fhewn 
this clearly by their productions, and the ear- 
4 lieft 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 327 

Heft poetry of the Greeks is, in this refpecl:, 
entirely Oriental. By this fimple, pleafing, 
and affecting method of conveying their ob- 
fervations on human life, manners and 
events, they impart conviction to the moil 
untutored underftanding, and confolation to 
the afflicted heart. Their obfervations are 
as it were, a mirrour of the world, and the 
inftructive refult of what their wife fore 
fathers learned by long experience. Thus the 
feafons of life, like thofe of the year, the 
fcenes of Nature and thofe of humanity, are 
connected under the empire of him who 
rules over all. Thus we hear perfons of ex 
perience and difcernment, in the advanced 
period of human life, when the fervour of 
youthful fpirits has evaporated, fpeaking in 
the fame ftrain with Job, the Pfalmift, and 
the Prophets, while the inconfiderate, unbe 
lieving young man comes at laft to acknow 
ledge that they have fpoken the truth. The 
hymns of praife, infpired by pious and 
attentive views of the ways of Providence, 
are, for the moft part, relative to the objects 
and events we have hitherto been confider- 
ing, fuch as the general Deluge, the difcovery 
of wicked defigns, and the difappointment of 

Y 4 audacious 



328 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

audacious and impious projects. Thefe arc 
truly grand and interefting fubjefcs for facred 
hymns, in praife of God s ruling wifdom, 
omnipotence, and majefty ; and when they 
are blended with the difplays of his paternal 
and protecting goqdnefs, they conftitute a 
kind of poetry, which opens in the heart the 
pureft fources of confolation, confidence, and 
delight. I would wifh to fee a poem defcrip- 
tive of the moft fignal and affecting events 
and revolutions of our times, compofed with 
true Oriental fimplicity, -like the following, 
for example * : 



I. 



* God is our refuge arid ftrength, 

t( A very prefect help in trouble : 

Therefore mall we not fear, though the earth be 

" removed, 
And though the mountains be carried into the 

midft of the fea ; 

&lt; e Though the waters thereof roar and be troubled * 
Though the mountains fhake with the fwelling 

&lt; c thereof. 

&lt;e Still there is a river, 

" Whofe dreams mall make glad the city of God, 
&lt; The holy place of the Moft High. 

* Pfalm xlvi. 

God 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 329 

God is in the midft of her ; 

" She mall not be moved, 

" God (hall help her, 

" And that right early. 

" The nations raged the kingdoms were moved ; 

" The Lord uttered his voice the earth melted. 

" The Lord of hofts is with us, 

&lt;e The God of Jacob is our refuge. 

" Come, behold the works of the Lord ! 

" He maketh defolations upon the earth ! 

" He maketh wars to ceafe to the end of the world ! 

&lt;e He breake*h the bow, and cutteth the fpear 

" afunder ! 

" He burneth the chariot in the fire ! 
&lt;c Be ftill, and know that I am God : 
" I will be exalted among the nations ! 
" I will be exalted on the earth ! 
" The Lord of hofts is with us, 
" The God of Jacob is our refuge." 



330 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 



IF. 

A HYMN on PROVIDENCE. 

Halleluia *. 

Pralfe Jehovah, O my foul ! 

While I live, will I praife the Lord ! 

" 1 will fing praifes to my God, 

* While I have any being. 

Put not your truft in princes, 

" Nor in the fon of man, 

" In whom there is no help ! 

(( His breath goeth forth he returneth to his earth ; 

" In that very day his thoughts periih. 

" Happy is he that hath the God of Jacob for his 

" help, 

" Whofe hope is in the Lord Jehovah, 
Who made heaven, earth, the fea, and all that 

" therein is ; 

c Who keepeth truth forever; 
" Who executeth judgment for the opprefled ; 
c Who giveth food to the hungry 
" The Lord openeth the eyes of the blind ; 
" The Lord raifeth them that are bowed down ; 
&lt;c The Lord loveth the righteous; 
" The Lord preferveth the (hangers ; 
&lt;c He relieveth the fatherlefs and the widow : 
44 But the way of the wicked he turneth upfidc 

" down. 

" The Lord mall reign for ever ; 
" Even thy God, O Zion ! to all generations, 
Praife ye the Lord !" 

* Pfalm cilvi. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 33! 

III. 

JOB S Eulogy of. WISDOM* 

CHAPTER xxviii, pqffim. 

Ver. i. " Surely there is a vein for the filver, 
" And a place for the gold, where they fine it ; 
" Iron is taken out of the earth, 
" And out of the earth cometh up bread." 

12. " But where fhall wifdom be found ? 
(c And where is the place of underfbnding ? 

13. " Man knoweth not the price thereof; 
" Neither is it found in the land of the living, 

14. " The depth faith, It is not in me : 
tf And the fea faith, It is not with me. 

15. " It cannot be gotten for gold, 

" Neither (hall iilver be weighed for the price 
" thereof; 

16. " It cannot be valued with the gold of Ophir ; 
Cf With the precious onyx, or the fapphire. 

17. " The gold and the chryftal cannot equal it ; 
** And the exchange of it fhall not be for jewels of 

" fine gold. 

1 8. " No mention {hall be made of coral or pearls: 
" For the price of wifdom is above rubies. 

19. " The topaz of Ethiopia (hall riot equal it ; 
" Neither (hall it be valued with pure gold *: 

20. Whence 

* All the treafures here mentioned area farther proof of 
what has been already obferved, even that the book of Job is 
an Idumean production. The people of that country carried 
on, very early, an extealive trade from JSzion gcler and 

Elath&gt; 



332 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

20. " Whence cometh then wifdom ? 
" Where is the place of underftanding, 
" Seeing it is hid from the eyes of the living ?" 

22. t( Definition and death fay, 
" We have heard the fame thereof with our ears. 



JE/atb, on the Arabian gulph, which the IfraeKtes did not 
attempt before the reign of Solomon. Hence the knowledge 
of Opbir, ^Ethiopia, and their precio us rarities here men 
tioned. From the paffages relative to the working of mines, 
\vhich \ve meet with in this book, fome have been led to en 
tertain doubts concerning its high antiquity ; but without 
reafon : as foon as gold and precious Hones were dug out of 
the earth, there muft have been mines and mines, of fome 
kind, muft have been of ancient date. The pafTage in Job 
where it is faid, that go &lt;d comes from the north, is very erro- 
neoufly explained, when it is applied to the gold trade. The 
gold trade, known to Job, was carried on fouthwards, over 
the Arabian fea, and the parallelifm of the pafTage above men 
tioned, fptaks of gleams of gold, (perhaps what we call 
northern lights,) in which God is manifcfted from that part 
of the atmofphejje. 

It is farther worthy of obfervation, that WISDOM is not 
yet perfonlfied here, as it is in the Proverbs of Solomon. 
The poetry of Job is of a much more ancient date than that of 
the Proverbs. The latter is brilliant, the former is fublimc. 
The latter is full of fenfe and melody ; but it has not the ful- 
jninating power and grandeur which chara&erife the old 
Idumean took. It is, therefore, a juit matter of furprife, that 
any critic of judgment and tafle, mould have attributed the 
compofition of the Song of Songs to the author of the book 
of job. The poetical ilyle and the manner of thinking are 
totally different in thefe two productions. 

23. " God 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 333 

23. " God underfiandeth the way thereof 5 
And he knoweth the place thereof ; 

For he looketh to the ends of the earth, 

24, 25. " And feeth under the whole heaven, 
To make the weight for the wind?, 

And to weigh the waters by meafure . 

27. " Then did he fee it and declare it ; 
" And unto man he faid : 

28. " Behold die fear of the Lord, that is WISDOM, 
And to depart from evil, is UNDKHSTANDIN G." 



DIALOGUE VIII. 

Concerning the objections that have been made 
to the poetry of the Ifraelltcs, as exhibiting a 
fp irlt of partiality and prejudice with refpccl 
to other nations- The con duel of the patri 
archs exam med The party-fplrit of the 
tribes with refpec~f to each other How ihefe 
objections muji be examined, appreciated, and 
anfwered Of Ham s tranfgrefJiQn and pu- 
nlfhment /// what they conjlfled Plow far 
they regarded Canaan Of Noah s Intoxica 
tion Of the journeys and wanderings of 
Abraham^ and the rights and privileges 
which were vefted In him by the Canaanhes 
themf elves Of his con ducf In Egypt , and Ms 
noble and magnanimous character ~Qf his 
friendjhlp with God, according to a fcripture 
exprejjlon And the eminent qualities that 
jitted him for forming a people, and govern 
ing them Firfl characler of the Hebrew 
poetry, confidered as the poetry of a nation In 
a federal connexion of fricndfiip with the 
Mojl High PaJJagesfrom Ifalah relative to 
the example of Abraham Of the faults and 
infirmities of the patriarchs, and particularly 

f 



of Jacob Whether Jacob obtained the 
honourable title of ISRAEL in a dream ? 
An illujlration of the hiflory of his conteft 
ivith ELOHIM Of the contejls between gods 
and men in other nations "The diflinclive 
and fymbolical fcnfe of this relation Jacob s 
dream of the ladder , and his idea concerning 
angels Whether in the blejjings pronounced 
on his fons, Ifaac is to be charged with par- 
- tiality Of the blejjings pronounced on 
Ifrael A defcription ofHagars wanderings 
in the wilder nefs A ble fling pronounced on 
ESAU A fecond character of the Hebrew 
poetry , relative to their guardian God^ and 
the Fathers THREE SUPPLEMENTAL PIECES 
from the book of Job, which exhibit in him 
the happintfs) condncJ^ and moral virtues 
of an Eqftern prince* 



( 33? ) 



DIALOGUE VIII. 

A LC I PHRON. During our late conferences, 
you pointed out to me in the writings and 
hiftory of the Hebrews, the doclrine of a?i 
over-ruling Providence^ as the chief ornament 
of their poetry, and a diftin&ive mark of 
their fuperiority above all the other nations of 
ancient times. I have afluredly no objection 
to this doctrine ; I only wifh it were pre- 
fented in their writings in fuch a rational and 
attracting manner as would render it a fource 
of confidence, diredion, and comfort, to the 
whole human race. But is this the cafe, my 
friend ? Was riot the Providence, in which 
they believed, confined to their own nation, 
and that fo exclufively, as to infpire prefump- 
tion, and render it rather hoftile than friendly 
to the reft of the human fpecies ? The 
Hebrews were, in their own eyes, the only 
favourites of Heaven, the people of God r , ex 
clufively, a people already elected in their 
forefathers. Nay, even among themfelves, 

z the 



338 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

the bleflmgs of this gracious and diftinguifh- 
ing Providence, were, in feveral cafes, par 
tially diftributed. When a bleffing was im 
parted to a new branch of a tribe or family, 
it was fometimes accompanied with a male- 
diclion to the others. When Noah blefles 
Sbem, he at the fame time pronounces a curfe 
againft Ham ; while Ifaac receives the pater 
nal bleffing, Ifhmael muft leave his father s 
houfe ; and a fimilar proceeding took place 
with refpedt to Jacob zu& JLfau\ the one was 
chofen, the other was rejected. How fre 
quently do we meet with inftances of injuf- 
tice and partiality in the hiftory of this chofen 
people ? Mofes and Jofhua put to the fword 
the ancient and lawful pofleffors of a country, 
in order to procure a fettlement for this 
people ; and you know what complaints, 
calumnies, and even bitter raillery, thefe 
conquefts have occafioned. The objections 
founded on thefe events, have difturbed the 
tranquillity of many ferious minds ; ofthofe, 
more efpecially, whofe imperfect knowledge 
of thefe ancient times, put it out of their 
power to refute the objectors, and anfwer 
their arguments. There is, however, one 
general reproach caft upon the Israelites, 

which 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 339 

which it is not, I apprehend, eafy to efface ; 
I mean, their high and even infolent idea of 
their own importance, and their lofty preten- 
fions to a decided fuperiority over the reft of 
mankind. This appears in almoft all their 
poetical productions; at leaft, many of them 
are replete with maledictions, and difcover a 
kind of national hatred againft all other 
countries. And yet we do not find, either 
in this felf-fufficient people, or in the hiftory* 
of their patriarchs, any marks of fuperior 
merit, when we compare them with other 
nations. Of what heroic actions can they 
boaft, which have not been furpafTed by the 
people of other countries ? What are the 
great names that reflect honour on their 
tribes ? Is it a drunken Noah ? an Abraham 
who denies his wife in Egypt ? Is it a timid 
Ifaac^?i Jacob who cheats his father, his 
brother, and his relations ? Is it an inceftuous 
Judah^ a vindictive Simeon and Levi? 
Finally, is it Mofes^ the blood- thirfty Mofes ? 
And thefe are the founders of fcates the 
patriarchs of the people of God! In this 
people were all the nations of the earth to be 
bkjjed) while they curfed all the nations of 
the earth, evea thofe which they only knew 

z 2 by 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUED. 

by name, and like true enemies to the human 
race, exulted provisionally in the idea of 
their expected king, who was to deftroy 
them all, as you may fee in many of the 
fongs of their prophets. No imagery was fo 
pleafing to their fancy, as that which rep re- 
fented their future monarch coming from 
mount Seir, treading the ibine-prefs of divine 
wrath) and ftained with the blood of con 
quered nations, even of thofe with whom 
they were in alliance : And all this for what 
purpofe ? Only that their paltry land might 
profper, and their race, though defpifed, 
might domineer over the reft of the world. 
Anfwer me frankly on this head, EUGENIUS, 
and let your anfwer be neither theological 
nor myftical. Of thefe kinds of elucidation I 
have had more than enough and to tell you 
the truth, I am glutted with them. I might 
alfo alk, why Abraham did not remain 
where he was ? Why the innocent Canaan 
was to be punifhed for the fcandalous conduit 
of his father ? It was not furely the fault of 
poor Efau that his mother cooked her kid- 
ragout fooner than he could bring home his 
venifon from the chafe, for his father s table, 
and, neverthelefs, on the female trick that 

was 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 34! 

was practifed on this occafion, depended the 
election of a whole people. On fuch fine 
ftories as thefe, are founded the glory of their 
anceftors, the renown of their predictions, 
and the high regard that has been paid to their 
hymns of praife. But I muft tell you, my 
friend, that the moft fublime poetry would be 
deemed contemptible and barren, if it were 
founded upon ftories of this kind, and while 
it recorded the exploits of a imgle nation, 
breathed a fpirit of partiality and malevolence 
againft the reft of the world. 

EUGENIUS. You feem difpofed, my 
friend, to overwhelm me with objections ; 
but I am beyond their reach ; for I am not a 
Jew, neither do I undertake the defence of 
that people, confidered in their moral and 
national character. But I wiih you to recoi 
led!, before I go farther, that they were not 
chofen as a people, on account of their merit. 
So far was it from this, that their infirmities, 
their vices, and their abominations, have 
never been reprefented in more glaring 
colours, nor expofed and cenfured with more 
feverity and indignation than by their own 
prophets. Nor is it to be denied, that this 

z 3 people 



342 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

people had very erroneous ideas of the defigns 
of Providence, in the preference by which 
they were diftinguifhed, and of their free 
election as a peculiar and favoured people. 
Nay I go ftill farther and acknowledge, with 
out any difficulty, that they dishonoured the 
palladium in which they placed their chief 
glory, even the worfhip of the one living and 
tru?. GOD, by their fuperftition and idolatry, 
their fenfelefs arrogance, and their fanguinary 
rapine and violence. But it is not, methinks, 
our prefent bufmefs to pronounce judgment on 
this people, confidered in their moral and na 
tional character, and ftill lefs to juftify their 
prejudices, their follies, and their crimes : 
our principal ohjecl: ought to be to trace the 
marks of an over-ruling Providence in their 
HISTORY, to illuftrate the beauties which 
are difplayed in their POETRY, and to fhew 
the advantages derived to mankind in fuc- 
ceeding ages, from the events of the one, and 
the leffbns of the other. Let us then, fmce 
we are fpeaking of &lt;\foepherd-pople, fit down 
under the tree before us. Let us fuppofe for 
a moment, that it is the tree of Abraham in 
the plain of Mamre ; and let us talk with fim- 
plicity and good nature like the ruftic fathers 

of 



ORIENTAL, DIALOGUES. 343 

of Ifrael, and not in that ftrain of abufive 
pleafantry, profane wit, and farcaftic acri 
mony, which render fo difgufting the writ- 
Ings of a Voltaire, a Morgan, and a Bbl mgbroke. 
The mild and gracious afpect of Nature all 
around us, invites to concord and philan 
thropy, and we mufl not quarrel with the 
fimple and unpolifhed ruftics of the early 
ages. 

Firft then with refpecT: to Noah, you call 
the behaviour of Ham to him, inconfiderate, 
or even fcandalous ; whichfoever of the two 
it may be deemed, you muft acknowledge 
that it was proper for the father to punifh it. 

ALCIPHRON. To punifh it? 

EUGENIUS. Surely ! The word is proper, 
and the idea it exprefles is juft. The father 
in thefe early days was the fovereign of the 
family. He was mafter of the life and death 
of his fon ; Noah was a fecond Adam, the 
patriarch and chief of a new world. He 
muft have appeared to his houfehold as a fort 
of tutelar divinity, fince it was by his means, 
and on his account, that they were exempted 

z 4 from 



344 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

from the univerfal punifhment inflided on the 
human race. Now you muft grant that a 
more fcandalous infult could not be com- 
niitted againft this domeftic and paternal 
fovereign, than the action of Ham, who was 
already come to years of difcretion, and had 
himfelf children. You know how ftriclly 
the laws of filial reverence and domeftic 
modefty were maintained in the Eaft ; and, 
in this early period, they were certainly 
enforced with peculiar attention and zeal. 
The members which Ham made the fubjecls 
of a vicious pleafantry, were deemed facred ; 
the mocker muft, confequently, have been 
confidered by his brethren as a fhocking 
tranfgreffor of filial reverence and duty. At 
the fame time, you muft obferve, that as this 
tranfgreffion was of a domeftic nature, fuch 
alfo was its puniihment. The delinquent 
had mocked the chief of his houfe, an4 
therefore the puniihment fell on his own 
fon and his family. He was deprived of his 
Jilial rights and privileges, and was humbled 
to the condition of a fervant in tr^e houfe of 
his brethren. 

ALCIPHRON. Is this fignified by the 
terms in his fentence ? 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. Surely. You have it before 
you: 

(( Curfed be Canaan ! 

A fervant of fervants let him be to his brethren ! 

" Blefled be JEHOVAH the God of SJiem! 

" And let Canaan be his fervant ! 

" Elohim (hall enlarge Japhet, 

" And he {hall dwell in the tents of Shem ^ 

" And Canaan (hall be his fervant." 

Now whether Canaan partook or not of the 
guilt of his father s indecent conduct, he 
could not be exempted from a fhare in his 
pumihment ; for when a father forfeits his 
hereditary rights, his children muft naturally 
be fufferers. Such was then, and fuch is 
ftill the inevitable courfe of things, in cala 
mities that overtake families ; and, when the 
manner of thinking, in thefe remote times, 
is duly confidered, it will appear, that if the 
punifhment inflicted by Noah was not mild, 
yet it was not unjuft. He punifhed fhame 
with fhame, contempt with contempt, mock 
ery with humiliation, 

AJ.CIPHRON. But why was Canaan, the 
youngeft fon of Ham, named alone in the 
curfe ? Ham had more and older fons, who, 

as 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

as is not improbable, were partakers of their 
brother s guilt. It would feem, therefore, 
that fome defign upon the land of Canaan 
was here in contemplation. 

EUGENIUS. Then the recital muft be 
applied to fome other event which was to 
take place among the Ifraelites. However, I 
cannot help thinking that Canaan, the 
yo,ungeft fon, had fome {hare in the evil deed ; 
this feems to be intimated by the expreffion of 
the hiftorian, " arid Noah perceived what 
" his grandfon had done" The recital indeed 
is too fhort to determine the matter with cer- 
tamty. It is neverthelefs evident, that the 
prediction under confideration, neither per 
mits nor juftifies a hoftile fpirit in general, 
nor the deflrudtion of the Canaanites in par 
ticular. You may recoiled: that Jacob, on 
his death-bed, pronounced a curfe upon 
two of his fons, (Simeon and Levi,) on ac 
count of their having avenged the greateft 
affront that could be offered to his houfe, in 
the blood of a Canaanitifh family. 

ALCIPHRON. Jofhua, however, put that 
people to the fword. 

EUGE- 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 347 

Eu GENIUS. We {hall fpeak of this after 
wards in ita place. At prefent we muft con 
fine ourfelves to the hiftory of the patriarchs. 
You call Noah a drunkard; but you will 
furely retract this harih epithet when you 
read his hiftory with attention. His intoxi 
cation was the confequence of the trial he had 
made of the juice of the fruit of an unknown 
tree, which he had planted for the firft time. 
What is there in this either blameable or fur- 
prifing ? 

ALCIPHRON. But I muft repeat the 
queftion which I propofed to you fome mo 
ments ago, and which you did not anfwer. 
Why did not Abraham remain where he was ? 
For you know that his travels from Ur into 
other countries were the occafions of many 
calamitous events. 

EUGENIUS. Abraham could not remain 
where he was. He was obliged frequently to 
change his fituation becaufe he was a 
NOMADE, i. z.fub/jfted by pqfturage^ which 
naturally led to an unfcttled, wandering kind 
of life. All the Jhepherd-chiefs in thefe 
- countries 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

countries went, with their flocks, from place 
to place ; they ftill continue this manner of 
living at the diftance of three thoufand years&gt; 
and this, no doubt, muft have produced a 
great diverfity in the population of the Eaft. 
The father of Abraham had already pafled, 
with his family, through the land. Pelegs 
brother had proceeded with his tribe to 
Arabia. Abraham s brother and nephew had 
made fettlements in Mefopotamia, Syria, and 
Chaldea, the moft fertile provinces of this 
region. Amidft thefe acquifitions, Abraham, 
was far from being favoured with the beft por 
tion, and he had a divine promife of indem 
nification en this account. Accordingly, in 
Canaan, as he invaded the rights of none, fo 
neither did any conteft his claims ; and you 
cannot bring any reproach againft him on 
this head. His progrefs through the land is 
that of a venerable and beloved chief. He 
is magnanimous and generous to Lot, and 
alfo to the kings, whom he delivers from 
their enemies : he is juft in his dealings 
with the Canaanites, from whom he pur- 
chafes a fepulchre, and pays down the price, 
although they had offered it to him as a 
gift, Now do you know what they fold 

to 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 349 

to him in this tranfa&ion ? Nothing lefs, 
truly, than the pofleffion of their land in 
ommon with them, for himfelf and his po- 
fterity : where the fathers were buried, there 
muft their defcendants lie: this was a cuftom 
which had the force of law among all the na 
tions of antiquity. At the fepulchres of the 
fathers we Jhall Jind you^ was the ufual ex- 
preffion they employed in maintaining 
vigoroufly their rights and poffeffions againft 
opprefibrs. Truly, my friend, they who re 
proach Abraham with wandering like a 
vagabond, know very little either of his man 
ner of living, or of the means of his fubfift- 
ence ; and they who impute to this noble- 
minded man, malice, oppreffion, or rnean- 
nefs, are totally miftaken. 

ALCIPHRON. It is neverthelefs true that 
he difowned his wife in Egypt. 

Eu GENIUS. And where lay the fault 
here? Much more upon the poli/Iisd 
Egyptians than upon him. Abraham was a 
ftranger ; he was juftly appreheniive of the 
licentious conduct of a people of whom, no 
doubt, he had heard very unfavourable ac 
counts 



35 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

counts ; and the event {hewed that his fears 
were not groundlefs. And befides, my 
friend, we muft not confider a fhepherd-patri- 
arch in the light of a romantic Arcadian 
fwain, nor in that of a hair-brained knight- 
errant, who affronts danger, and only wifhes 
for ten thoufand lives that he may rifle them 
for the defence of his Dulcinea. Not that I 
think the conduQ: of Abraham entirely blame- 
lefs in the prefent cafe ; I only wifh to fee the 
fault of the great and good man confidered 
as an exaggeration of prudence. You muft 
alfo confefs, that the hiftory of the fat does 
not contain what the accufers of Abraham 
(ignorant of the ancient Oriental manners) 
find in it. Let the venerable fhepherd, there 
fore, who had not learned the art of accom 
modation to the manners of a court, be 
judged with impartiality and candour. Let 
us rather view him in his paftoral tent, and 
obferve with what uprightnefs, benevolence, 
and fimplicity, he conduces himfelf there. 
What can be more compaffionate and pious 
than his interceffion for Sodom, his conduft 
towards the King of Salem with refpet to the 
plunder, and the declaration and offer he 
made to Lot ? In what idyl or eclogue will 

you 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 35! 

you find any thing more beautifully fimple, 
pail oral, and gracious, than his hofpitable re 
ception of the angels under the tree of 
Mamre? It brings to my recolleAion the 
charming ftory of Baucis and Philemon. 
But let us confider Abraham, finally, in his 
conduct towards the Supreme Being, and 
here he ihines forth to all ages with a peculiar 
hiftte . Obferve his heroic fubmiffion to the 
\vill of God in the facrifice of the earthly ob 
ject the moft dear to his heart; an object 
which he had fo long and ardently wifhed to 
poffefs, -and in which his- moft brilliant hopes 
were Centered ! God demands this precious 
dbject, and, without hefitation ,the patriarch 
-obeys. Allow me to fay, that I neither know 
nor can conceive any thing more foblime 
than this -Jilent, fubmilGve, and (I will ven 
ture to add) heroic confidence, in the 
Supi*enle Being," this affectionate and mutual 
tranfaitioh betwden a ihepherd and GOD. 
There is nothing like -this in the poetry of 
any other nation in the world. Other bards 
furnifh their refpeclive countries with an 
abundant provilion of divinities, geniufes, 
fpirits, and departed heroes ; but never con 
ceived the elevated idea of connecting them 

With 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

with the ONE ETERNAL MIND, in fuch a 
mild and confidential manner, and, as it 
were, in a bond of mutual friendfhip. The 
patriarchal ftranger has no other friend but 
that God who fent him to a land fo far 
diftant from his own country; but he 
poflefled and enjoyed the favour and protec 
tion of tnis celeftial friend, in a high degree of 
intimacy, (if I may ufe that expreffion,) he 
had HIM always in view,* he lived with him 
as one friend lives with another. Surely you 
muft find thofe paflages fmgularly affeding in 
which God fpeaks to him as a chofen objecl: 
of his paternal care, in which the celeftial 
Father comes to deliver him from danger, to 
comfort him in forrow, to banifh his fears of 
future events, giving him fometimes new 
tokens of his immutable covenant ; at others, 
a new name of diftinclion, or gracious marks 
of his aufpicious prefence while God re 
quires fuitable returns of love and obedience 
from the high- favoured patriarch ; 

t The word of the Lord came to Abraham in 2 

" VISION, faying, 
" Fear not, Abraham \ 

&lt;c I am thy fhield, and exceeding great reward. 
" And he brought him forth abroad, and faid, 
Look now toward heaven and tell the ftars, 

If 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 353 

" If thou be able to number them ; 

So (hall thy feed be. 

&lt;f And he believed in the Lord, 

" And he counted it to him for righteoufnefs *." 

v . 

The beauty of fuch paflages as this will be 
delightfully felt as long as the human heart is 
fufeeptible of the impreflions of what is truly 
beautiful, fimple, and fublime. The fame 
may be faid of the vifion, in which God s 
prefence is announced in the appearances of 
fmoke and a burning lamp, faffing between the 
pieces which compofe the facrifice f. Here 
God again renews the covenant with Abra 
ham, after the manner of human tranfad~iions. 
It was a covenant of friendihip with him and 
his poftenty, which deftined the patriarch to 
be an illuftrious model of the moft difficult 
virtues, and held forth his family as a people, 
referved indeed for arduous undertakings 
and fevere trials, but at the fame time, as a 
people in whofe pofterity all the nations of the 
world were to be bkffed. What do you think 
of the divine couniels, and of God s cove 
nant with Abraham, confidered under this 
point of view, as terminating in the forma- 

* Genefis, xv. 5. 7. f Ibid. v. 17, &c. 

A A tion 



354 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

tion of a people, not only whofe land was to 
extend from the river of Egypt, to the great 
river Euphrates, but from whom was to arife 
the defired of nations ^ the light of the liocrld^ 
who was to open to man the true fources of 
happinefs and perfection ? Such a plan in 
the formation of a people is grand : it is in- 
terefting in the higheft degree, and nothing 
fimilar to it will you find, my friend, in the 
hiftory of any other nation. The ultimate 
objed: propofed by human wifdom in all 
other national eftablifhments, was temporal 
profperity, and the means employed for its 
attainment, I need not enumerate, nor point 
out their fuccefs with refpet to human feli 
city. The hiftory of the w r orld mews this 
fufficiently. 

ALCIPHRON. But where, in the mean 
time, do we fee this great end and defign of 
the formation of this people, clearly an 
nounced ? 

EUGENIUS. You may fee it in the patri 
arch himfelf, even without going farther. 
He ftands forth as a fymbol, as an adumbra- 
tion, if I may ufe that term, of the whole 

covenant. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 355 

covenant. Obferve him with attention. He 
is commanded to leave his father s houfe, to 
repair to ftrange and diftant lands, and to 
fubmit patiently to the hardfhips and diffi 
culties that awaited him in his peregrinations 
and excurfions. Long and earneftly did he 
look for the accomplishment of the divine 
promifes, wearied, no doubt, more or lefs, 
with anxious expectation ; and when, in the 
birth of Ifaac, he received the earneft, the 
firft fruits of thefe promifes, what hap 
pened ? He is commanded to offer up as a 
facrifice, this precious pledge of the divine 
protedion. You fee by all this, as it were 
fymbolically, how a people connected with 
the Deity by a federal bond, muft walk with 
their Supreme Protedor. This bond muft be 
the great objed of their confidence, and their 
pok-Jlar of diredion and conduct ; but it is 
an objed which requires great felf-denial 
and painful facrifices. The virtue, here 
required of Abraham, is not one of thofe 
that make a mining figure in the eyes 
of the world, or meet with the applaufe of 
mankind. It is exercifed in folitude and 
filence ; but by that very circumftance it is 
rendered more admirable and excellent. And 

A A 2 what 



356 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

what is that virtue ? Confidence- in 
which is neither ihaken by the moft painful 
aflaults of adverfity, nor difcouraged by the 
great diftance of the promifed bleffings to 
which it afpires. In one word, this virtue is 
called FAITH. A hero in faith, that is, in 
iimplicity of heart, in magnanimity, in a 
confident regard to the divine promifes, in a 
ftedfaft and unmoveable adherence to his 
duty, fuch a hero was Abraham, and fuch 
an example had his people to fellow. A 
hero of -this kind, you will eafily acknowledge, 
exhibits a nobler character, a more exalted 
afpecl: of human nature, than we meet with 
in many of the vaunted chieftains both of 
ancient and modern times. 

ALCIPHRON. I conclude from all this, 
that the ppetry of the Hebrews ought to be 
called a federal poetry. 

EUGENIUS. You have juft hit offits true 
name. We muft only take care (as you feemed 
a little while ago to be afraid of myftlcal inter 
pretation) to feel^ no more in this name^ than its 
natural (ignification points out. The poetry 
then of the Hebrews, may with propriety be 

called 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 357 

z/, becaufe it conneds heaven and 
earth, God and mankind, the fcebkji of 
mortals with the OMNIPOTENT, the Supreme 
Creator and Governor of the univerfc. It is 
this poetry which treats in a manner entirely 
peculiar of the univerfal Father and his deal 
ings with his children, -with children who 
look up to his covenant, who confide in his 
promifes, and ftrengthen that confidence by a 
pious and habitual recollection of his wife, 
merciful, and righteous providence. Hence 
the powerful effects of this poetry on the 
tender and affectionate feelings of believing 
minds in general, on the heart of the pious 
hero, in the hour of trial and fuffering, and 
the hopes of the virtuous and the good in 
their laft moments, Thus indeed it forms a 
covenant, a fubiime bond of union between 
the human race and whom ? not gods, ge- 
niufes, or departed heroes, but the ONE 
GOD, the univerfal Father of intelligent be 
ings, and the Difpofer of their lot. How 
pleafmg and refpedable, when confidered 
under this point of view, is the plain ancj art- 
lefs hiftory of the patriarchs ! Their external 
profperity was far from being brilliant. 
Few and evil have been the days of my years ^ 

A A 3 was 



358 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

was the declaration of the laft *. They were 
ftrangers ; they wandered about, without any 
fixed abiding place, and they were not, in 
any wife, exempted from domeftic trials and 
Ibrrows, But God was with them ; his 
angel, the angel of the covenant , was their 
leader ; Elobim watched over them : the land 
was blefled, as it were, by the marks of their 
footfteps : while the acknowledgment of the 
one true God, purity of manners, child-like 
fimplicity, and eminent piety, were preferved 
among them, as the treafure of the primitive 
world. In ail this they were noble fubjeds 
and linking examples for the poetry of fuc- 
ceeding ages. 

" Hearken unto me ye that follow after righteouf- 

nefs f ; 

" Ye that feek the Lord and are faithful to him ! 
" Look unto the rock whence ye are hewn, 
" Look to the hole of the pit whence ye are digged J. 
* Look to Abraham, your father ; 
" And unto Sarah that bare you. 
(S For I called him a/one, 

* Genefis, xlvii. 9. f lfaiah,li. I, &c. 

*The difcourfe of John the Baptift, Matthew, iii. 9. pro 
bably alludes to tin s paflage. The Pharifees boafted of their 
being children of Abraham : but the prophet of the wilder- 
nefs tells them that God is able even of the Jlones (where they 
were Handing) to ralfe up children to Abraham. 

And 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 359 

" And bleffed him and increafed him. 

" So (hall Jehovah comfort Sion j 

" He wiH comfort all her wafte places ; 

" Will make her wildernefs like Eden, 

" And her defert like the garden of the Lord ; 

" Joy and gladnefs (hall dwell therein ; 

" Thankfgiving and the voice of melody." 

Remark here the diftindive title given to 
Abraham, in thefe words, / have called him 
ALONE ; i. e. he was the 0#/y,the unparalleled 
believer, who, with the firmnefs of a rock, 
trufted in God, and was therefore confidered 
as the rock from which the people of Ifrael 
were hcwn^ or formed. How folemnly, 
therefore, were that people bound by fuch a 
confideration, to obey the laws and confide 
in the promifes of the God of Abraham, who 
had affumed the paternal character to his 
people, even when Abraham was no more. 

" Look down from heaven, 

" And behold from the habitation of thy majefty and 

* c holinefs ! 

" Doubtlefs thou art our father, 
** Though Abraham be ignorant of us, 
" And Ifrael acknowledge us not. 
" Thou O Lord art our Father, our Redeemer. 
" Thy name is from everlafting *. 

* Ifaiah, Ixiii. 

A A 4 " OLord 



360 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" O Lord why haft thou let us err from thy ways, 
" And harden our hearts from thy fear ? 
" Return for the fake ot thy fervants, 
" The tribe of thy heritage !" 



God had thus, as you fee, taken upon 
felf Abraham s paternal rights with refped to 
this people, and in confequence of his cove 
nant with the patriarch, had condefcended to 
be, in a peculiar manner, their Father and 
their Protestor, 

ALCIPHRON. But what are we to think 
of the faults and mifconducT; of thefe patri* 
archs ? 

EUGENIUS. They were marks of human 
infirmity ; and the candour and fimplicity with 
which they are related without the leaft em- 
bellifhment or difguife, render, I think, their 
paftoral hiftory fingularly interefting. The 
timid Ifaac and the artful Jacob, by their own 
deeds, paint their refpeclive characters in native 
and ftriking colours. But it muft be acknow 
ledged that the latter did not find his account 
in his artifice, and alfo that in his advanced 
. age he exhibits a fliining character among the 
fhepherd-fathers. His hiftory holds up an 

inftruj:- 

fe 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 361 

inftrudive mirrour of the human heart ; and 
God removed from Jacob in his old age the 
ftigma that was attached to his narne and cha 
racter in early youth. Thy name Jhall no more 
be called Jacob, (i. e. the deceiver,) but Ifrael*, 
for tbou baji power with God. This honour 
able appellation announces, not bodily 
ftrength and vigour, but a divine heroifm, s- 
prayer and faith, 

ALCIPHRON. Was it not in a dream that 
Jacob obtained this title ? 

Eu GENIUS. This has been faid and often 
repeated ; but it is a manifeft untruth, and is 
abfolutely inconfiftent with the whole tenour 
and connection of the recital. Jacob had ar 
ranged his army and his tents, from an appre- 
henfion that his brother might fall upon him 
in the night. He now withdrew to a certain 
diftance from his tent, not furely to fleep, 
but precifely with an intention not to fleep. 

ALCIPHRON. And what followed? 

* Genefis, xxxii. 28* 

EUGE- 



362 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

EUGENIUS. That you learn plainly in 
the narration *. He addrefled his petitions 
to heaven, he wreftled with God in prayer, 
and this was to be a vifible fymbol of his 
pious triumph in confequence of his heroic 
faith. On this occafion it was Elobim that 
appeared, not JEHOVAH : and you know that 
thefe denominations, or titles, are diftinc- 
tively employed in the hiftory of Jacob, as 
well as in the earlier records. The celeftial 
bands flood in array againft Jacob, like the 
two wings of an army in order of battle. The 
idea of angels arofe thus naturally in the mind 
of the patriarch ; and then flood forth the 
lofty form of a celeftial warrior, and this form 
wreftled with Jacob. This form, I fay, appear 
ed, but it vanifhed at the breaking of the day. 
What now are we to make of this recital ? 
Read the beautiful night-vifion, as it flands in 
the book of Genefis, which, in the colouring 
and picturefque touches with which it is de- 
fcribed, is fmgularly impreffive and affecting. 

ALCIPHRON reads: 

* Sec Genefis, chap, xxxii. 

And 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 363 

* And Jacob was left alone ; 

" And there wreftled a man with him, until the 

" breaking of the day, 
&lt;f But prevailed not againft him. 
" And when he faw that he prevailed not, 
" He touched the hollow of his thigh, 
&lt;c And the hollow of Jacob s thigh was out of joint, 

&lt; c as he wreftled with him. 

cc Then faid the man, Let me go, for the day breaketh. 
" And Jacob faid, I will not let thee go except thou 

" blefs me. 
" And he (the man) faid unto him, What is thy 

" name ? 

" And he faid, Jacob. 
" And he faid, Thy name (hall be called no more 

4&lt; Jacob but Ifrael ; 
" For as a prince haft thou power with God and 

" with men, 

" And haft prevailed (or conquered). 
&lt; And Jacob faid, Tell me, I pray thee, thy name. 
" And he faid, Why do ft thou afk after my name ? 
&lt; And he blefled him there. 

" And Jacob called the name of the place Peniel, 
t( For I have feen God (Elohim) face to face, and my 

u life is preferved. 

" And as he paflcd over Peniel, the fun rofe, 
* And Jacob halted upon his thigh." 

Is there now any mention made here of a 
dream ? Is not the whole tranfadion related 
with an hiftorical fimplicity, like the account 
given before of Jacob s having arranged his 
tents, and divided his cattle ? And what 

name, 



364 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

name, what title of honour, could there be 
given to Jacob, confidered merely as a 
dreamer ? And becaufe Jacob in a dream 
had ftrained his thigh, was this a reafon for 
his being called a divine champion, powerful 
with God and men^ and for his receiving the 
name of Ifrael, which was to be tranfmitted 
from him to a great nation ? Finally, was 
JEHOVAH to appear again to confirm the pa 
triarch in the polTeffion of this name, if it was 
nothing more than the vifionary title of a 
dreamer ? And was all this to be celebrated 
in a family tradition in honour of Jacob ? 
Rifum teneatis amid ? You muft be fenfible, 
my friend, of the ridiculous abfurdity of this 
explication of the paffage before us,. 

ALCIPHRON. Here you are certainly in 
the right ; and the name and intervention of 
Elohim puts the matter beyond doubt, when 
I recollect what you obferved with refpedt to 
that name in one of our preceding confe 
rences. Conflicts with gods^ fpirlts^ heroes^ 
and forms, were no unufual things in ancient 
times. On the contrary, we find, at leaft in 
the accounts of the poets, that thefe conflicts 
were the ordinary, and at the fame time, the 

mod 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 365 

moft decifive proofs of heroic and extraordi 
nary po\ver in human efforts. In HOMER 
we find frequently gods and heroes engaged 
in conteft ; and OSSIAN reprefents Fingal,on 
a certain night, combating furioufly the ghoft 
of a giant. Relations and ideas of this kind 
muft have been common in the Eaft. 

Eu GEN i us. According to the poets, in 
deed, fuch combats made an eflential part of 
the hiftory of the earlieft heroes, who were 
obliged, at leaft in the fancy of their bards, to 
encounter ghofts and giants, in order to obtain 
this title. But you muft not, however, dif- 
honour the noble fimplicity of Jacob s hiftory 
by fuch elucidations, or by comparifons 
drawn from fables or traditions of a later date. 
Such illuftrations are very improper here. 
With what paftoral fimplicity is the event be 
fore us recorded ! The fupernatural combat 
ant is not fpecified by any particular 
mark of diftindion; he does not himfelf 
fay, ivbo he is, and we are left to guefs it 
only by the name *. Jacob makes no 
noife about this extraordinary event : he 
tells it to nobody ; he wonders how he, 

* Eloihim. 

who 



366 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

who was only a (hepherd, fhould have been 
engaged with Elohlm face to face, without 
loling his life in the conteft. But the moft in- 
terefting part of this ftory is the language it 
muft naturally have addrefled to the anxious 
patriarch, and the encouraging conclufion 
that he muft as naturally have deduced from 
it. For it muft have taught him how need- 
lefs it was for him to fly before Efau, when, 
by his prayers and efforts, he had obtained a 
pious victory over Jehovah. Thus does a 
prophet underftand the matter * ; and the 
fenfe of the imagery is clearly manifefted by 
the time, place, and connection of the hif- 
tory. 

ALCIPHRON. Thus then Jacob, now a 
man, was to learn from this event, the fame 
leffon which he had learned when a boy, 
from the vifion of the ladder which reached 
to heaven ? 

EUGENIUS. Juft fo with this only dif 
ference, that he was to learn it in a manner 
fuitable to the manly character ; I mean, that 

* Hofeajxii. 4, $. 

4. te 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 367 

he was to acquire his honourable title by a 
manly effort^ and not by a dream. In the 
mean time, your parallel is juft and ftriking. 
The dream (hews the boyifh ideas of the 
young fhepherd concerning God and the 
angels ; it may be read as an idyl. Are you 
inclined to read it ? Evening approaches, 
and the fun fets with fuch beauty ! 

ALCIPHRON reads* : 

He (Jacob) lighted upon a certain place, 

** And tarried there all night, becaufe the fun was 

fet. 

" And he took of the ftones of that place, 
" And put them for his pillows, 
" And lay down to fleep, 
" And he dreamed^ 
" And behold a ladder fet up on the earth, and the 

" top of it reached to heaven ; 
Cf And behold the angels of God afcending and dc- 

" fcending on it. 

" And behold the Lord flood above it, and faid, 
** I am the Lord God of Abraham thy father, 
" And the God of Ifaac, &c. &c. 
" And Jacob awaked out of his fleep, and faid, 
f Surely the Lord is in this place, and I knew it not : 
&lt;c And he was afraid, and faid, 
" How dreadful is this place ! 
* Ehhim refides here ! 

* Genefis, xxviii. 11, &c. 

ThU 



368 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES, 

-,? This is the gate of heaven. 

" And Jacob arofe at the break of day, 

" And took the ftone that was his pillow, 

** And fet it up for a pillar, 

&lt;{ And poured oil upon the top of it, 

t( And named the place Beth-el^ i. e. the houfe of 

" God. 

" And he vowed a vow, faying, 
C If God will be with me, and will keep me in this 

" way that I go, 
* e And will give me bread to eat, and raiment to put 

" on, 

c&lt; So that I come again to my father s houfe in peace ; 
4&lt; Then (hall the Lord be my God, 
* c And this ftone which I have fet up for a pillar, 

" fnall.be a houfe of God." 

EUGENIUS. You perceive here the natural 
feelings of a young fhepherd. He has no 
idea that his father s God fhould dwell elfe- 
where than in his father s cottage, and he is 
feized with fear when he learns that he had 
flept, without knowing it, on holy ground^ 
even in the outer court of the dwelling of 
Jehovah. He had here feen in his dream, 
\hz gate of beav en opened, and, confequently, 
confidered this place as the dwelling of God : 
How could he,confider it otherwife ? And as 
the angels were afcending and defcending on 
the ladder which reached from earth to 

heaven, 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 369 

heaven, it was poffible that one of them 
(an Elobim in power and dignity) might 
contend with Jacob. 

Have you any farther difficulties relative to 
the hiftory of the patriarchs, which you 
wifh to have folved ? 

ALCIPHRON. I was indeed this very mo 
ment thinking of the great partiality rnani- 
felled by the fathers in bleffing their fons ; 
a partiality fo much the more reprehenfible, 
as, according to the general opinion of the 
tribes, the lot of their posterity depended on 
the prediction or blejfivg pronounced by their 
fathers. 

EUGENIUS. What do you mean ? Did 
their lot depend upon the will of their 
fathers ? No fuch thing. Was not Ifaac 
even partial in favour of Efau ? And was 
not Abraham inclined to a reconciliation with 
Ifhmael ? How painful was it to Jacob to be 
obliged to pafs by the three firft of his fons, 
and yet none of them remained deftitute of 
temporal bleflings. Efau went out as a prince 
to meet Jacob : Jacob, who had received 
the paternal bleffing, was a ftranger, a dweller 

B B in 



370 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

in tents^ and remained fo. Ifhmael lived in 
his defert, free and frolickfome, like the ani 
mal with which he was compared, the wild 
afs or colt*. His defendants ftill boaft 
of having received their land from God ; 
they accordingly follow their vocation in it 
with contentment and pleafure, and defire 
nothing better upon earth : 

* He (hall be a wild man (or animal,) 
" His hand {hall be againft every man, 
" And every man s hand againft him ; 
" And he mall dwell in the prefence of all his 
brethren." 

This prediction is fulfilled with refpect to the 
Ifbmaelites, and they are entirely fatisfied with 
their condition. Let us read the truly intereft- 
ing and moving ftory of the rejected Hagar^ 
wandering in the wildernefs. It is a remark 
able fpecimen of the beauties of the Hebrew 
poetry f . 

" The water was fpent in the bottle, 

And me caft the child under one of the mrubs, 

" And flie went and fat her down over againft him, 

a good way off, as it were a bow mot \ 
" For (he faid, let me not fee the death of the child I 

* Oenefisxvi. 12. f Genefis, sxi. 15. 

And 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 37! 

And (he fat over againft him, and lift up her voice 

" and wept. 

" And God heard the voice of the lad, 
" And the angel of God called from heaven to Hagar, 

" and faid unto her, 
" What aiJeth thee, Hagar ? Fear not ; 
" For God hath heard the voice of the lad $ 
" Arife, lift up the lad, hold him in thy hand ; 
For I will make him a great nation. 
" And God opened her eyes, 
" And (he faw the well of water, 
" And fhe went and filled the bottle, 
&lt;c And gave the lad drink. 
* And God was with him, and he grew, 
" And dwelt in the wildernefs, 
" And became an archer." 

In a manner equally affe&ing and pathetic, is 
the ftory of Efau told, when he faw himfelf 
excluded from the bleffing which was con 
ferred upon Jacob. Let us place the two 
benedictions together, that we may perceive 
the characteriftical lines which diftinguifh 
them. 

ISAAC S prediction and bleffing ref petting 
JACOB * (defigned for Efau). 

" Come near now and kifs me my fon. 

" And he came near and kifled him : 

" And he fmelled the odour of his raiment, 

* Genefis, xxva. 26. 

B B ^ " And 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

&lt;f And blefitd him, and {aid, 

" See the fmell of my fon is as the fmell of a field 

" which the Lord hath blefled ; 
" Therefore God give you of the dew of heaven, 
" And of the fatnefs of the earth, and plenty of corn 

" and wine ! 

" Let the people ferve thee, and nations bow to thee ! 
" Be lord over thy brethren, and let thy mother s 

" fons bow down to thee ! 
" Curfed be every one that curfeth thee ! 
" Blefled be he that blefll-th thee. * 



Efau, on perceiving that the bleffing due to 
him as the firft-born, was furreptitioufly ob 
tained by his brother, faid, 

" Haft thou but one blefling, my father ? 

" Blefs me, even me alfo, O my father I 

" And Efau lift up his voice and wept : 

" And Ifaac his father anfwercd and faid unto him," 

(Tbe Ueffing of Is A AC on Es AU *.) 

" Behold thy dwelling (hall be of the fatnefs of the 

" earth ; 

w And of.the dew of heaven from above ; 
" And by thy fword (halt thou live ; 
" And malt ferve thy brother. 
&lt;c But the time of thy dominion mail come, 
And thou malt break his yoke from thy neck." 

* 

* Genefis, xxvii. 3,9. 

You 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 373 

You perceive in both thefe benedictions the 
voice of fate, or rather of the divine decree, 
counteracting the will of the father, who, 
under the form of Elau, is con (trained to bleis 
his brother. But in truth, all your difficulties 
concerning thefe two predictions, will vanifh, 
when you confider that the blefling allotted to 
Jacob, was not of a temporal nature. The great 
and effentlal objeft which was to diflinguifh him 
and his pofterity, was the prefervation of the 
name of JEHOVAH, and the knowledge of the 
fublime truths which aie comprehended in it. 
They were, from the time of Mofes, appointed 
to bear the burthen of the law, a bleffing this, 
from which many were glad to be exempted 
and fome impatient to be delivered, 

ALCIPHRON. They did not, however, 
lofe fight of the land of Canaan. 

EUGENIUS. And what was there fo pecu 
liarly valuable and inviting in that little 
diftricl: ? The people in queftion, if they 
continued to exift together as a people, muft 
have exifted fomewhere. This corner of the 
world, it is true, has been highly extolled in 
the poetry of the Hebrews; fcarcely any 
B B 3 mountain, 



374 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

mountain, fpring, or valley, has been left 
unfung ; but how, and in what fenfe, has 
this boafted region been fo celebrated? 
Merely as God s land^ as the land of promife^ 
and in no other point of view. It derives its 
name from ideas of expectation, promife, con- 
fec r atlon ; and, in the poetry of Canaan, thefe 
ideas recur perpetually. Slon, Lebanon, Car- 
mel, are God s hills. The rivers, where any 
events happen, are the rivers of Goa. The 
land is a holy land, a land of eleffion. In the 
hiftories of other countries, we find that 
the people regarded certain places, here 
and there, as peculiarly dedicated to their 
deities, fuch as mady groves, mountains of a 
lofty and awful afpecl: ; cities renowned for 
arts or arms ; but I know no poetry of any 
nation, in which even unfruitful regions are 
regarded as fcenes of divine munificence, and 
the corner of a country is confecrated as the 
refidence of the majefty of Jehovah. Even 
at this day the wandering multitude of the 
difperfed tribes, turn their views to this great 
object, the PROMISED CANAAN : they ftill 
comfort themfelves with the idea that their 
defendants mall inhabit, one day, that holy 
land, that land of election. Their hiftory, 

their 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 375 

their traditions, their law, their poetry, ter 
minate and centre in this land of promife, 
without which they are no more than caftles 
in the air, without confiftence or foundation. 

ALCIPHRON. It is then no fmall mortifi 
cation for us that we have not a portion in 
that land, and that we cannot read the male 
dictions pronounced by the prophets on all 
other countries with that enthufiaftic pleafure, 
which they excite in the minds of this chofen 
people. But all their golden dreams about 
this little fpot of ground, which is one day 
to become fo great and powerful, under that 
king fo long expected, and yet to come, are 
confidered by us as idle fancies, and, confe- 
quently^ a great part of their poetry is, for 
us, a mere jingle of high-founding words. 

EUGENIUS. Your decifion is too hafly. 
But we fhall confider this matter with the at 
tention it deierves, when we corne to fpeak 
of the prophets, and their predictions relative 
to the temporal ftate of the Jewifh nation in 
times yet to come. Surgamus ! folent ejfe 
graves fedentibus umbr&lt; ! In the mean time, 
it would give me a fmcere and cordial plea- 

B B 4 fure 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

fure to think tha I had contributed, in any 
meafure, to remove or diminifh the difficulties 
youfeemed to find in the patriarchal hiftory of 
that people, and to illuftrate to your fatisfac^ 
tion, the character and fpirit of their poetry, 
even from their genealogical records. Apaf- 
toral bucolical poetry it certainly is, a federal 
poetry alfo ; that is, a poetry founded, if I may 
ufe fuch an expreffion, on a family compact 
with God. Finally, it is the poetry of Canaan, 
confidered as a land of diledion and promife, 
Under thefe points of view, you muft read 
and confider it, if you wifh to enter truly 
into its fpirit. 



EXTRACTS 

ILLUSTRATIVE OF 

THE SPIRIT AND GENIUS OF ORIENTAL POETRY 5 
From the Book of Job* 



I. 



A Portraiture of the happimfs, activity, and dig 
nity ^ of an EASTERN PRINCE*. 

" O that I were as in the days of old, 

" In the days when God was my guardian, 

&lt;c When his lamp (hined over my head, 

* c And when, by his light, I walked through darknefs ! 

&lt;c As I was in the days of my youth, 

&lt;c When God fat in my tent as courifellor, 

* c When the Almighty was yet with me ; 

When my children were yet about me ; 

When ftreams of milk flowed where I went, 

" And the rock poured me out rivers of oil ! 

When I went out to the gate f, through the city, 

When I prepared my feat in the ftreet ! 

" The young men faw me and hid themfelves j 

*? The aged arofe and flood up ; 

&lt; The princes refrained talking, 

And laid their hand on their mouth ; 

" The nobles held their peace, 

V Their tongue cleaved to the roof of their mouth: 

* Job&gt; xxix. 

J- The gate was the place where the judges fat to hear 
caufes. 

w When 



378 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

" When the ear heard me it blefled me : 

" When the eye faw me it gave witnefs to me ; 

" Becaufe I delivered the poor that cried, 

t And the fatherlefs who had none to help him ; 

tf The blefling of him who was ready to perifh came 

" upon me, 

* And I caufed the widow s heart to (ing for joy, 
* c I put on righteoufnefs and it clothed me ; 
" My judgment was as a robe and diadem. 
( I was eyes to the blind ; 
" And feet was I to the lame. 
" I was a father to the poor ; 
" And I pleaded the caufe of the (Iranger; 
t And I brake the jaws of the wicked ; 
" And plucked the fpoil out of his teeth. 
" Then faid I, I mall die in my neft * ; 
" And I (hall multiply my days as the fand 5 
" My root was fpread out by the waters 5 
&lt;e And. the dew lay all night upon my branch,, 
t My glory was frefh in me ; 
" And my bow was renewed in my hand, 
" Unto me men gave ear and waited ; 
" They kept filence at my counfel ; 
After my words they fpake not again ; 
&lt;f For my reafons dropped upon them as dew : 
" And they watted for me, as for a fpring-fhower. 
* I chofe out their way, and fat chief, 
** And dwelt as a king in the army, 
"As one that comforteth the mourners." 

* Job had probably here the Pbanix in view, but by a 
mixed metaphor, which has its beauty, the image of the bird 
is affociated with that of the palm-tree, and thus we fee that 
the analogy between thefe two objeds was noticed in the 
Eaft. 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 379 



II. 

Portraiture of aftedfaft mind fuppor ted by re~ 
ligious confidence in tbs day of adverjity. 

When the difmal accounts of the lofs of his 
children and his goods were brought to Job 
by fucceffive meflengers, with an overwhelm 
ing rapidity, the narration proceeds in the 
following manner : Chap. 5. 20. 

&lt; Then Job arofe, and rent his mantle, and fliaved 

" his head, 
&lt;* And threw himfelf upon the ground, and prayed, 

u and faid, 

" Naked came I out of my mother s womb, 
And naked (hall I return thither *. 
" The Lord has given, 
&lt;e The Lord has taken away, 
" Blefled be the name of the Lord !" 

While his friends treat him with the greateft 
feverity, charge him with fecret crimes, and, 
on that account, threaten him with ftill more 
heavy judgments from the hand of God, 
while his neareft relations forfake, difown, 

* The tvoml and the earth, are, among the Orientals, fre 
quently ufed the one for the other. 

4 and 



380 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

and defpife him, he gives vent to his feelings 
in the following manner : Chap. xix. 10,. 29. 



tf All my intimate friends abhorred me, 

" And they whom I loved are turned againft me ; 

** My bone cleaveth to my {kin and to my flem. 

" Have pity upon me, have pity upon : me, O my 

&lt;c friends ! 

" For the hand of God hath touched me. 
&lt;c Why do ye perfeeute me as God ? 
&lt;f Oh that my words were now written ! 
" Oh that they were printed in a book ! 
" That they were graven with an iron pen^ 
" And lead in the rock for ever ! 
u I k now that my avenger liveth * / 
" And that he mall, at the laft, appear in my caufe 

a on the fcene of conteft: 

" Let them then (my enemies) deftroy my flefh ; 
" I (hall neverthelefs live and fee God ; 
" Him mail I behold as my deliverer ; 
" And mine eyes lhall behold him, and not another. 



* Thefe word? are in their connection fo plain and clear s 
that it is not eafy to conceive how they have been fo often 
irufmterpreted, and rendered thereby obfcure. The friends 
of Job had perfecuted, and then fqrfaken him. He has, 
neverthelefs, a friend remaining, who will be his avenger ; 
(this was the office of the neareft relation ;) and this avenger, 
this friend, is God. Job has an intimate perfuafion that God 
is on his fide, and (hall continue to be his guardian when 
every one elfe has deferted him. Then fhall his innocence be 
difplayed, and his caufe triumph. 

" Then 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 381 

" Then (hall ye fay, Why psrfecute we him ? 
" Seeing the root of the matter is found in me ? 
&lt;c Be ye afraid of the fword : 
* It is a fword of wrath that puniflies iniquity, 
" That ye may know there is a judgment." 



III. 



&lt;fbe moral principles and dottrlne of an IDUMEAN 
PRINCE. JOB, xxxi. 

I made a covenant with my eyes, 

Why then {hould I think upon a maid ? 

For what portion {hould I then have in God ? 

And what inheritance of the Almighty from on 

" high? 

Doth not definition follow the wicked ? 
And fhame purfue the workers of iniquity ? 
Doth not HE fee my ways ? 
And count all my fteps ? 

If I have walked with vanity, 
Or if my foot hath halted to deceit, 
" Let me be weighed in an even balance, 
That God may know mine integrity. 
If my ftep hath turned out of the way, 
And mine heart walked after mine eyes, 
And if any blot hath cleaved to my hands, 
Then let me fow, and let another eat, 

" Yea, 



382 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 

Yea, let mine offspring be rooted out ! 
Or rather, " Let another root out what I have 
planted ! 

" If mine heart hath been deceived by a woman, 
" Or if I have laid wait at my neighbour s door, 
&lt;e Then let my wife grind unto another, 
" And let others bow down upon her. 
(( For this is an heinous crime ; 
c Yea, it is an iniquity to be punifhed by the Judge ; 4 
&lt;c For it is a fire that confumeth to deftru&ion, 
And would root out all mine increafe. 

" If I did defpife the caufe of my man-fervant, 

" Or of my maid-fervant, when they contended with 

" me; 

" What then (hall I do when God rifeth up ? 
" And when he vifiteth, what fhall I anfwer ? 
" Did not he that made me make him ? 
&lt; And did not one hand fafhion us in the womb ? 

^ If I have withheld from the poor their defire, 
&lt; Or have caufed the eyes of the widow to fail ; 
* Or have eaten my morfel myfelf alone ; 
And the fatherlefs hath not eaten thereof; 
" If I have feen any perifh for want of clothing ; 
" Or any poor without covering ; 
" If his loins have not blefled me ; 
c And if he were not warmed with the fleece of my 

ftieep; 

" If I have lifted up my hand againft the orphan 5 
" When I faw my help in the gate ; 
Then let mine arm fall from my fhoulder-blade ; 
" And mine arm be broken from the bone ; 

" For 



ORIENTAL DIALOGUES. 383 

For then definition from God muft have filled me 

" with terror ; 
&lt; And by reafon of his highnefs I could not endure. 

" If I have made gold my hope, 

&lt;c Or faid to fine gold, Thou art my confidence, 

cc If I rejoiced becaufe my wealth was great; 

" And becaufe mine hand had gotten much. 

" If I beheld the fun when it ftiined, 

&lt;( Or the moon walking in brightnefs ; 

&lt;f And my heart hath been fecretly enticed ; 

* And my mouth hath kifled my hand; 

" This alfo were an iniquity to be puniflied by the 



&lt;c For I mould have denied the God that is above. 

* Did I rejoice at the deftruclion of him that hated 

" me ? 

" Or did I lift up myfelf when evil found him ? 
" No I fuffered not myfelf to fin by wifhing a curfe 

" to his foul ; 
" And even when the men of my tabernacle faid, (of 

" any one with rage and paffion,) 
" Oh that we had of his flefh to fatisfy us ! 
" The ftranger ( thus threatened) did not lodge in 

" the ftreet, 
" But I opened my door to the traveller. 

" Did I cover my tranfgreflions like Adam, 
" By hiding my iniquity in my bofom ? 
" Did I fear a great multitude ? 
" Or did the contempt of families terrify me ? 
" So as that I kept filence, and went not out of 
" the door? 

&lt; Oh 



384 ORIENTAL DIALOGUES* 

Oh that ONE would hear me ! 

Behold my defire is that the Almighty would 

" anfwer me ! 

" And that mine adverfary had written a book ! 
" Surely I would take it upon my fhoulders as an 

ornament ! 

And bind it as acrown to me ! 
c&lt; I would declare unto him the number of my fteps ! 
" As a prince would I go near unto him. 

9 f If my land cry againfl me , 

" Or that the furrows thereof complain : 

" That I have eaten the fruits thereof without 

" money j 

" And caufed the owners thereof to lofe their life * y 
e Let thiftles grow there inftead of wheat \ 
" And cockle inftead of barley." 



THE END. 



Printtd by A. Straban, Pr inti.r**Street&gt; 



BINDING SECT. NOV 3 1980 



PLEASE DO NOT REMOVE 
CARDS OR SLIPS FROM THIS POCKET 

UNIVERSITY OF TORONTO LIBRARY 



rlerder, 

rie v: 



